Ohio, session 136, SB133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 9.07, 120.03, 120.041, 120.06, 120.14, 120.16, 120.18, 120.24, 120.26, 120.28, 120.33, 120.34, 149.43, 149.436, 1901.183, 2152.13, 2152.67, 2301.20, 2307.60, 2317.02, 2701.07, 2743.51, 2901.02, 2909.24, 2929.02, 2929.13, 2929.14, 2929.61, 2930.19, 2937.222, 2941.021, 2941.14, 2941.148, 2941.401, 2941.43, 2941.51, 2945.06, 2945.10, 2945.13, 2945.21, 2945.25, 2945.33, 2945.38, 2949.02, 2949.03, 2953.02, 2953.07, 2953.08, 2953.09, 2953.10, 2953.21, 2953.23, 2953.71, 2953.72, 2953.73, 2953.81, 2967.05, 2967.12, 2967.13, 2967.193, 2967.194, 2971.03, 2971.07, 5120.113, 5120.53, 5120.61, 5139.04, and 5919.16 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 9.07. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Deadly weapon" has the same meaning as in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code. (2) "Governing authority of a local public entity" means whichever of the following is applicable: (a) For a county, the board of county commissioners of the county; (b) For a municipal corporation, the legislative authority of the municipal corporation; (c) For a combination of counties, a combination of municipal corporations, or a combination of one or more counties and one or more municipal corporations, all boards of county commissioners and legislative authorities of all of the counties and municipal corporations that combined to form a local public entity for purposes of this section. (3) "Local public entity" means a county, a municipal corporation, a combination of counties, a combination of municipal corporations, or a combination of one or more counties and one or more municipal corporations. (4) "Non-contracting political subdivision" means any political subdivision to which all of the following apply: (a) A correctional facility for the housing of out-of-state prisoners in this state is or will be located in the political subdivision. (b) The correctional facility described in division (A)(4)(a) of this section is being operated and managed, or will be operated and managed, by a local public entity or a private contractor pursuant to a contract entered into prior to March 17, 1998, or a contract entered into on or after March 17, 1998, under this section. (c) The political subdivision is not a party to the contract described in division (A)(4)(b) of this section for the management and operation of the correctional facility. (5) "Out-of-state jurisdiction" means the United States, any state other than this state, and any political subdivision or other jurisdiction located in a state other than this state. (6) "Out-of-state prisoner" means a person who is convicted of a crime in another state or under the laws of the United States or who is found under the laws of another state or of the United States to be a delinquent child or the substantially equivalent designation. (7) "Private contractor" means either of the following: (a) A person who, on or after March 17, 1998, enters into a contract under this section with a local public entity to operate and manage a correctional facility in this state for out-of-state prisoners. (b) A person who, pursuant to a contract with a local public entity entered into prior to March 17, 1998, operates and manages on March 17, 1998, a correctional facility in this state for housing out-of-state prisoners. (B) Subject to division (I) of this section, the only entities other than this state that are authorized to operate a correctional facility to house out-of-state prisoners in this state are a local public entity that operates a correctional facility pursuant to this section or a private contractor that operates a correctional facility pursuant to this section under a contract with a local public entity. Subject to division (I) of this section, a private entity may operate a correctional facility in this state for the housing of out-of-state prisoners only if the private entity is a private contractor that enters into a contract that comports with division (D) of this section with a local public entity for the management and operation of the correctional facility. (C)(1) Except as provided in this division, on and after March 17, 1998, a local public entity shall not enter into a contract with an out-of-state jurisdiction to house out-of-state prisoners in a correctional facility in this state. On and after March 17, 1998, a local public entity may enter into a contract with an out-of-state jurisdiction to house out-of-state prisoners in a correctional facility in this state only if the local public entity and the out-of-state jurisdiction with which the local public entity intends to contract jointly submit to the department of rehabilitation and correction a statement that certifies the correctional facility's intended use, intended prisoner population, and custody level, and the department reviews and comments upon the plans for the design or renovation of the correctional facility regarding their suitability for the intended prisoner population specified in the submitted statement. (2) If a local public entity and an out-of-state jurisdiction enter into a contract to house out-of-state prisoners in a correctional facility in this state as authorized under division (C)(1) of this section, in addition to any other provisions it contains, the contract shall include whichever of the following provisions is applicable: (a) If a private contractor will operate the facility in question pursuant to a contract entered into in accordance with division (D) of this section, a requirement that, if the facility is closed or ceases to operate for any reason and if the conversion plan described in division (D)(16) of this section is not complied with, the out-of-state jurisdiction will be responsible for housing and transporting the prisoners who are in the facility at the time it is closed or ceases to operate and for the cost of so housing and transporting those prisoners; (b) If a private contractor will not operate the facility in question pursuant to a contract entered into in accordance with division (D) of this section, a conversion plan that will be followed if, for any reason, the facility is closed or ceases to operate. The conversion plan shall include, but is not limited to, provisions that specify whether the local public entity or the out-of-state jurisdiction will be responsible for housing and transporting the prisoners who are in the facility at the time it is closed or ceases to operate and for the cost of so housing and transporting those prisoners. (3) If a local public entity and an out-of-state jurisdiction intend to enter into a contract to house out-of-state prisoners in a correctional facility in this state as authorized under division (C)(1) of this section, or if a local public entity and a private contractor intend to enter into a contract pursuant to division (D) of this section for the private contractor's management and operation of a correctional facility in this state to house out-of-state prisoners, prior to entering into the contract the local public entity and the out-of-state jurisdiction, or the local public entity and the private contractor, whichever is applicable, shall conduct a public hearing in accordance with this division, and, prior to entering into the contract, the governing authority of the local public entity in which the facility is or will be located shall authorize the location and operation of the facility. The hearing shall be conducted at a location within the municipal corporation or township in which the facility is or will be located. At least one week prior to conducting the hearing, the local public entity and the out-of-state jurisdiction or private contractor with the duty to conduct the hearing shall cause notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing to be made by publication in the newspaper with the largest general circulation in the county in which the municipal corporation or township is located. The notice shall be of a sufficient size that it covers at least one-quarter of a page of the newspaper in which it is published. This division applies to a private contractor that, pursuant to the requirement set forth in division (I) of this section, is required to enter into a contract under division (D) of this section. (D) Subject to division (I) of this section, on and after March 17, 1998, if a local public entity enters into a contract with a private contractor for the management and operation of a correctional facility in this state to house out-of-state prisoners, the contract, at a minimum, shall include all of the following provisions: (1) A requirement that the private contractor seek and obtain accreditation from the American correctional association for the correctional facility within two years after accepting the first out-of-state prisoner at the correctional facility under the contract and that it maintain that accreditation for the term of the contract; (2) A requirement that the private contractor comply with all applicable laws, rules, or regulations of the government of this state, political subdivisions of this state, and the United States, including, but not limited to, all sanitation, food service, safety, and health regulations; (3) A requirement that the private contractor send copies of reports of inspections completed by appropriate authorities regarding compliance with laws, rules, and regulations of the type described in division (D)(2) of this section to the director of rehabilitation and correction or the director's designee and to the governing authority of the local public entity in which the correctional facility is located; (4) A requirement that the private contractor report to the local law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction over the place at which the correctional facility is located, for investigation, all criminal offenses or delinquent acts that are committed in or on the grounds of, or otherwise in connection with, the correctional facility and report to the department of rehabilitation and correction all disturbances at the facility; (5) A requirement that the private contractor immediately report all escapes from the facility, and the apprehension of all escapees, by telephone and in writing to the department of rehabilitation and correction, to all local law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction over the place at which the facility is located, to the state highway patrol, to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the facility is located, and to a daily newspaper having general circulation in the county in which the facility is located. The written notice may be by either facsimile transmission or mail. A failure to comply with this requirement is a violation of section 2921.22 of the Revised Code. (6) A requirement that the private contractor provide a written report to the director of rehabilitation and correction or the director's designee and to the governing authority of the local public entity in which the correctional facility is located of all unusual incidents occurring at the correctional facility. The private contractor shall report the incidents in accordance with the incident reporting rules that, at the time of the incident, are applicable to state correctional facilities for similar incidents occurring at state correctional facilities. (7) A requirement that the private contractor provide internal and perimeter security to protect the public, staff members of the correctional facility, and prisoners in the correctional facility; (8) A requirement that the correctional facility be staffed at all times with a staffing pattern that is adequate to ensure supervision of inmates and maintenance of security within the correctional facility and to provide for appropriate programs, transportation, security, and other operational needs. In determining security needs for the correctional facility, the private contractor and the contract requirements shall fully take into account all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the proximity of the facility to neighborhoods and schools. (9) A requirement that the private contractor provide an adequate policy of insurance that satisfies the requirements set forth in division (D) of section 9.06 of the Revised Code regarding contractors who operate and manage a facility under that section, and that the private contractor indemnify and hold harmless the state, its officers, agents, and employees, and any local public entity in the state with jurisdiction over the place at which the correctional facility is located or that owns the correctional facility, reimburse the state for its costs in defending the state or any of its officers, agents, or employees, and reimburse any local government entity of that nature for its costs in defending the local government entity, in the manner described in division (D) of that section regarding contractors who operate and manage a facility under that section; (10) A requirement that the private contractor adopt for prisoners housed in the correctional facility the security classification system and schedule adopted by the department of rehabilitation and correction under section 5145.03 of the Revised Code, classify in accordance with the system and schedule each prisoner housed in the facility, and house all prisoners in the facility in accordance with their classification under this division; (11) A requirement that the private contractor will not accept for housing, and will not house, in the correctional facility any out-of-state prisoner in relation to whom any of the following applies: (a) The private entity has not obtained from the out-of-state jurisdiction that imposed the sentence or sanction under which the prisoner will be confined in this state a copy of the institutional record of the prisoner while previously confined in that out-of-state jurisdiction or a statement that the prisoner previously has not been confined in that out-of-state jurisdiction and a copy of all medical records pertaining to that prisoner that are in the possession of the out-of-state jurisdiction. (b) The prisoner, while confined in any out-of-state jurisdiction, has a record of institutional violence involving the use of a deadly weapon or a pattern of committing acts of an assaultive nature against employees of, or visitors to, the place of confinement or has a record of escape or attempted escape from secure custody. (c) Under the security classification system and schedule adopted by the department of rehabilitation and correction under section 5145.03 of the Revised Code and adopted by the private contractor under division (B)(10) of this section, the out-of-state prisoner would be classified as being at a security level higher than medium security. (12) A requirement that the private contractor, prior to housing any out-of-state prisoner in the correctional facility under the contract, enter into a written agreement with the department of rehabilitation and correction that sets forth a plan and procedure that will be used to coordinate law enforcement activities of state law enforcement agencies and of local law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction over the place at which the facility is located in response to any riot, rebellion, escape, insurrection, or other emergency occurring inside or outside the facility; (13) A requirement that the private contractor cooperate with the correctional institution inspection committee in the committee's performance of its duties under section 103.73 of the Revised Code and provide the committee, its subcommittees, and its staff members, in performing those duties, with access to the correctional facility as described in that section; (14) A requirement that the private contractor permit any peace officer who serves a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the place at which the correctional facility is located to enter into the facility to investigate any criminal offense or delinquent act that allegedly has been committed in or on the grounds of, or otherwise in connection with, the facility; (15) A requirement that the private contractor will not employ any person at the correctional facility until after the private contractor has submitted to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, on a form prescribed by the superintendent of the bureau, a request that the bureau conduct a criminal records check of the person and a requirement that the private contractor will not employ any person at the facility if the records check or other information possessed by the contractor indicates that the person previously has engaged in malfeasance; (16) A requirement that the private contractor will not accept for housing, and will not house, in the correctional facility any out-of-state prisoner unless the private contractor and the out-of-state jurisdiction that imposed the sentence for which the prisoner is to be confined agree that, if the out-of-state prisoner is confined in the facility in this state, commits a criminal offense while confined in the facility, is convicted of or pleads guilty to that offense, and is sentenced to a term of confinement for that offense but is not sentenced to death for that offense, the private contractor and the out-of-state jurisdiction will do all of the following: (a) Unless section 5120.50 of the Revised Code does not apply in relation to the offense the prisoner committed while confined in this state and the term of confinement imposed for that offense, the out-of-state jurisdiction will accept the prisoner pursuant to that section for service of that term of confinement and for any period of time remaining under the sentence for which the prisoner was confined in the facility in this state, the out-of-state jurisdiction will confine the prisoner pursuant to that section for that term and that remaining period of time, and the private contractor will transport the prisoner to the out-of-state jurisdiction for service of that term and that remaining period of time. (b) If section 5120.50 of the Revised Code does not apply in relation to the offense the prisoner committed while confined in this state and the term of confinement imposed for that offense, the prisoner shall be returned to the out-of-state jurisdiction or its private contractor for completion of the period of time remaining under the out-of-state sentence for which the prisoner was confined in the facility in this state before starting service of the term of confinement imposed for the offense committed while confined in this state, the out-of-state jurisdiction or its private contractor will confine the prisoner for that remaining period of time and will transport the prisoner outside of this state for service of that remaining period of time, and, if the prisoner is confined in this state in a facility operated by the department of rehabilitation and correction, the private contractor will be financially responsible for reimbursing the department at the per diem cost of confinement for the duration of that incarceration, with the amount of the reimbursement so paid to be deposited in the department's prisoner programs fund. (17) A requirement that the private contractor, prior to housing any out-of-state prisoner in the correctional facility under the contract, enter into an agreement with the local public entity that sets forth a conversion plan that will be followed if, for any reason, the facility is closed or ceases to operate. The conversion plan shall include, but is not limited to, provisions that specify whether the private contractor, the local public entity, or the out-of-state jurisdictions that imposed the sentences for which the out-of-state prisoners are confined in the facility will be responsible for housing and transporting the prisoners who are in the facility at the time it is closed or ceases to operate and for the cost of so housing and transporting those prisoners. (18) A schedule of fines that the local public entity shall impose upon the private contractor if the private contractor fails to perform its contractual duties, and a requirement that, if the private contractor fails to perform its contractual duties, the local public entity shall impose a fine on the private contractor from the schedule of fines and, in addition to the fine, may exercise any other rights it has under the contract. Division (F)(2) of this section applies regarding a fine described in this division. (19) A requirement that the private contractor adopt and use in the correctional facility the drug testing and treatment program that the department of rehabilitation and correction uses for inmates in state correctional institutions; (20) A requirement that the private contractor provide clothing for all out-of-state prisoners housed in the correctional facility that is conspicuous in its color, style, or color and style, that conspicuously identifies its wearer as a prisoner, and that is readily distinguishable from clothing of a nature that normally is worn outside the facility by non-prisoners, that the private contractor require all out-of-state prisoners housed in the facility to wear the clothing so provided, and that the private contractor not permit any out-of-state prisoner, while inside or on the premises of the facility or while being transported to or from the facility, to wear any clothing of a nature that does not conspicuously identify its wearer as a prisoner and that normally is worn outside the facility by non-prisoners; (21) A requirement that, at the time the contract is made, the private contractor provide to all parties to the contract adequate proof that it has complied with the requirement described in division (D)(9) of this section, and a requirement that, at any time during the term of the contract, the private contractor upon request provide to any party to the contract adequate proof that it continues to be in compliance with the requirement described in division (D)(9) of this section. (E) A private correctional officer or other designated employee of a private contractor that operates a correctional facility that houses out-of-state prisoners in this state under a contract entered into prior to, on, or after March 17, 1998, may carry and use firearms in the course of the officer's or employee's employment only if the officer or employee is certified as having satisfactorily completed an approved training program designed to qualify persons for positions as special police officers, security guards, or persons otherwise privately employed in a police capacity, as described in division (A) of section 109.78 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) Upon notification by the private contractor of an escape from, or of a disturbance at, a correctional facility that is operated by a private contractor under a contract entered into prior to, on, or after March 17, 1998, and that houses out-of-state prisoners in this state, the department of rehabilitation and correction and state and local law enforcement agencies shall use all reasonable means to recapture persons who escaped from the facility or quell any disturbance at the facility, in accordance with the plan and procedure included in the written agreement entered into under division (D)(12) of this section in relation to contracts entered into on or after March 17, 1998, and in accordance with their normal procedures in relation to contracts entered into prior to March 17, 1998. Any cost incurred by this state or a political subdivision of this state relating to the apprehension of a person who escaped from the facility, to the quelling of a disturbance at the facility, or to the investigation or prosecution as described in division (G)(2) of this section of any offense relating to the escape or disturbance shall be chargeable to and borne by the private contractor. The contractor also shall reimburse the state or its political subdivisions for all reasonable costs incurred relating to the temporary detention of a person who escaped from the facility, following the person's recapture. (2) If a private contractor that, on or after March 17, 1998, enters into a contract under this section with a local public entity for the operation of a correctional facility that houses out-of-state prisoners fails to perform its contractual duties, the local public entity shall impose upon the private contractor a fine from the schedule of fines included in the contract and may exercise any other rights it has under the contract. A fine imposed under this division shall be paid to the local public entity that enters into the contract, and the local public entity shall deposit the money so paid into its treasury to the credit of the fund used to pay for community policing. If a fine is imposed under this division, the local public entity may reduce the payment owed to the private contractor pursuant to any invoice in the amount of the fine. (3) If a private contractor, on or after March 17, 1998, enters into a contract under this section with a local public entity for the operation of a correctional facility that houses out-of-state prisoners in this state, the private contractor shall comply with the insurance, indemnification, hold harmless, and cost reimbursement provisions described in division (D)(9) of this section. (G)(1) Any act or omission that would be a criminal offense or a delinquent act if committed at a state correctional institution or at a jail, workhouse, prison, or other correctional facility operated by this state or by any political subdivision or group of political subdivisions of this state shall be a criminal offense or delinquent act if committed by or with regard to any out-of-state prisoner who is housed at any correctional facility operated by a private contractor in this state pursuant to a contract entered into prior to, on, or after March 17, 1998. (2) If any political subdivision of this state experiences any cost in the investigation or prosecution of an offense committed by an out-of-state prisoner housed in a correctional facility operated by a private contractor in this state pursuant to a contract entered into prior to, on, or after March 17, 1998, the private contractor shall reimburse the political subdivision for the costs so experienced. (3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the state, and any officer or employee, as defined in section 109.36 of the Revised Code, of the state is not liable in damages in a civil action for any injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises from, or is related to, the establishment, management, or operation of a correctional facility to house out-of-state prisoners in this state pursuant to a contract between a local public entity and an out-of-state jurisdiction, a local public entity and a private contractor, or a private contractor and an out-of-state jurisdiction that was entered into prior to March 17, 1998, or that is entered into on or after March 17, 1998, in accordance with its provisions. The immunity provided in this division does not apply regarding an act or omission of an officer or employee, as defined in section 109.36 of the Revised Code, of the state that is manifestly outside the scope of the officer's or employee's official responsibilities or regarding an act or omission of the state, or of an officer or employee, as so defined, of the state that is undertaken with malicious purpose, in bad faith, or in a wanton or reckless manner. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this division, a non-contracting political subdivision, and any employee, as defined in section 2744.01 of the Revised Code, of a non-contracting political subdivision is not liable in damages in a civil action for any injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises from, or is related to, the establishment, management, or operation of a correctional facility to house out-of-state prisoners in this state pursuant to a contract between a local public entity other than the non-contracting political subdivision and an out-of-state jurisdiction, a local public entity other than the non-contracting political subdivision and a private contractor, or a private contractor and an out-of-state jurisdiction that was entered into prior to March 17, 1998, or that is entered into on or after March 17, 1998, in accordance with its provisions. The immunity provided in this division does not apply regarding an act or omission of an employee, as defined in section 2744.01 of the Revised Code, of a non-contracting political subdivision that is manifestly outside the scope of the employee's employment or official responsibilities or regarding an act or omission of a non-contracting political subdivision or an employee, as so defined, of a non-contracting political subdivision that is undertaken with malicious purpose, in bad faith, or in a wanton or reckless manner. (c) Divisions (G)(3)(a) and (b) of this section do not affect any immunity or defense that the state and its officers and employees or a non-contracting political subdivision and its employees may be entitled to under another section of the Revised Code or the common law of this state, including, but not limited to, section 9.86 or Chapter 2744. of the Revised Code. (H)(1) Upon the completion of an out-of-state prisoner's term of detention at a correctional facility operated by a private contractor in this state pursuant to a contract entered into prior to, on, or after March 17, 1998, the operator of the correctional facility shall transport the prisoner to the out-of-state jurisdiction that imposed the sentence for which the prisoner was confined before it releases the prisoner from its custody. (2) No private contractor that operates and manages a correctional facility housing out-of-state prisoners in this state pursuant to a contract entered into prior to, on, or after March 17, 1998, shall fail to comply with division (H)(1) of this section. (3) Whoever violates division (H)(2) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (I) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the provisions of divisions (A) to (H) of this section apply in relation to any correctional facility operated by a private contractor in this state to house out-of-state prisoners, regardless of whether the facility is operated pursuant to a contract entered into prior to, on, or after March 17, 1998. Division (C)(1) of this section shall not apply in relation to any correctional facility for housing out-of-state prisoners in this state that is operated by a private contractor under a contract entered into with a local public entity prior to March 17, 1998. If a private contractor operates a correctional facility in this state for the housing of out-of-state prisoners under a contract entered into with a local public entity prior to March 17, 1998, no later than thirty days after the effective date of this amendment, the private contractor shall enter into a contract with the local public entity that comports to the requirements and criteria of division (D) of this section. Sec. 120.03. (A) The Ohio public defender commission shall appoint the state public defender, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commission. (B) The Ohio public defender commission shall establish rules for the conduct of the offices of the county and joint county public defenders and for the conduct of county appointed counsel systems in the state. These rules shall include, but are not limited to, the following: (1) Standards of indigency and minimum qualifications for legal representation by a public defender or appointed counsel. In establishing standards of indigency and determining who is eligible for legal representation by a public defender or appointed counsel, the commission shall consider an indigent person to be an individual who at the time his the person's need is determined is unable to provide for the payment of an attorney and all other necessary expenses of representation. Release on bail shall not prevent a person from being determined to be indigent. (2) Standards for the hiring of outside counsel; (3) Standards for contracts by a public defender with law schools, legal aid societies, and nonprofit organizations for providing counsel; (4) Standards for the qualifications, training, and size of the legal and supporting staff for a public defender, facilities, and other requirements needed to maintain and operate an office of a public defender; (5) Minimum caseload standards; (6) Procedures for the assessment and collection of the costs of legal representation that is provided by public defenders or appointed counsel; (7) Standards and guidelines for determining whether a client is able to make an up-front contribution toward the cost of his the client's legal representation; (8) Procedures for the collection of up-front contributions from clients who are able to contribute toward the cost of their legal representation, as determined pursuant to the standards and guidelines developed under division (B)(7) of this section. All of such up-front contributions shall be paid into the appropriate county fund. (9) Standards for contracts between a board of county commissioners, a county public defender commission, or a joint county public defender commission and a municipal corporation for the legal representation of indigent persons charged with violations of the ordinances of the municipal corporation. (C) The Ohio public defender commission shall adopt rules prescribing minimum qualifications of counsel appointed pursuant to this chapter or appointed by the courts. Without limiting its general authority to prescribe different qualifications for different categories of appointed counsel, the commission shall prescribe, by rule, special qualifications for counsel and co-counsel appointed in capital cases in which the defendant was sentenced to death before the effective date of this amendment. (D) In administering the office of the Ohio public defender commission: (1) The commission shall do the following: (a) Approve an annual operating budget; (b) Make an annual report to the governor, the general assembly, and the supreme court of Ohio on the operation of the state public defender's office, the county appointed counsel systems, and the county and joint county public defenders' offices. (2) The commission may do the following: (a) Accept the services of volunteer workers and consultants at no compensation other than reimbursement of actual and necessary expenses; (b) Prepare and publish statistical and case studies and other data pertinent to the legal representation of indigent persons; (c) Conduct programs having a general objective of training and educating attorneys and others in the legal representation of indigent persons. (E) There is hereby established in the state treasury the public defender training fund for the deposit of fees received by the Ohio public defender commission from educational seminars, and the sale of publications, on topics concerning criminal law and procedure. Expenditures from this fund shall be made only for the operation of activities authorized by division (D)(2)(c) of this section. (F)(1) In accordance with sections 109.02, 109.07, and 109.361 to 109.366 of the Revised Code, but subject to division (E) of section 120.06 of the Revised Code, the attorney general shall represent or provide for the representation of the Ohio public defender commission, the state public defender, assistant state public defenders, and other employees of the commission or the state public defender. (2) Subject to division (E) of section 120.06 of the Revised Code, the attorney general shall represent or provide for the representation of attorneys described in division (C) of section 120.41 of the Revised Code in malpractice or other civil actions or proceedings that arise from alleged actions or omissions related to responsibilities derived pursuant to this chapter, or in civil actions that are based upon alleged violations of the constitution or statutes of the United States, including section 1983 of Title 42 of the United States Code, 93 Stat. 1284 (1979), 42 U.S.C.A. 1983, as amended, and that arise from alleged actions or omissions related to responsibilities derived pursuant to this chapter. For purposes of the representation, sections 109.361 to 109.366 of the Revised Code shall apply to an attorney described in division (C) of section 120.41 of the Revised Code as if he the attorney were an officer or employee, as defined in section 109.36 of the Revised Code, and the Ohio public defender commission or the state public defender, whichever contracted with the attorney, shall be considered his the attorney's employer. Sec. 120.041. (A) In addition to the state public defender's other duties under this chapter and other Revised Code provisions, the state public defender shall do all of the following for each state fiscal year: (1) Determine the total dollar amount of all requests for reimbursements that were submitted for that fiscal year by counties under sections 120.18, 120.28, 120.33, 120.35, and 2941.51 of the Revised Code; (2) Determine the total dollar amount paid to all counties as reimbursements under the requests described in division (A)(1) of this section that were submitted for that fiscal year; (3) Determine the percentage of total costs submitted by counties under the requests described in division (A)(1) of this section that was paid to all counties as reimbursements for that fiscal year; (4) Commencing in state fiscal year 2021, determine the increase or decrease in the total dollar amount found under division (A)(2) of this section for that fiscal year from the total dollar amount found under that division for the previous fiscal year; (5) Determine, out of the total dollar amount found under division (A)(2) of this section that was paid to all counties as a reimbursement, the total amount of that money used by all of the counties for each of the following categories of costs in that fiscal year: (a) Costs for appointed counsel; (b) Costs for personnel; (c) Costs for expert witnesses; (d) Costs for investigations; (e) Costs for transcripts; (f) Costs for rent or lease, utilities, furnishings, maintenance, and equipment; (g) Costs for travel; (h) Any other category of costs set by the state public defender. (6) Commencing in state fiscal year 2021, determine the increase or decrease in the amount of money found under division (A)(5) of this section to have been used for each category of costs described in divisions (A)(5)(a) to (h) of this section for that fiscal year from the amount of money found under that division to have been used for each such category of costs for the previous fiscal year; (7) Analyze the cost per each felony, misdemeanor, traffic, or juvenile delinquency case assigned to a public defender or counsel pursuant to section 120.06, 120.16, 120.26, or 120.33 of the Revised Code. (B) For each state fiscal year, the state public defender shall prepare a report that includes all of its findings and determinations for that fiscal year and, not later than the first day of October in the state fiscal year following the fiscal year covered by the report, shall submit copies of the report to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the minority leader of the senate, the minority leader of the house of representatives, and the governor. Sec. 120.06. (A)(1) The state public defender, when designated by the court or requested by a county public defender or joint county public defender, may provide legal representation in all courts throughout the state to indigent adults and juveniles who are charged with the commission of an offense or act for which the penalty or any possible adjudication includes the potential loss of liberty. (2) The state public defender may provide legal representation to any indigent person who, while incarcerated in any state correctional institution, is charged with a felony offense, for which the penalty or any possible adjudication that may be imposed by a court upon conviction includes the potential loss of liberty. (3) The state public defender may provide legal representation to any person incarcerated in any correctional institution of the state, in any matter in which the person asserts the person is unlawfully imprisoned or detained. (4) The state public defender, in any case in which the state public defender has provided legal representation or is requested to do so by a county public defender or joint county public defender, may provide legal representation on appeal. (5) The state public defender, when designated by the court or requested by a county public defender, joint county public defender, or the director of rehabilitation and correction, shall provide legal representation in parole and probation revocation matters or matters relating to the revocation of community control or post-release control under a community control sanction or post-release control sanction, unless the state public defender finds that the alleged parole or probation violator or alleged violator of a community control sanction or post-release control sanction has the financial capacity to retain the alleged violator's own counsel. (6) If the state public defender contracts with a county public defender commission, a joint county public defender commission, or a board of county commissioners for the provision of services, under authority of division (C)(7) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code, the state public defender shall provide legal representation in accordance with the contract. (B) The state public defender shall not be required to prosecute any appeal, postconviction remedy, or other proceeding pursuant to division (A)(3), (4), or (5) of this section, unless the state public defender first is satisfied that there is arguable merit to the proceeding. (C) A court may appoint counsel or allow an indigent person to select the indigent's own personal counsel to assist the state public defender as co-counsel when the interests of justice so require. When co-counsel is appointed to assist the state public defender, the co-counsel shall receive any compensation that the court may approve, not to exceed the amounts provided for in section 2941.51 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) When the state public defender is designated by the court or requested by a county public defender or joint county public defender to provide legal representation for an indigent person in any case, other than pursuant to a contract entered into under authority of division (C)(7) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code, the state public defender shall send to the county in which the case is filed a bill detailing the actual cost of the representation that separately itemizes legal fees and expenses. The county, upon receipt of an itemized bill from the state public defender pursuant to this division, shall pay the state public defender one hundred per cent of the amount identified as legal fees and expenses in the itemized bill. (2) Upon payment of the itemized bill under division (D)(1) of this section, the county may submit the cost of the legal fees and expenses to the state public defender for reimbursement pursuant to section 120.33 of the Revised Code. (3) When the state public defender provides investigation or mitigation services to private appointed counsel or to a county or joint county public defender as approved by the appointing court, other than pursuant to a contract entered into under authority of division (C)(7) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code, the state public defender shall send to the county in which the case is filed a bill itemizing the actual cost of the services provided. The county, upon receipt of an itemized bill from the state public defender pursuant to this division, shall pay one hundred per cent of the amount as set forth in the itemized bill. Upon payment of the itemized bill received pursuant to this division, the county may submit the cost of the investigation and mitigation services to the state public defender for reimbursement pursuant to section 120.33 of the Revised Code. (4) There is hereby created in the state treasury the county representation fund for the deposit of moneys received from counties under this division. All moneys credited to the fund shall be used by the state public defender to provide legal representation for indigent persons when designated by the court or requested by a county or joint county public defender or to provide investigation or mitigation services, including investigation or mitigation services to private appointed counsel or a county or joint county public defender, as approved by the court. (E)(1) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of sections 109.02, 109.07, 109.361 to 109.366, and 120.03 of the Revised Code that pertains to representation by the attorney general, an assistant attorney general, or special counsel of an officer or employee, as defined in section 109.36 of the Revised Code, or of an entity of state government, the state public defender may elect to contract with, and to have the state pay pursuant to division (E)(2) of this section for the services of, private legal counsel to represent the Ohio public defender commission, the state public defender, assistant state public defenders, other employees of the commission or the state public defender, and attorneys described in division (C) of section 120.41 of the Revised Code in a malpractice or other civil action or proceeding that arises from alleged actions or omissions related to responsibilities derived pursuant to this chapter, or in a civil action that is based upon alleged violations of the constitution or statutes of the United States, including section 1983 of Title 42 of the United States Code, 93 Stat. 1284 (1979), 42 U.S.C.A. 1983, as amended, and that arises from alleged actions or omissions related to responsibilities derived pursuant to this chapter, if the state public defender determines, in good faith, that the defendant in the civil action or proceeding did not act manifestly outside the scope of the defendant's employment or official responsibilities, with malicious purpose, in bad faith, or in a wanton or reckless manner. If the state public defender elects not to contract pursuant to this division for private legal counsel in a civil action or proceeding, then, in accordance with sections 109.02, 109.07, 109.361 to 109.366, and 120.03 of the Revised Code, the attorney general shall represent or provide for the representation of the Ohio public defender commission, the state public defender, assistant state public defenders, other employees of the commission or the state public defender, or attorneys described in division (C) of section 120.41 of the Revised Code in the civil action or proceeding. (2)(a) Subject to division (E)(2)(b) of this section, payment from the state treasury for the services of private legal counsel with whom the state public defender has contracted pursuant to division (E)(1) of this section shall be accomplished only through the following procedure: (i) The private legal counsel shall file with the attorney general a copy of the contract; a request for an award of legal fees, court costs, and expenses earned or incurred in connection with the defense of the Ohio public defender commission, the state public defender, an assistant state public defender, an employee, or an attorney in a specified civil action or proceeding; a written itemization of those fees, costs, and expenses, including the signature of the state public defender and the state public defender's attestation that the fees, costs, and expenses were earned or incurred pursuant to division (E)(1) of this section to the best of the state public defender's knowledge and information; a written statement whether the fees, costs, and expenses are for all legal services to be rendered in connection with that defense, are only for legal services rendered to the date of the request and additional legal services likely will have to be provided in connection with that defense, or are for the final legal services rendered in connection with that defense; a written statement indicating whether the private legal counsel previously submitted a request for an award under division (E)(2) of this section in connection with that defense and, if so, the date and the amount of each award granted; and, if the fees, costs, and expenses are for all legal services to be rendered in connection with that defense or are for the final legal services rendered in connection with that defense, a certified copy of any judgment entry in the civil action or proceeding or a signed copy of any settlement agreement entered into between the parties to the civil action or proceeding. (ii) Upon receipt of a request for an award of legal fees, court costs, and expenses and the requisite supportive documentation described in division (E)(2)(a)(i) of this section, the attorney general shall review the request and documentation; determine whether any of the limitations specified in division (E)(2)(b) of this section apply to the request; and, if an award of legal fees, court costs, or expenses is permissible after applying the limitations, prepare a document awarding legal fees, court costs, or expenses to the private legal counsel. The document shall name the private legal counsel as the recipient of the award; specify the total amount of the award as determined by the attorney general; itemize the portions of the award that represent legal fees, court costs, and expenses; specify any limitation applied pursuant to division (E)(2)(b) of this section to reduce the amount of the award sought by the private legal counsel; state that the award is payable from the state treasury pursuant to division (E)(2)(a)(iii) of this section; and be approved by the inclusion of the signatures of the attorney general, the state public defender, and the private legal counsel. (iii) The attorney general shall forward a copy of the document prepared pursuant to division (E)(2)(a)(ii) of this section to the director of budget and management. The award of legal fees, court costs, or expenses shall be paid out of the state public defender's appropriations, to the extent there is a sufficient available balance in those appropriations. If the state public defender does not have a sufficient available balance in the state public defender's appropriations to pay the entire award of legal fees, court costs, or expenses, the director shall make application for a transfer of appropriations out of the emergency purposes account or any other appropriation for emergencies or contingencies in an amount equal to the portion of the award that exceeds the sufficient available balance in the state public defender's appropriations. A transfer of appropriations out of the emergency purposes account or any other appropriation for emergencies or contingencies shall be authorized if there are sufficient moneys greater than the sum total of then pending emergency purposes account requests, or requests for releases from the other appropriation. If a transfer of appropriations out of the emergency purposes account or other appropriation for emergencies or contingencies is made to pay an amount equal to the portion of the award that exceeds the sufficient available balance in the state public defender's appropriations, the director shall cause the payment to be made to the private legal counsel. If sufficient moneys do not exist in the emergency purposes account or other appropriation for emergencies or contingencies to pay an amount equal to the portion of the award that exceeds the sufficient available balance in the state public defender's appropriations, the private legal counsel shall request the general assembly to make an appropriation sufficient to pay an amount equal to the portion of the award that exceeds the sufficient available balance in the state public defender's appropriations, and no payment in that amount shall be made until the appropriation has been made. The private legal counsel shall make the request during the current biennium and during each succeeding biennium until a sufficient appropriation is made. (b) An award of legal fees, court costs, and expenses pursuant to division (E) of this section is subject to the following limitations: (i) The maximum award or maximum aggregate of a series of awards of legal fees, court costs, and expenses to the private legal counsel in connection with the defense of the Ohio public defender commission, the state public defender, an assistant state public defender, an employee, or an attorney in a specified civil action or proceeding shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars. (ii) The private legal counsel shall not be awarded legal fees, court costs, or expenses to the extent the fees, costs, or expenses are covered by a policy of malpractice or other insurance. (iii) The private legal counsel shall be awarded legal fees and expenses only to the extent that the fees and expenses are reasonable in light of the legal services rendered by the private legal counsel in connection with the defense of the Ohio public defender commission, the state public defender, an assistant state public defender, an employee, or an attorney in a specified civil action or proceeding. (c) If, pursuant to division (E)(2)(a) of this section, the attorney general denies a request for an award of legal fees, court costs, or expenses to private legal counsel because of the application of a limitation specified in division (E)(2)(b) of this section, the attorney general shall notify the private legal counsel in writing of the denial and of the limitation applied. (d) If, pursuant to division (E)(2)(c) of this section, a private legal counsel receives a denial of an award notification or if a private legal counsel refuses to approve a document under division (E)(2)(a)(ii) of this section because of the proposed application of a limitation specified in division (E)(2)(b) of this section, the private legal counsel may commence a civil action against the attorney general in the court of claims to prove the private legal counsel's entitlement to the award sought, to prove that division (E)(2)(b) of this section does not prohibit or otherwise limit the award sought, and to recover a judgment for the amount of the award sought. A civil action under division (E)(2)(d) of this section shall be commenced no later than two years after receipt of a denial of award notification or, if the private legal counsel refused to approve a document under division (E)(2)(a)(ii) of this section because of the proposed application of a limitation specified in division (E)(2)(b) of this section, no later than two years after the refusal. Any judgment of the court of claims in favor of the private legal counsel shall be paid from the state treasury in accordance with division (E)(2)(a) of this section. (F) If a court appoints the office of the state public defender to represent a petitioner in a postconviction relief proceeding under section 2953.21 of the Revised Code, the petitioner has received a sentence of death, and the proceeding relates to that sentence, all of the attorneys who represent the petitioner in the proceeding pursuant to the appointment, whether an assistant state public defender, the state public defender, or another attorney, shall be certified under Rule 20 of the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio to represent indigent defendants charged with or convicted of an offense for which the death penalty can be or has been imposed. (G)(1) (F)(1) The state public defender may conduct a legal assistance referral service for children committed to the department of youth services relative to conditions of confinement claims. If the legal assistance referral service receives a request for assistance from a child confined in a facility operated, or contracted for, by the department of youth services and the state public defender determines that the child has a conditions of confinement claim that has merit, the state public defender may refer the child to a private attorney. If no private attorney who the child has been referred to by the state public defender accepts the case within a reasonable time, the state public defender may prepare, as appropriate, pro se pleadings in the form of a complaint regarding the conditions of confinement at the facility where the child is confined with a motion for appointment of counsel and other applicable pleadings necessary for sufficient pro se representation. (2) Division (G)(1) (F)(1) of this section does not authorize the state public defender to represent a child committed to the department of youth services in general civil matters arising solely out of state law. (3) The state public defender shall not undertake the representation of a child in court based on a conditions of confinement claim arising under this division. (H) (G) A child's right to representation or services under this section is not affected by the child, or another person on behalf of the child, previously having paid for similar representation or services or having waived legal representation. (I) (H) The state public defender shall have reasonable access to any child committed to the department of youth services, department of youth services institution, and department of youth services record as needed to implement this section. (J) (I) As used in this section: (1) "Community control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Conditions of confinement" means any issue involving a constitutional right or other civil right related to a child's incarceration, including, but not limited to, actions cognizable under 42 U.S.C. 1983. (3) "Post-release control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 120.14. (A)(1) Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, the county public defender commission shall appoint the county public defender and may remove him the county public defender from office only for good cause. (2) If a county public defender commission contracts with the state public defender or with one or more nonprofit organizations for the state public defender or the organizations to provide all of the services that the county public defender is required or permitted to provide by this chapter, the commission shall not appoint a county public defender. (B) The commission shall determine the qualifications and size of the supporting staff and facilities and other requirements needed to maintain and operate the office of the county public defender. (C) In administering the office of county public defender, the commission shall: (1) Recommend to the county commissioners an annual operating budget which is subject to the review, amendment, and approval of the board of county commissioners; (2)(a) Make an annual report to the county commissioners and the Ohio public defender commission on the operation of the county public defender's office, including complete and detailed information on finances and costs that separately states costs and expenses that are reimbursable under section 120.35 of the Revised Code, and any other data and information requested by the state public defender; (b) Make monthly reports relating to reimbursement and associated case data pursuant to the rules of the Ohio public defender commission to the board of county commissioners and the Ohio public defender commission on the total costs of the public defender's office. (3) Cooperate with the Ohio public defender commission in maintaining the standards established by rules of the Ohio public defender commission pursuant to divisions (B) and (C) of section 120.03 of the Revised Code, and cooperate with the state public defender in his the state public defender's programs providing technical aid and assistance to county systems. (D) The commission may accept the services of volunteer workers and consultants at no compensation except reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses. (E) The commission may contract with any municipal corporation, within the county served by the county public defender, for the county public defender to provide legal representation for indigent persons who are charged with a violation of the ordinances of the municipal corporation. (F) A county public defender commission, with the approval of the board of county commissioners regarding all provisions that pertain to the financing of defense counsel for indigent persons, may contract with the state public defender or with any nonprofit organization, the primary purpose of which is to provide legal representation to indigent persons, for the state public defender or the organization to provide all or any part of the services that a county public defender is required or permitted to provide by this chapter. A contract entered into pursuant to this division may provide for payment for the services provided on a per case, hourly, or fixed contract basis. The state public defender and any nonprofit organization that contracts with a county public defender commission pursuant to this division shall do all of the following: (1) Comply with all standards established by the rules of the Ohio public defender commission; (2) Comply with all standards established by the state public defender; (3) Comply with all statutory duties and other laws applicable to county public defenders. Sec. 120.16. (A)(1) The county public defender shall provide legal representation to indigent adults and juveniles who are charged with the commission of an offense or act that is a violation of a state statute and for which the penalty or any possible adjudication includes the potential loss of liberty and in postconviction proceedings as defined in this section. (2) The county public defender may provide legal representation to indigent adults and juveniles charged with the violation of an ordinance of a municipal corporation for which the penalty or any possible adjudication includes the potential loss of liberty, if the county public defender commission has contracted with the municipal corporation to provide legal representation for indigent persons charged with a violation of an ordinance of the municipal corporation. (B) The county public defender shall provide the legal representation authorized by division (A) of this section at every stage of the proceedings following arrest, detention, service of summons, or indictment. (C) The county public defender may request the state public defender to prosecute any appeal or other remedy before or after conviction that the county public defender decides is in the interests of justice, and may provide legal representation in parole and probation revocation matters and matters relating to the revocation of community control or post-release control under a community control sanction or post-release control sanction. (D) The county public defender shall not be required to prosecute any appeal, postconviction remedy, or other proceeding, unless the county public defender is first satisfied there is arguable merit to the proceeding. (E) Nothing in this section shall prevent a court from appointing counsel other than the county public defender or from allowing an indigent person to select the indigent person's own personal counsel to represent the indigent person. A court may also appoint counsel or allow an indigent person to select the indigent person's own personal counsel to assist the county public defender as co-counsel when the interests of justice so require. (F) Information as to the right to legal representation by the county public defender or assigned counsel shall be afforded to an accused person immediately upon arrest, when brought before a magistrate, or when formally charged, whichever occurs first. (G) If a court appoints the office of the county public defender to represent a petitioner in a postconviction relief proceeding under section 2953.21 of the Revised Code, the petitioner has received a sentence of death, and the proceeding relates to that sentence, all of the attorneys who represent the petitioner in the proceeding pursuant to the appointment, whether an assistant county public defender or the county public defender, shall be certified under Rule 20 of the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio to represent indigent defendants charged with or convicted of an offense for which the death penalty can be or has been imposed. (H) As used in this section: (1) "Community control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Post-release control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 120.18. (A) The county public defender commission's report to the board of county commissioners shall be audited by the county auditor. The board of county commissioners, after review and approval of the audited report, may then certify it to the state public defender for reimbursement. If a request for the reimbursement of any operating expenditure incurred by a county public defender office is not received by the state public defender within sixty days after the end of the calendar month in which the expenditure is incurred, the state public defender shall not pay the requested reimbursement, unless the county has requested, and the state public defender has granted, an extension of the sixty-day time limit. Each request for reimbursement shall include a certification by the county public defender that the persons provided representation by the county public defender's office during the period covered by the report were indigent and, for each person provided representation during that period, a financial disclosure form completed by the person on a form prescribed by the state public defender. The state public defender shall also review the report and, in accordance with the standards, guidelines, and maximums established pursuant to divisions (B)(7) and (8) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code and the payment determination provisions of section 120.34 of the Revised Code, prepare a voucher for the cost of each county public defender's office for the period of time covered by the certified report and a voucher for the costs and expenses that are reimbursable under section 120.35 of the Revised Code, if any. The amount of payments to be included in and made under the voucher shall be determined as specified in section 120.34 of the Revised Code. For the purposes of this section, "cost" means total expenses minus costs and expenses reimbursable under section 120.35 of the Revised Code and any funds received by the county public defender commission pursuant to a contract, except a contract entered into with a municipal corporation pursuant to division (E) of section 120.14 of the Revised Code, gift, or grant. (B) If the county public defender fails to maintain the standards for the conduct of the office established by rules of the Ohio public defender commission pursuant to divisions (B) and (C) of section 120.03 or the standards established by the state public defender pursuant to division (B)(7) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code, the Ohio public defender commission shall notify the county public defender commission and the board of county commissioners of the county that the county public defender has failed to comply with its rules or the standards of the state public defender. Unless the county public defender commission or the county public defender corrects the conduct of the county public defender's office to comply with the rules and standards within ninety days after the date of the notice, the state public defender may deny payment of all or part of the county's reimbursement from the state provided for in division (A) of this section. Sec. 120.24. (A)(1) Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, the joint county public defender commission shall appoint the joint county public defender and may remove him the joint county public defender from office only for good cause. (2) If a joint county public defender commission contracts with the state public defender or with one or more nonprofit organizations for the state public defender or the organizations to provide all of the services that the joint county public defender is required or permitted to provide by this chapter, the commission shall not appoint a joint county public defender. (B) The commission shall determine the qualifications and size of the supporting staff and facilities and other requirements needed to maintain and operate the office. (C) In administering the office of joint county public defender, the commission shall: (1) Recommend to the boards of county commissioners in the district an annual operating budget which is subject to the review, amendment, and approval of the boards of county commissioners in the district; (2)(a) Make an annual report to the boards of county commissioners in the district and the Ohio public defender commission on the operation of the public defender's office, including complete and detailed information on finances and costs that separately states costs and expenses that are reimbursable under section 120.35 of the Revised Code, and such other data and information requested by the state public defender; (b) Make monthly reports relating to reimbursement and associated case data pursuant to the rules of the Ohio public defender commission to the boards of county commissioners in the district and the Ohio public defender commission on the total costs of the public defender's office. (3) Cooperate with the Ohio public defender commission in maintaining the standards established by rules of the Ohio public defender commission pursuant to divisions (B) and (C) of section 120.03 of the Revised Code, and cooperate with the state public defender in his the state public defender's programs providing technical aid and assistance to county systems. (D) The commission may accept the services of volunteer workers and consultants at no compensation except reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses. (E) The commission may contract with any municipal corporation, within the counties served by the joint county public defender, for the joint county public defender to provide legal representation for indigent persons who are charged with a violation of the ordinances of the municipal corporation. (F) A joint county public defender commission, with the approval of each participating board of county commissioners regarding all provisions that pertain to the financing of defense counsel for indigent persons, may contract with the state public defender or with any nonprofit organization, the primary purpose of which is to provide legal representation to indigent persons, for the state public defender or the organization to provide all or any part of the services that a joint county public defender is required or permitted to provide by this chapter. A contract entered into pursuant to this division may provide for payment for the services provided on a per case, hourly, or fixed contract basis. The state public defender and any nonprofit organization that contracts with a joint county public defender commission pursuant to this division shall do all of the following: (1) Comply with all standards established by the rules of the Ohio public defender commission; (2) Comply with all standards established by the Ohio public defender; (3) Comply with all statutory duties and other laws applicable to joint county public defenders. Sec. 120.26. (A)(1) The joint county public defender shall provide legal representation to indigent adults and juveniles who are charged with the commission of an offense or act that is a violation of a state statute and for which the penalty or any possible adjudication includes the potential loss of liberty and in postconviction proceedings as defined in this section. (2) The joint county public defender may provide legal representation to indigent adults and juveniles charged with the violation of an ordinance of a municipal corporation for which the penalty or any possible adjudication includes the potential loss of liberty, if the joint county public defender commission has contracted with the municipal corporation to provide legal representation for indigent persons charged with a violation of an ordinance of the municipal corporation. (B) The joint county public defender shall provide the legal representation authorized by division (A) of this section at every stage of the proceedings following arrest, detention, service of summons, or indictment. (C) The joint county public defender may request the Ohio public defender to prosecute any appeal or other remedy before or after conviction that the joint county public defender decides is in the interests of justice and may provide legal representation in parole and probation revocation matters and matters relating to the revocation of community control or post-release control under a community control sanction or post-release control sanction. (D) The joint county public defender shall not be required to prosecute any appeal, postconviction remedy, or other proceeding, unless the joint county public defender is first satisfied that there is arguable merit to the proceeding. (E) Nothing in this section shall prevent a court from appointing counsel other than the joint county public defender or from allowing an indigent person to select the indigent person's own personal counsel to represent the indigent person. A court may also appoint counsel or allow an indigent person to select the indigent person's own personal counsel to assist the joint county public defender as co-counsel when the interests of justice so require. (F) Information as to the right to legal representation by the joint county public defender or assigned counsel shall be afforded to an accused person immediately upon arrest, when brought before a magistrate, or when formally charged, whichever occurs first. (G) If a court appoints the office of the joint county public defender to represent a petitioner in a postconviction relief proceeding under section 2953.21 of the Revised Code, the petitioner has received a sentence of death, and the proceeding relates to that sentence, all of the attorneys who represent the petitioner in the proceeding pursuant to the appointment, whether an assistant joint county defender or the joint county public defender, shall be certified under Rule 20 of the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio to represent indigent defendants charged with or convicted of an offense for which the death penalty can be or has been imposed. (H) As used in this section: (1) "Community control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Post-release control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 120.28. (A) The joint county public defender commission's report to the joint board of county commissioners shall be audited by the fiscal officer of the district. The joint board of county commissioners, after review and approval of the audited report, may then certify it to the state public defender for reimbursement. If a request for the reimbursement of any operating expenditure incurred by a joint county public defender office is not received by the state public defender within sixty days after the end of the calendar month in which the expenditure is incurred, the state public defender shall not pay the requested reimbursement, unless the joint board of county commissioners has requested, and the state public defender has granted, an extension of the sixty-day time limit. Each request for reimbursement shall include a certification by the joint county public defender that all persons provided representation by the joint county public defender's office during the period covered by the request were indigent and, for each person provided representation during that period, a financial disclosure form completed by the person on a form prescribed by the state public defender. The state public defender shall also review the report and, in accordance with the standards, guidelines, and maximums established pursuant to divisions (B)(7) and (8) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code and the payment determination provisions of section 120.34 of the Revised Code, prepare a voucher for the cost of each joint county public defender's office for the period of time covered by the certified report and a voucher for the costs and expenses that are reimbursable under section 120.35 of the Revised Code, if any. The amount of payments to be included in and made under the voucher shall be determined as specified in section 120.34 of the Revised Code. For purposes of this section, "cost" means total expenses minus costs and expenses reimbursable under section 120.35 of the Revised Code and any funds received by the joint county public defender commission pursuant to a contract, except a contract entered into with a municipal corporation pursuant to division (E) of section 120.24 of the Revised Code, gift, or grant. Each county in the district shall be entitled to a share of such state reimbursement in proportion to the percentage of the cost it has agreed to pay. (B) If the joint county public defender fails to maintain the standards for the conduct of the office established by the rules of the Ohio public defender commission pursuant to divisions (B) and (C) of section 120.03 or the standards established by the state public defender pursuant to division (B)(7) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code, the Ohio public defender commission shall notify the joint county public defender commission and the board of county commissioners of each county in the district that the joint county public defender has failed to comply with its rules or the standards of the state public defender. Unless the joint public defender commission or the joint county public defender corrects the conduct of the joint county public defender's office to comply with the rules and standards within ninety days after the date of the notice, the state public defender may deny all or part of the counties' reimbursement from the state provided for in division (A) of this section. Sec. 120.33. (A) In lieu of using a county public defender or joint county public defender to represent indigent persons in the proceedings set forth in division (A) of section 120.16 of the Revised Code, the board of county commissioners of any county may adopt a resolution to pay counsel who are either personally selected by the indigent person or appointed by the court. The resolution shall include those provisions the board of county commissioners considers necessary to provide effective representation of indigent persons in any proceeding for which counsel is provided under this section. The resolution shall include provisions for contracts with any municipal corporation under which the municipal corporation shall reimburse the county for counsel appointed to represent indigent persons charged with violations of the ordinances of the municipal corporation. (1) In a county that adopts a resolution to pay counsel, an indigent person shall have the right to do either of the following: (a) To select the person's own personal counsel to represent the person in any proceeding included within the provisions of the resolution; (b) To request the court to appoint counsel to represent the person in such a proceeding. (2) The court having jurisdiction over the proceeding in a county that adopts a resolution to pay counsel shall, after determining that the person is indigent and entitled to legal representation under this section, do either of the following: (a) By signed journal entry recorded on its docket, enter the name of the lawyer selected by the indigent person as counsel of record; (b) Appoint counsel for the indigent person if the person has requested the court to appoint counsel and, by signed journal entry recorded on its dockets, enter the name of the lawyer appointed for the indigent person as counsel of record. (3) The board of county commissioners shall establish a schedule of fees by case or on an hourly basis to be paid to counsel for legal services provided pursuant to a resolution adopted under this section. Prior to establishing the schedule, the board of county commissioners shall request the bar association or associations of the county to submit a proposed schedule for cases other than capital cases. The schedule submitted shall be subject to the review, amendment, and approval of the board of county commissioners, except with respect to capital cases. With respect to capital cases, the schedule shall provide for fees by case or on an hourly basis to be paid to counsel in the amount or at the rate set by the capital case attorney fee council pursuant to division (D) of this section, and the board of county commissioners shall approve that amount or rate. (4) Counsel selected by the indigent person or appointed by the court at the request of an indigent person in a county that adopts a resolution to pay counsel, except for counsel appointed to represent a person charged with any violation of an ordinance of a municipal corporation that has not contracted with the county commissioners for the payment of appointed counsel, shall be paid by the county and shall receive the compensation and expenses the court approves. With respect to capital cases, the court shall approve compensation and expenses in accordance with the amount or at the rate set by the capital case attorney fee council pursuant to division (D) of this section. Each request for payment shall include a financial disclosure form completed by the indigent person on a form prescribed by the state public defender. Compensation and expenses shall not exceed the amounts fixed by the board of county commissioners in the schedule adopted pursuant to division (A)(3) of this section. No court shall approve compensation and expenses that exceed the amount fixed pursuant to division (A)(3) of this section. The fees and expenses approved by the court shall not be taxed as part of the costs and shall be paid by the county. However, if the person represented has, or may reasonably be expected to have, the means to meet some part of the cost of the services rendered to the person, the person shall pay the county an amount that the person reasonably can be expected to pay. Pursuant to section 120.04 of the Revised Code, the county shall pay to the state public defender a percentage of the payment received from the person in an amount proportionate to the percentage of the costs of the person's case that were paid to the county by the state public defender pursuant to this section. The money paid to the state public defender shall be credited to the client payment fund created pursuant to division (B)(5) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code. The county auditor shall draw a warrant on the county treasurer for the payment of counsel in the amount fixed by the court, plus the expenses the court fixes and certifies to the auditor. The county auditor shall report periodically, but not less than annually, to the board of county commissioners and to the state public defender the amounts paid out pursuant to the approval of the court. The board of county commissioners, after review and approval of the auditor's report, or the county auditor, with permission from and notice to the board of county commissioners, may then certify it to the state public defender for reimbursement. The state public defender may pay a requested reimbursement only if the request for reimbursement includes a financial disclosure form completed by the indigent person on a form prescribed by the state public defender or if the court certifies by electronic signature as prescribed by the state public defender that a financial disclosure form has been completed by the indigent person and is available for inspection. If a request for the reimbursement of the cost of counsel in any case is not received by the state public defender within ninety days after the end of the calendar month in which the case is finally disposed of by the court, unless the county has requested and the state public defender has granted an extension of the ninety-day limit, the state public defender shall not pay the requested reimbursement. The state public defender shall also review the report and, in accordance with the standards, guidelines, and maximums established pursuant to divisions (B)(7) and (8) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code and the payment determination provisions of section 120.34 of the Revised Code, prepare a voucher for the cost of each county appointed counsel system in the period of time covered by the certified report and a voucher for the costs and expenses that are reimbursable under section 120.35 of the Revised Code, if any. The amount of payments to be included in and made under the voucher shall be determined as specified in section 120.34 of the Revised Code. (5) If any county appointed counsel system fails to maintain the standards for the conduct of the system established by the rules of the Ohio public defender commission pursuant to divisions (B) and (C) of section 120.03 or the standards established by the state public defender pursuant to division (B)(7) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code, the Ohio public defender commission shall notify the board of county commissioners of the county that the county appointed counsel system has failed to comply with its rules or the standards of the state public defender. Unless the board of county commissioners corrects the conduct of its appointed counsel system to comply with the rules and standards within ninety days after the date of the notice, the state public defender may deny all or part of the county's reimbursement from the state provided for in division (A)(4) of this section. (B) In lieu of using a county public defender or joint county public defender to represent indigent persons in the proceedings set forth in division (A) of section 120.16 of the Revised Code, and in lieu of adopting the resolution and following the procedure described in division (A) of this section, the board of county commissioners of any county may contract with the state public defender for the state public defender's legal representation of indigent persons. A contract entered into pursuant to this division may provide for payment for the services provided on a per case, hourly, or fixed contract basis. (C) If a court appoints an attorney pursuant to this section to represent a petitioner in a postconviction relief proceeding under section 2953.21 of the Revised Code, the petitioner has received a sentence of death, and the proceeding relates to that sentence, the attorney who represents the petitioner in the proceeding pursuant to the appointment shall be certified under Rule 20 of the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio to represent indigent defendants charged with or convicted of an offense for which the death penalty can be or has been imposed. (D)(1) There is hereby created the capital case attorney fee council, appointed as described in division (D)(2) of this section. The council shall set an amount by case, or a rate on an hourly basis, to be paid under this section to counsel in a capital case. (2) The capital case attorney fee council shall consist of five members, all of whom shall be active judges serving on one of the district courts of appeals in this state. Terms for council members shall be the lesser of three years or until the member ceases to be an active judge of a district court of appeals. The initial terms shall commence ninety days after September 28, 2016. The chief justice of the supreme court shall appoint the members of the council, and shall make all of the appointments not later than sixty days after September 28, 2016. When any vacancy occurs, the chief justice shall appoint an active judge of a district court of appeals in this state to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term, in the same manner as prescribed in this division. The chief justice shall designate a chairperson from the appointed members of the council. Members of the council shall receive no additional compensation for their service as a member, but may be reimbursed for expenses reasonably incurred in service to the council, to be paid by the supreme court. The supreme court may provide administrative support to the council. (3) The capital case attorney fee council initially shall meet not later than one hundred twenty days after September 28, 2016. Thereafter, the council shall meet not less than annually. (4) Upon setting the amount or rate described in division (D)(1) of this section, the chairperson of the capital case attorney fee council promptly shall provide written notice to the state public defender of the amount or rate so set. The amount or rate so set shall become effective ninety days after the date on which the chairperson provides that written notice to the state public defender. The council shall specify that effective date in the written notice provided to the state public defender. All amounts or rates set by the council shall be final, subject to modification as described in division (D)(5) of this section, and not subject to appeal. (5) The capital case attorney fee council may modify an amount or rate set as described in division (D)(4) of this section. The provisions of that division apply with respect to any such modification of an amount or rate. Sec. 120.34. (A) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, the total amount of money paid to all counties in any fiscal year pursuant to sections 120.18, 120.28, 120.33, 120.35, and 2941.51 of the Revised Code for the reimbursement of the counties' cost of operating county public defender offices, joint county public defender offices, and county appointed counsel systems, the counties' costs and expenses of conducting the defense in capital cases, and the counties' costs and expenses of appointed counsel covered by section 2941.51 of the Revised Code shall not exceed the total amount appropriated for that fiscal year by the general assembly for the reimbursement of the counties for the operation of the offices and systems and for those appointed counsel costs and expenses, and shall be determined as specified in this section. If the amount appropriated by the general assembly in any fiscal year is insufficient to pay the cost in the fiscal year of all county public defender offices, all joint county public defender offices, all county appointed counsel systems, and all costs and expenses of appointed counsel covered by section 2941.51 of the Revised Code, the amount of money paid in that fiscal year pursuant to sections 120.18, 120.28, 120.33, 120.35, and 2941.51 of the Revised Code to each county for the fiscal year shall be reduced proportionately so that each county is paid an equal percentage of its cost in the fiscal year for operating its county public defender system, its joint county public defender system, and its county appointed counsel system, an equal percentage of its costs and expenses of conducting the defense in capital cases in the fiscal year, and an equal percentage of its costs and expenses of appointed counsel covered by section 2941.51 of the Revised Code. (B) If any county receives an amount of money pursuant to section 120.18, 120.28, 120.33, 120.35, or 2941.51 of the Revised Code that is in excess of the amount of reimbursement it is entitled to receive pursuant to this section, the state public defender shall request the board of county commissioners to return the excess payment and the board of county commissioners, upon receipt of the request, shall direct the appropriate county officer to return the excess payment to the state. (C) Within thirty days of the end of each fiscal quarter, the state public defender shall provide to the office of budget and management and the legislative service commission an estimate of the amount of money that will be required for the balance of the fiscal year to make the payments required by sections 120.18, 120.28, 120.33, 120.35, and 2941.51 of the Revised Code. (D) No reimbursement shall be made under this section for costs of indigent defense to the extent that those costs exceed the hourly rate, if any, established by the general assembly. (E) All payments relating to capital cases that were required to be made under the provisions of this chapter or section 2941.51 of the Revised Code as those provisions existed immediately before the effective date of this amendment shall be made for each calendar or fiscal year, as applicable, in accordance with those provisions as they existed immediately before the effective date of this amendment until each case in which a defendant was sentenced to death before the effective date of this amendment is finally resolved. Sec. 149.43. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Public record" means records kept by any public office, including, but not limited to, state, county, city, village, township, and school district units, and records pertaining to the delivery of educational services by an alternative school in this state kept by the nonprofit or for-profit entity operating the alternative school pursuant to section 3313.533 of the Revised Code. "Public record" does not mean any of the following: (a) Medical records; (b) Records pertaining to probation and parole proceedings, to proceedings related to the imposition of community control sanctions and post-release control sanctions, or to proceedings related to determinations under section 2967.271 of the Revised Code regarding the release or maintained incarceration of an offender to whom that section applies; (c) Records pertaining to actions under section 2151.85 and division (C) of section 2919.121 of the Revised Code and to appeals of actions arising under those sections; (d) Records pertaining to adoption proceedings, including the contents of an adoption file maintained by the department of health under sections 3705.12 to 3705.124 of the Revised Code; (e) Information in a record contained in the putative father registry established by section 3107.062 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the information is held by the department of job and family services or, pursuant to section 3111.69 of the Revised Code, the office of child support in the department or a child support enforcement agency; (f) Records specified in division (A) of section 3107.52 of the Revised Code; (g) Trial preparation records; (h) Confidential law enforcement investigatory records; (i) Records containing information that is confidential under section 2710.03 or 4112.05 of the Revised Code; (j) DNA records stored in the DNA database pursuant to section 109.573 of the Revised Code; (k) Inmate records released by the department of rehabilitation and correction to the department of youth services or a court of record pursuant to division (E) of section 5120.21 of the Revised Code; (l) Records maintained by the department of youth services pertaining to children in its custody released by the department of youth services to the department of rehabilitation and correction pursuant to section 5139.05 of the Revised Code; (m) Intellectual property records; (n) Donor profile records; (o) Records maintained by the department of job and family services pursuant to section 3121.894 of the Revised Code; (p) Designated public service worker residential and familial information; (q) In the case of a county hospital operated pursuant to Chapter 339. of the Revised Code or a municipal hospital operated pursuant to Chapter 749. of the Revised Code, information that constitutes a trade secret, as defined in section 1333.61 of the Revised Code; (r) Information pertaining to the recreational activities of a person under the age of eighteen; (s) In the case of a child fatality review board acting under sections 307.621 to 307.629 of the Revised Code or a review conducted pursuant to guidelines established by the director of health under section 3701.70 of the Revised Code, records provided to the board or director, statements made by board members during meetings of the board or by persons participating in the director's review, and all work products of the board or director, and in the case of a child fatality review board, child fatality review data submitted by the board to the department of health or a national child death review database, other than the report prepared pursuant to division (A) of section 307.626 of the Revised Code; (t) Records provided to and statements made by the executive director of a public children services agency or a prosecuting attorney acting pursuant to section 5153.171 of the Revised Code other than the information released under that section; (u) Test materials, examinations, or evaluation tools used in an examination for licensure as a nursing home administrator that the board of executives of long-term services and supports administers under section 4751.15 of the Revised Code or contracts under that section with a private or government entity to administer; (v) Records the release of which is prohibited by state or federal law; (w) Proprietary information of or relating to any person that is submitted to or compiled by the Ohio venture capital authority created under section 150.01 of the Revised Code; (x) Financial statements and data any person submits for any purpose to the Ohio housing finance agency or the controlling board in connection with applying for, receiving, or accounting for financial assistance from the agency, and information that identifies any individual who benefits directly or indirectly from financial assistance from the agency; (y) Records listed in section 5101.29 of the Revised Code; (z) Discharges recorded with a county recorder under section 317.24 of the Revised Code, as specified in division (B)(2) of that section; (aa) Usage information including names and addresses of specific residential and commercial customers of a municipally owned or operated public utility; (bb) Records described in division (C) of section 187.04 of the Revised Code that are not designated to be made available to the public as provided in that division; (cc) Information and records that are made confidential, privileged, and not subject to disclosure under divisions (B) and (C) of section 2949.221 of the Revised Code; (dd) Personal information, as defined in section 149.45 of the Revised Code; (ee)(dd) The confidential name, address, and other personally identifiable information of a program participant in the address confidentiality program established under sections 111.41 to 111.47 of the Revised Code, including the contents of any application for absent voter's ballots, absent voter's ballot identification envelope statement of voter, or provisional ballot affirmation completed by a program participant who has a confidential voter registration record; records or portions of records pertaining to that program that identify the number of program participants that reside within a precinct, ward, township, municipal corporation, county, or any other geographic area smaller than the state; and any real property confidentiality notice filed under section 111.431 of the Revised Code and the information described in division (C) of that section. As used in this division, "confidential address" and "program participant" have the meaning defined in section 111.41 of the Revised Code. (ff)(ee) Orders for active military service of an individual serving or with previous service in the armed forces of the United States, including a reserve component, or the Ohio organized militia, except that, such order becomes a public record on the day that is fifteen years after the published date or effective date of the call to order; (gg)(ff) The name, address, contact information, or other personal information of an individual who is less than eighteen years of age that is included in any record related to a traffic accident involving a school vehicle in which the individual was an occupant at the time of the accident; (hh)(gg) Protected health information, as defined in 45 C.F.R. 160.103, that is in a claim for payment for a health care product, service, or procedure, as well as any other health claims data in another document that reveals the identity of an individual who is the subject of the data or could be used to reveal that individual's identity; (ii)(hh) Any depiction by photograph, film, videotape, or printed or digital image under either of the following circumstances: (i) The depiction is that of a victim of an offense the release of which would be, to a reasonable person of ordinary sensibilities, an offensive and objectionable intrusion into the victim's expectation of bodily privacy and integrity. (ii) The depiction captures or depicts the victim of a sexually oriented offense, as defined in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code, at the actual occurrence of that offense. (jj)(ii) Restricted portions of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording; (kk)(jj) In the case of a fetal-infant mortality review board acting under sections 3707.70 to 3707.77 of the Revised Code, records, documents, reports, or other information presented to the board or a person abstracting such materials on the board's behalf, statements made by review board members during board meetings, all work products of the board, and data submitted by the board to the department of health or a national infant death review database, other than the report prepared pursuant to section 3707.77 of the Revised Code. (ll)(kk) Records, documents, reports, or other information presented to the pregnancy-associated mortality review board established under section 3738.01 of the Revised Code, statements made by board members during board meetings, all work products of the board, and data submitted by the board to the department of health, other than the biennial reports prepared under section 3738.08 of the Revised Code; (mm)(ll) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(1)(oo)(A)(1)(nn) of this section, telephone numbers for a victim, as defined in section 2930.01 of the Revised Code or a witness to a crime that are listed on any law enforcement record or report. (nn)(mm) A preneed funeral contract, as defined in section 4717.01 of the Revised Code, and contract terms and personally identifying information of a preneed funeral contract, that is contained in a report submitted by or for a funeral home to the board of embalmers and funeral directors under division (C) of section 4717.13, division (J) of section 4717.31, or section 4717.41 of the Revised Code. (oo)(nn) Telephone numbers for a party to a motor vehicle accident subject to the requirements of section 5502.11 of the Revised Code that are listed on any law enforcement record or report, except that the telephone numbers described in this division are not excluded from the definition of "public record" under this division on and after the thirtieth day after the occurrence of the motor vehicle accident. (pp)(oo) Records pertaining to individuals who complete training under section 5502.703 of the Revised Code to be permitted by a school district board of education or governing body of a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, or a chartered nonpublic school to convey deadly weapons or dangerous ordnance into a school safety zone; (qq)(pp) Records, documents, reports, or other information presented to a domestic violence fatality review board established under section 307.651 of the Revised Code, statements made by board members during board meetings, all work products of the board, and data submitted by the board to the department of health, other than a report prepared pursuant to section 307.656 of the Revised Code; (rr)(qq) Records, documents, and information the release of which is prohibited under sections 2930.04 and 2930.07 of the Revised Code; (ss)(rr) Records of an existing qualified nonprofit corporation that creates a special improvement district under Chapter 1710. of the Revised Code that do not pertain to a purpose for which the district is created; (tt)(ss) Educational support services data, as defined in section 3319.325 of the Revised Code. A record that is not a public record under division (A)(1) of this section and that, under law, is permanently retained becomes a public record on the day that is seventy-five years after the day on which the record was created, except for any record protected by the attorney-client privilege, a trial preparation record as defined in this section, a statement prohibiting the release of identifying information signed under section 3107.083 of the Revised Code, a denial of release form filed pursuant to section 3107.46 of the Revised Code, or any record that is exempt from release or disclosure under section 149.433 of the Revised Code. If the record is a birth certificate and a biological parent's name redaction request form has been accepted under section 3107.391 of the Revised Code, the name of that parent shall be redacted from the birth certificate before it is released under this paragraph. If any other section of the Revised Code establishes a time period for disclosure of a record that conflicts with the time period specified in this section, the time period in the other section prevails. (2) "Confidential law enforcement investigatory record" means any record that pertains to a law enforcement matter of a criminal, quasi-criminal, civil, or administrative nature, but only to the extent that the release of the record would create a high probability of disclosure of any of the following: (a) The identity of a suspect who has not been charged with the offense to which the record pertains, or of an information source or witness to whom confidentiality has been reasonably promised; (b) Information provided by an information source or witness to whom confidentiality has been reasonably promised, which information would reasonably tend to disclose the source's or witness's identity; (c) Specific confidential investigatory techniques or procedures or specific investigatory work product; (d) Information that would endanger the life or physical safety of law enforcement personnel, a crime victim, a witness, or a confidential information source. (3) "Medical record" means any document or combination of documents, except births, deaths, and the fact of admission to or discharge from a hospital, that pertains to the medical history, diagnosis, prognosis, or medical condition of a patient and that is generated and maintained in the process of medical treatment. (4) "Trial preparation record" means any record that contains information that is specifically compiled in reasonable anticipation of, or in defense of, a civil or criminal action or proceeding, including the independent thought processes and personal trial preparation of an attorney. (5) "Intellectual property record" means a record, other than a financial or administrative record, that is produced or collected by or for faculty or staff of a state institution of higher learning in the conduct of or as a result of study or research on an educational, commercial, scientific, artistic, technical, or scholarly issue, regardless of whether the study or research was sponsored by the institution alone or in conjunction with a governmental body or private concern, and that has not been publicly released, published, or patented. (6) "Donor profile record" means all records about donors or potential donors to a public institution of higher education except the names and reported addresses of the actual donors and the date, amount, and conditions of the actual donation. (7) "Designated public service worker" means a peace officer, parole officer, probation officer, bailiff, prosecuting attorney, assistant prosecuting attorney, correctional employee, county or multicounty corrections officer, community-based correctional facility employee, designated Ohio national guard member, protective services worker, youth services employee, firefighter, EMT, medical director or member of a cooperating physician advisory board of an emergency medical service organization, state board of pharmacy employee, investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, emergency service telecommunicator, forensic mental health provider, mental health evaluation provider, regional psychiatric hospital employee, judge, magistrate, or federal law enforcement officer. (8) "Designated public service worker residential and familial information" means any information that discloses any of the following about a designated public service worker: (a) The address of the actual personal residence of a designated public service worker, except for the following information: (i) The address of the actual personal residence of a prosecuting attorney or judge; and (ii) The state or political subdivision in which a designated public service worker resides. (b) Information compiled from referral to or participation in an employee assistance program; (c) The social security number, the residential telephone number, any bank account, debit card, charge card, or credit card number, or the emergency telephone number of, or any medical information pertaining to, a designated public service worker; (d) The name of any beneficiary of employment benefits, including, but not limited to, life insurance benefits, provided to a designated public service worker by the designated public service worker's employer; (e) The identity and amount of any charitable or employment benefit deduction made by the designated public service worker's employer from the designated public service worker's compensation, unless the amount of the deduction is required by state or federal law; (f) The name, the residential address, the name of the employer, the address of the employer, the social security number, the residential telephone number, any bank account, debit card, charge card, or credit card number, or the emergency telephone number of the spouse, a former spouse, or any child of a designated public service worker; (g) A photograph of a peace officer who holds a position or has an assignment that may include undercover or plain clothes positions or assignments as determined by the peace officer's appointing authority. (9) As used in divisions (A)(7) and (15) to (17) of this section: "Peace officer" has the meaning defined in section 109.71 of the Revised Code and also includes the superintendent and troopers of the state highway patrol; it does not include the sheriff of a county or a supervisory employee who, in the absence of the sheriff, is authorized to stand in for, exercise the authority of, and perform the duties of the sheriff. "Correctional employee" means any employee of the department of rehabilitation and correction who in the course of performing the employee's job duties has or has had contact with inmates and persons under supervision. "County or multicounty corrections officer" means any corrections officer employed by any county or multicounty correctional facility. "Designated Ohio national guard member" means a member of the Ohio national guard who is participating in duties related to remotely piloted aircraft, including, but not limited to, pilots, sensor operators, and mission intelligence personnel, duties related to special forces operations, or duties related to cybersecurity, and is designated by the adjutant general as a designated public service worker for those purposes. "Protective services worker" means any employee of a county agency who is responsible for child protective services, child support services, or adult protective services. "Youth services employee" means any employee of the department of youth services who in the course of performing the employee's job duties has or has had contact with children committed to the custody of the department of youth services. "Firefighter" means any regular, paid or volunteer, member of a lawfully constituted fire department of a municipal corporation, township, fire district, or village. "EMT" means EMTs-basic, EMTs-I, and paramedics that provide emergency medical services for a public emergency medical service organization. "Emergency medical service organization," "EMT-basic," "EMT-I," and "paramedic" have the meanings defined in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. "Investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation" has the meaning defined in section 2903.11 of the Revised Code. "Emergency service telecommunicator" means an individual employed by an emergency service provider as defined under section 128.01 of the Revised Code, whose primary responsibility is to be an operator for the receipt or processing of calls for emergency services made by telephone, radio, or other electronic means. "Forensic mental health provider" means any employee of a community mental health service provider or local alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services board who, in the course of the employee's duties, has contact with persons committed to a local alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services board by a court order pursuant to section 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code. "Mental health evaluation provider" means an individual who, under Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code, examines a respondent who is alleged to be a mentally ill person subject to court order, as defined in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code, and reports to the probate court the respondent's mental condition. "Regional psychiatric hospital employee" means any employee of the department of mental health and addiction services who, in the course of performing the employee's duties, has contact with patients committed to the department of mental health and addiction services by a court order pursuant to section 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code. "Federal law enforcement officer" has the meaning defined in section 9.88 of the Revised Code. (10) "Information pertaining to the recreational activities of a person under the age of eighteen" means information that is kept in the ordinary course of business by a public office, that pertains to the recreational activities of a person under the age of eighteen years, and that discloses any of the following: (a) The address or telephone number of a person under the age of eighteen or the address or telephone number of that person's parent, guardian, custodian, or emergency contact person; (b) The social security number, birth date, or photographic image of a person under the age of eighteen; (c) Any medical record, history, or information pertaining to a person under the age of eighteen; (d) Any additional information sought or required about a person under the age of eighteen for the purpose of allowing that person to participate in any recreational activity conducted or sponsored by a public office or to use or obtain admission privileges to any recreational facility owned or operated by a public office. (11) "Community control sanction" has the meaning defined in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (12) "Post-release control sanction" has the meaning defined in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. (13) "Redaction" means obscuring or deleting any information that is exempt from the duty to permit public inspection or copying from an item that otherwise meets the definition of a "record" in section 149.011 of the Revised Code. (14) "Designee," "elected official," and "future official" have the meanings defined in section 109.43 of the Revised Code. (15) "Body-worn camera" means a visual and audio recording device worn on the person of a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer while the correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer is engaged in the performance of official duties. (16) "Dashboard camera" means a visual and audio recording device mounted on a peace officer's vehicle or vessel that is used while the peace officer is engaged in the performance of the peace officer's duties. (17) "Restricted portions of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording" means any visual or audio portion of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording that shows, communicates, or discloses any of the following: (a) The image or identity of a child or information that could lead to the identification of a child who is a primary subject of the recording when the department of rehabilitation and correction, department of youth services, or the law enforcement agency knows or has reason to know the person is a child based on the department's or law enforcement agency's records or the content of the recording; (b) The death of a person or a deceased person's body, unless the death was caused by a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer or, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the decedent's executor or administrator has been obtained; (c) The death of a correctional employee, youth services employee, peace officer, firefighter, paramedic, or other first responder, occurring while the decedent was engaged in the performance of official duties, unless, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the decedent's executor or administrator has been obtained; (d) Grievous bodily harm, unless the injury was effected by a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer or, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the injured person or the injured person's guardian has been obtained; (e) An act of severe violence against a person that results in serious physical harm to the person, unless the act and injury was effected by a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer or, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the injured person or the injured person's guardian has been obtained; (f) Grievous bodily harm to a correctional employee, youth services employee, peace officer, firefighter, paramedic, or other first responder, occurring while the injured person was engaged in the performance of official duties, unless, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the injured person or the injured person's guardian has been obtained; (g) An act of severe violence resulting in serious physical harm against a correctional employee, youth services employee, peace officer, firefighter, paramedic, or other first responder, occurring while the injured person was engaged in the performance of official duties, unless, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the injured person or the injured person's guardian has been obtained; (h) A person's nude body, unless, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the person's consent has been obtained; (i) Protected health information, the identity of a person in a health care facility who is not the subject of a correctional, youth services, or law enforcement encounter, or any other information in a health care facility that could identify a person who is not the subject of a correctional, youth services, or law enforcement encounter; (j) Information that could identify the alleged victim of a sex offense, menacing by stalking, or domestic violence; (k) Information, that does not constitute a confidential law enforcement investigatory record, that could identify a person who provides sensitive or confidential information to the department of rehabilitation and correction, the department of youth services, or a law enforcement agency when the disclosure of the person's identity or the information provided could reasonably be expected to threaten or endanger the safety or property of the person or another person; (l) Personal information of a person who is not arrested, cited, charged, or issued a written warning by a peace officer; (m) Proprietary correctional, youth services, or police contingency plans or tactics that are intended to prevent crime and maintain public order and safety; (n) A personal conversation unrelated to work between correctional employees, youth services employees, or peace officers or between a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer and an employee of a law enforcement agency; (o) A conversation between a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer and a member of the public that does not concern correctional, youth services, or law enforcement activities; (p) The interior of a residence, unless the interior of a residence is the location of an adversarial encounter with, or a use of force by, a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer; (q) Any portion of the interior of a private business that is not open to the public, unless an adversarial encounter with, or a use of force by, a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer occurs in that location. As used in division (A)(17) of this section: "Grievous bodily harm" has the same meaning as in section 5924.120 of the Revised Code. "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in section 1337.11 of the Revised Code. "Protected health information" has the same meaning as in 45 C.F.R. 160.103. "Law enforcement agency" means a government entity that employs peace officers to perform law enforcement duties. "Personal information" means any government-issued identification number, date of birth, address, financial information, or criminal justice information from the law enforcement automated data system or similar databases. "Sex offense" has the same meaning as in section 2907.10 of the Revised Code. "Firefighter," "paramedic," and "first responder" have the same meanings as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Upon request by any person and subject to division (B)(8) of this section, all public records responsive to the request shall be promptly prepared and made available for inspection to the requester at all reasonable times during regular business hours. Subject to division (B)(8) of this section, upon request by any person, a public office or person responsible for public records shall make copies of the requested public record available to the requester at cost and within a reasonable period of time. If a public record contains information that is exempt from the duty to permit public inspection or to copy the public record, the public office or the person responsible for the public record shall make available all of the information within the public record that is not exempt. When making that public record available for public inspection or copying that public record, the public office or the person responsible for the public record shall notify the requester of any redaction or make the redaction plainly visible. A redaction shall be deemed a denial of a request to inspect or copy the redacted information, except if federal or state law authorizes or requires a public office to make the redaction. When the auditor of state receives a request to inspect or to make a copy of a record that was provided to the auditor of state for purposes of an audit, but the original public office has asserted to the auditor of state that the record is not a public record, the auditor of state may handle the requests by directing the requestor to the original public office that provided the record to the auditor of state. (2) To facilitate broader access to public records, a public office or the person responsible for public records shall organize and maintain public records in a manner that they can be made available for inspection or copying in accordance with division (B) of this section. A public office also shall have available a copy of its current records retention schedule at a location readily available to the public. If a requester makes an ambiguous or overly broad request or has difficulty in making a request for copies or inspection of public records under this section such that the public office or the person responsible for the requested public record cannot reasonably identify what public records are being requested, the public office or the person responsible for the requested public record may deny the request but shall provide the requester with an opportunity to revise the request by informing the requester of the manner in which records are maintained by the public office and accessed in the ordinary course of the public office's or person's duties. (3) If a request is ultimately denied, in part or in whole, the public office or the person responsible for the requested public record shall provide the requester with an explanation, including legal authority, setting forth why the request was denied. If the initial request was provided in writing, the explanation also shall be provided to the requester in writing. The explanation shall not preclude the public office or the person responsible for the requested public record from relying upon additional reasons or legal authority in defending an action commenced under division (C) of this section. (4) Unless specifically required or authorized by state or federal law or in accordance with division (B) of this section, no public office or person responsible for public records may limit or condition the availability of public records by requiring disclosure of the requester's identity or the intended use of the requested public record. Any requirement that the requester disclose the requester's identity or the intended use of the requested public record constitutes a denial of the request. (5) A public office or person responsible for public records may ask a requester to make the request in writing, may ask for the requester's identity, and may inquire about the intended use of the information requested, but may do so only after disclosing to the requester that a written request is not mandatory, that the requester may decline to reveal the requester's identity or the intended use, and when a written request or disclosure of the identity or intended use would benefit the requester by enhancing the ability of the public office or person responsible for public records to identify, locate, or deliver the public records sought by the requester. (6) If any person requests a copy of a public record in accordance with division (B) of this section, the public office or person responsible for the public record may require the requester to pay in advance the cost involved in providing the copy of the public record in accordance with the choice made by the requester under this division. The public office or the person responsible for the public record shall permit the requester to choose to have the public record duplicated upon paper, upon the same medium upon which the public office or person responsible for the public record keeps it, or upon any other medium upon which the public office or person responsible for the public record determines that it reasonably can be duplicated as an integral part of the normal operations of the public office or person responsible for the public record. When the requester makes a choice under this division, the public office or person responsible for the public record shall provide a copy of it in accordance with the choice made by the requester. Nothing in this section requires a public office or person responsible for the public record to allow the requester of a copy of the public record to make the copies of the public record. (7)(a) Upon a request made in accordance with division (B) of this section and subject to division (B)(6) of this section, a public office or person responsible for public records shall transmit a copy of a public record to any person by United States mail or by any other means of delivery or transmission within a reasonable period of time after receiving the request for the copy. The public office or person responsible for the public record may require the person making the request to pay in advance the cost of postage if the copy is transmitted by United States mail or the cost of delivery if the copy is transmitted other than by United States mail, and to pay in advance the costs incurred for other supplies used in the mailing, delivery, or transmission. (b) Any public office may adopt a policy and procedures that it will follow in transmitting, within a reasonable period of time after receiving a request, copies of public records by United States mail or by any other means of delivery or transmission pursuant to division (B)(7) of this section. A public office that adopts a policy and procedures under division (B)(7) of this section shall comply with them in performing its duties under that division. (c) In any policy and procedures adopted under division (B)(7) of this section: (i) A public office may limit the number of records requested by a person that the office will physically deliver by United States mail or by another delivery service to ten per month, unless the person certifies to the office in writing that the person does not intend to use or forward the requested records, or the information contained in them, for commercial purposes; (ii) A public office that chooses to provide some or all of its public records on a web site that is fully accessible to and searchable by members of the public at all times, other than during acts of God outside the public office's control or maintenance, and that charges no fee to search, access, download, or otherwise receive records provided on the web site, may limit to ten per month the number of records requested by a person that the office will deliver in a digital format, unless the requested records are not provided on the web site and unless the person certifies to the office in writing that the person does not intend to use or forward the requested records, or the information contained in them, for commercial purposes. (iii) For purposes of division (B)(7) of this section, "commercial" shall be narrowly construed and does not include reporting or gathering news, reporting or gathering information to assist citizen oversight or understanding of the operation or activities of government, or nonprofit educational research. (8) A public office or person responsible for public records is not required to permit a person who is incarcerated pursuant to a criminal conviction or a juvenile adjudication to inspect or to obtain a copy of any public record concerning a criminal investigation or prosecution or concerning what would be a criminal investigation or prosecution if the subject of the investigation or prosecution were an adult, unless the request to inspect or to obtain a copy of the record is for the purpose of acquiring information that is subject to release as a public record under this section and the judge who imposed the sentence or made the adjudication with respect to the person, or the judge's successor in office, finds that the information sought in the public record is necessary to support what appears to be a justiciable claim of the person. (9)(a) Upon written request made and signed by a journalist, a public office, or person responsible for public records, having custody of the records of the agency employing a specified designated public service worker shall disclose to the journalist the address of the actual personal residence of the designated public service worker and, if the designated public service worker's spouse, former spouse, or child is employed by a public office, the name and address of the employer of the designated public service worker's spouse, former spouse, or child. The request shall include the journalist's name and title and the name and address of the journalist's employer and shall state that disclosure of the information sought would be in the public interest. (b) Division (B)(9)(a) of this section also applies to journalist requests for: (i) Customer information maintained by a municipally owned or operated public utility, other than social security numbers and any private financial information such as credit reports, payment methods, credit card numbers, and bank account information; (ii) Information about minors involved in a school vehicle accident as provided in division (A)(1)(gg)(A)(1)(ff) of this section, other than personal information as defined in section 149.45 of the Revised Code. (c) As used in division (B)(9) of this section, "journalist" means a person engaged in, connected with, or employed by any news medium, including a newspaper, magazine, press association, news agency, or wire service, a radio or television station, or a similar medium, for the purpose of gathering, processing, transmitting, compiling, editing, or disseminating information for the general public. (10) Upon a request made by a victim, victim's attorney, or victim's representative, as that term is used in section 2930.02 of the Revised Code, a public office or person responsible for public records shall transmit a copy of a depiction of the victim as described in division (A)(1)(ii)(A)(1)(hh) of this section to the victim, victim's attorney, or victim's representative. (C)(1) If a person allegedly is aggrieved by the failure of a public office or the person responsible for public records to promptly prepare a public record and to make it available to the person for inspection in accordance with division (B) of this section or by any other failure of a public office or the person responsible for public records to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section, the person allegedly aggrieved may do only one of the following, and not both: (a) File a complaint with the clerk of the court of claims or the clerk of the court of common pleas under section 2743.75 of the Revised Code; (b) Commence a mandamus action to obtain a judgment that orders the public office or the person responsible for the public record to comply with division (B) of this section, that awards court costs and reasonable attorney's fees to the person that instituted the mandamus action, and, if applicable, that includes an order fixing statutory damages under division (C)(2) of this section. The mandamus action may be commenced in the court of common pleas of the county in which division (B) of this section allegedly was not complied with, in the supreme court pursuant to its original jurisdiction under Section 2 of Article IV, Ohio Constitution, or in the court of appeals for the appellate district in which division (B) of this section allegedly was not complied with pursuant to its original jurisdiction under Section 3 of Article IV, Ohio Constitution. (2) If a requester transmits a written request by hand delivery, electronic submission, or certified mail to inspect or receive copies of any public record in a manner that fairly describes the public record or class of public records to the public office or person responsible for the requested public records, except as otherwise provided in this section, the requester shall be entitled to recover the amount of statutory damages set forth in this division if a court determines that the public office or the person responsible for public records failed to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section. The amount of statutory damages shall be fixed at one hundred dollars for each business day during which the public office or person responsible for the requested public records failed to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section, beginning with the day on which the requester files a mandamus action to recover statutory damages, up to a maximum of one thousand dollars. The award of statutory damages shall not be construed as a penalty, but as compensation for injury arising from lost use of the requested information. The existence of this injury shall be conclusively presumed. The award of statutory damages shall be in addition to all other remedies authorized by this section. The court may reduce an award of statutory damages or not award statutory damages if the court determines both of the following: (a) That, based on the ordinary application of statutory law and case law as it existed at the time of the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records that allegedly constitutes a failure to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section and that was the basis of the mandamus action, a well-informed public office or person responsible for the requested public records reasonably would believe that the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records did not constitute a failure to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section; (b) That a well-informed public office or person responsible for the requested public records reasonably would believe that the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records would serve the public policy that underlies the authority that is asserted as permitting that conduct or threatened conduct. (3) In a mandamus action filed under division (C)(1) of this section, the following apply: (a)(i) If the court orders the public office or the person responsible for the public record to comply with division (B) of this section, the court shall determine and award to the relator all court costs, which shall be construed as remedial and not punitive. (ii) If the court makes a determination described in division (C)(3)(b)(iii) of this section, the court shall determine and award to the relator all court costs, which shall be construed as remedial and not punitive. (b) If the court renders a judgment that orders the public office or the person responsible for the public record to comply with division (B) of this section or if the court determines any of the following, the court may award reasonable attorney's fees to the relator, subject to division (C)(4) of this section: (i) The public office or the person responsible for the public records failed to respond affirmatively or negatively to the public records request in accordance with the time allowed under division (B) of this section. (ii) The public office or the person responsible for the public records promised to permit the relator to inspect or receive copies of the public records requested within a specified period of time but failed to fulfill that promise within that specified period of time. (iii) The public office or the person responsible for the public records acted in bad faith when the office or person voluntarily made the public records available to the relator for the first time after the relator commenced the mandamus action, but before the court issued any order concluding whether or not the public office or person was required to comply with division (B) of this section. No discovery may be conducted on the issue of the alleged bad faith of the public office or person responsible for the public records. This division shall not be construed as creating a presumption that the public office or the person responsible for the public records acted in bad faith when the office or person voluntarily made the public records available to the relator for the first time after the relator commenced the mandamus action, but before the court issued any order described in this division. (c) The court shall not award attorney's fees to the relator if the court determines both of the following: (i) That, based on the ordinary application of statutory law and case law as it existed at the time of the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records that allegedly constitutes a failure to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section and that was the basis of the mandamus action, a well-informed public office or person responsible for the requested public records reasonably would believe that the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records did not constitute a failure to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section; (ii) That a well-informed public office or person responsible for the requested public records reasonably would believe that the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records would serve the public policy that underlies the authority that is asserted as permitting that conduct or threatened conduct. (4) All of the following apply to any award of reasonable attorney's fees awarded under division (C)(3)(b) of this section: (a) The fees shall be construed as remedial and not punitive. (b) The fees awarded shall not exceed the total of the reasonable attorney's fees incurred before the public record was made available to the relator and the fees described in division (C)(4)(c) of this section. (c) Reasonable attorney's fees shall include reasonable fees incurred to produce proof of the reasonableness and amount of the fees and to otherwise litigate entitlement to the fees. (d) The court may reduce the amount of fees awarded if the court determines that, given the factual circumstances involved with the specific public records request, an alternative means should have been pursued to more effectively and efficiently resolve the dispute that was subject to the mandamus action filed under division (C)(1) of this section. (5) If the court does not issue a writ of mandamus under division (C) of this section and the court determines at that time that the bringing of the mandamus action was frivolous conduct as defined in division (A) of section 2323.51 of the Revised Code, the court may award to the public office all court costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney's fees, as determined by the court. (D) Chapter 1347. of the Revised Code does not limit the provisions of this section. (E)(1) To ensure that all employees of public offices are appropriately educated about a public office's obligations under division (B) of this section, all elected officials or their appropriate designees shall attend training approved by the attorney general as provided in section 109.43 of the Revised Code. A future official may satisfy the requirements of this division by attending the training before taking office, provided that the future official may not send a designee in the future official's place. (2) All public offices shall adopt a public records policy in compliance with this section for responding to public records requests. In adopting a public records policy under this division, a public office may obtain guidance from the model public records policy developed and provided to the public office by the attorney general under section 109.43 of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the policy may not limit the number of public records that the public office will make available to a single person, may not limit the number of public records that it will make available during a fixed period of time, and may not establish a fixed period of time before it will respond to a request for inspection or copying of public records, unless that period is less than eight hours. The public office shall distribute the public records policy adopted by the public office under this division to the employee of the public office who is the records custodian or records manager or otherwise has custody of the records of that office. The public office shall require that employee to acknowledge receipt of the copy of the public records policy. The public office shall create a poster that describes its public records policy and shall post the poster in a conspicuous place in the public office and in all locations where the public office has branch offices. The public office may post its public records policy on the internet web site of the public office if the public office maintains an internet web site. A public office that has established a manual or handbook of its general policies and procedures for all employees of the public office shall include the public records policy of the public office in the manual or handbook. (F)(1) The bureau of motor vehicles may adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to reasonably limit the number of bulk commercial special extraction requests made by a person for the same records or for updated records during a calendar year. The rules may include provisions for charges to be made for bulk commercial special extraction requests for the actual cost of the bureau, plus special extraction costs, plus ten per cent. The bureau may charge for expenses for redacting information, the release of which is prohibited by law. (2) As used in division (F)(1) of this section: (a) "Actual cost" means the cost of depleted supplies, records storage media costs, actual mailing and alternative delivery costs, or other transmitting costs, and any direct equipment operating and maintenance costs, including actual costs paid to private contractors for copying services. (b) "Bulk commercial special extraction request" means a request for copies of a record for information in a format other than the format already available, or information that cannot be extracted without examination of all items in a records series, class of records, or database by a person who intends to use or forward the copies for surveys, marketing, solicitation, or resale for commercial purposes. "Bulk commercial special extraction request" does not include a request by a person who gives assurance to the bureau that the person making the request does not intend to use or forward the requested copies for surveys, marketing, solicitation, or resale for commercial purposes. (c) "Commercial" means profit-seeking production, buying, or selling of any good, service, or other product. (d) "Special extraction costs" means the cost of the time spent by the lowest paid employee competent to perform the task, the actual amount paid to outside private contractors employed by the bureau, or the actual cost incurred to create computer programs to make the special extraction. "Special extraction costs" include any charges paid to a public agency for computer or records services. (3) For purposes of divisions (F)(1) and (2) of this section, "surveys, marketing, solicitation, or resale for commercial purposes" shall be narrowly construed and does not include reporting or gathering news, reporting or gathering information to assist citizen oversight or understanding of the operation or activities of government, or nonprofit educational research. (G) A request by a defendant, counsel of a defendant, or any agent of a defendant in a criminal action that public records related to that action be made available under this section shall be considered a demand for discovery pursuant to the Criminal Rules, except to the extent that the Criminal Rules plainly indicate a contrary intent. The defendant, counsel of the defendant, or agent of the defendant making a request under this division shall serve a copy of the request on the prosecuting attorney, director of law, or other chief legal officer responsible for prosecuting the action. (H)(1) Any portion of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording described in divisions (A)(17)(b) to (h) of this section may be released by consent of the subject of the recording or a representative of that person, as specified in those divisions, only if either of the following applies: (a) The recording will not be used in connection with any probable or pending criminal proceedings; (b) The recording has been used in connection with a criminal proceeding that was dismissed or for which a judgment has been entered pursuant to Rule 32 of the Rules of Criminal Procedure, and will not be used again in connection with any probable or pending criminal proceedings. (2) If a public office denies a request to release a restricted portion of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording, as defined in division (A)(17) of this section, any person may file a mandamus action pursuant to this section or a complaint with the clerk of the court of claims pursuant to section 2743.75 of the Revised Code, requesting the court to order the release of all or portions of the recording. If the court considering the request determines that the filing articulates by clear and convincing evidence that the public interest in the recording substantially outweighs privacy interests and other interests asserted to deny release, the court shall order the public office to release the recording. Sec. 149.436. Notwithstanding division (A)(1)(gg) (A)(1)(ff) of section 149.43 of the Revised Code, upon written request made and signed by the parent or guardian of an individual who is less than eighteen years of age and was an occupant of a school vehicle involved in a traffic accident, a public office or person responsible for public records, having custody of any record related to the traffic accident containing the personal information of the individual, shall transmit a copy of that record to the recipient identified in the request. The written request shall identify the individual on whose behalf the record is requested and the person to whom the record shall be transmitted. The record shall be transmitted only to the person identified in the written request as the recipient of the record. A public office or person responsible for records responding to a request under this section shall redact any personal information contained in the record of any individual less than eighteen years of age who is not the subject of the request, before providing the record to the recipient. Sec. 1901.183. In addition to jurisdiction otherwise granted in this chapter, the environmental division of a municipal court shall have jurisdiction within its territory in all of the following actions or proceedings and to perform all of the following functions: (A) Notwithstanding any monetary limitations in section 1901.17 of the Revised Code, in all actions and proceedings for the sale of real or personal property under lien of a judgment of the environmental division of the municipal court, or a lien for machinery, material, fuel furnished, or labor performed, irrespective of amount, and, in those cases, the environmental division may proceed to foreclose and marshal all liens and all vested or contingent rights, to appoint a receiver, and to render personal judgment irrespective of amount in favor of any party; (B) When in aid of execution of a judgment of the environmental division of the municipal court, in all actions for the foreclosure of a mortgage on real property given to secure the payment of money, or the enforcement of a specific lien for money or other encumbrance or charge on real property, when the real property is situated within the territory, and, in those cases, the environmental division may proceed to foreclose all liens and all vested and contingent rights and proceed to render judgments, and make findings and orders, between the parties, in the same manner and to the same extent as in similar cases in the court of common pleas; (C) When in aid of execution of a judgment of the environmental division of the municipal court, in all actions for the recovery of real property situated within the territory to the same extent as courts of common pleas have jurisdiction; (D) In all actions for injunction to prevent or terminate violations of the ordinances and regulations of any municipal corporation within its territory enacted or promulgated under the police power of that municipal corporation pursuant to Section 3 of Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution, over which the court of common pleas has or may have jurisdiction, and, in those cases, the environmental division of the municipal court may proceed to render judgments, and make findings and orders, in the same manner and to the same extent as in similar cases in the court of common pleas; (E) In all actions for injunction to prevent or terminate violations of the resolutions and regulations of any political subdivision within its territory enacted or promulgated under the power of that political subdivision pursuant to Article X of the Ohio Constitution, over which the court of common pleas has or may have jurisdiction, and, in those cases, the environmental division of the municipal court may proceed to render judgments, and make findings and orders, in the same manner and to the same extent as in similar cases in the court of common pleas; (F) In any civil action to enforce any provision of Chapter 3704., 3714., 3734., 3737., 3767., or 6111. of the Revised Code over which the court of common pleas has or may have jurisdiction, and, in those actions, the environmental division of the municipal court may proceed to render judgments, and make findings and orders, in the same manner and to the same extent as in similar actions in the court of common pleas; (G) In all actions and proceedings in the nature of creditors' bills, and in aid of execution to subject the interests of a judgment debtor in real or personal property to the payment of a judgment of the division, and, in those actions and proceedings, the environmental division may proceed to marshal and foreclose all liens on the property irrespective of the amount of the lien, and all vested or contingent rights in the property; (H) Concurrent jurisdiction with the court of common pleas of all criminal actions or proceedings related to the pollution of the air, ground, or water within the territory of the environmental division of the municipal court, for which a sentence of death cannot be imposed under Chapter 2903. of the Revised Code; (I) In any review or appeal of any final order of any administrative officer, agency, board, department, tribunal, commission, or other instrumentality that relates to a local building, housing, air pollution, sanitation, health, fire, zoning, or safety code, ordinance, or regulation, in the same manner and to the same extent as in similar appeals in the court of common pleas; (J) With respect to the environmental division of the Franklin county municipal court, to hear appeals from adjudication hearings conducted under Chapter 956. of the Revised Code. Sec. 2152.13. (A) A juvenile court shall impose a serious youthful dispositional sentence on a child when required under division (B)(3) of section 2152.121 of the Revised Code. In such a case, the remaining provisions of this division and divisions (B) and (C) do not apply to the child, and the court shall impose the mandatory serious youthful dispositional sentence under division (D)(1) of this section. In all other cases, a juvenile court may impose a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence on a child only if the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the delinquent act allegedly occurred initiates the process against the child in accordance with this division, and the child is an alleged delinquent child who is eligible for the dispositional sentence. The prosecuting attorney may initiate the process in any of the following ways: (1) Obtaining an indictment of the child as a serious youthful offender; (2) The child waives the right to indictment, charging the child in a bill of information as a serious youthful offender; (3) Until an indictment or information is obtained, requesting a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence in the original complaint alleging that the child is a delinquent child; (4) Until an indictment or information is obtained, if the original complaint does not request a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence, filing with the juvenile court a written notice of intent to seek a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence within twenty days after the later of the following, unless the time is extended by the juvenile court for good cause shown: (a) The date of the child's first juvenile court hearing regarding the complaint; (b) The date the juvenile court determines not to transfer the case under section 2152.12 of the Revised Code. After a written notice is filed under division (A)(4) of this section, the juvenile court shall serve a copy of the notice on the child and advise the child of the prosecuting attorney's intent to seek a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence in the case. (B) If an alleged delinquent child is not indicted or charged by information as described in division (A)(1) or (2) of this section and if a notice or complaint as described in division (A)(3) or (4) of this section indicates that the prosecuting attorney intends to pursue a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence in the case, the juvenile court shall hold a preliminary hearing to determine if there is probable cause that the child committed the act charged and is by age eligible for, or required to receive, a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence. (C)(1) A child for whom a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence is sought by a prosecuting attorney has the right to a grand jury determination of probable cause that the child committed the act charged and that the child is eligible by age for a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence. The grand jury may be impaneled by the court of common pleas or the juvenile court. Once a child is indicted, or charged by information or the juvenile court determines that the child is eligible for a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence, the child is entitled to an open and speedy trial by jury in juvenile court and to be provided with a transcript of the proceedings. The time within which the trial is to be held under Title XXIX of the Revised Code commences on whichever of the following dates is applicable: (a) If the child is indicted or charged by information, on the date of the filing of the indictment or information. (b) If the child is charged by an original complaint that requests a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence, on the date of the filing of the complaint. (c) If the child is not charged by an original complaint that requests a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence, on the date that the prosecuting attorney files the written notice of intent to seek a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence. (2) If the child is detained awaiting adjudication, upon indictment or being charged by information, the child has the same right to bail as an adult charged with the offense the alleged delinquent act would be if committed by an adult. Except as provided in division (D) of section 2152.14 of the Revised Code, all provisions of Title XXIX of the Revised Code and the Criminal Rules shall apply in the case and to the child. The juvenile court shall afford the child all rights afforded a person who is prosecuted for committing a crime including the right to counsel and the right to raise the issue of competency. The child may not waive the right to counsel. (D)(1) If a child is adjudicated a delinquent child for committing an act under circumstances that require the juvenile court to impose upon the child a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence under section 2152.11 of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (a) The juvenile court shall impose upon the child a sentence available for the violation, as if the child were an adult, under Chapter 2929. of the Revised Code, except that the juvenile court shall not impose on the child a sentence of death or life imprisonment without parole. (b) The juvenile court also shall impose upon the child one or more traditional juvenile dispositions under sections 2152.16, 2152.19, and 2152.20, and, if applicable, section 2152.17 of the Revised Code. (c) The juvenile court shall stay the adult portion of the serious youthful offender dispositional sentence pending the successful completion of the traditional juvenile dispositions imposed. (2)(a) If a child is adjudicated a delinquent child for committing an act under circumstances that allow, but do not require, the juvenile court to impose on the child a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence under section 2152.11 of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (i) If the juvenile court on the record makes a finding that, given the nature and circumstances of the violation and the history of the child, the length of time, level of security, and types of programming and resources available in the juvenile system alone are not adequate to provide the juvenile court with a reasonable expectation that the purposes set forth in section 2152.01 of the Revised Code will be met, the juvenile court may impose upon the child a sentence available for the violation, as if the child were an adult, under Chapter 2929. of the Revised Code, except that the juvenile court shall not impose on the child a sentence of death or life imprisonment without parole. (ii) If a sentence is imposed under division (D)(2)(a)(i) of this section, the juvenile court also shall impose upon the child one or more traditional juvenile dispositions under sections 2152.16, 2152.19, and 2152.20 and, if applicable, section 2152.17 of the Revised Code. (iii) The juvenile court shall stay the adult portion of the serious youthful offender dispositional sentence pending the successful completion of the traditional juvenile dispositions imposed. (b) If the juvenile court does not find that a sentence should be imposed under division (D)(2)(a)(i) of this section, the juvenile court may impose one or more traditional juvenile dispositions under sections 2152.16, 2152.19, 2152.20, and, if applicable, section 2152.17 of the Revised Code. (3) A child upon whom a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence is imposed under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section has a right to appeal under division (A)(1), (3), (4), or (5) of section 2953.08 of the Revised Code the adult portion of the serious youthful offender dispositional sentence when any of those divisions apply. The child may appeal the adult portion, and the court shall consider the appeal as if the adult portion were not stayed. Sec. 2152.67. Any adult who is arrested or charged under any provision in this chapter and who is charged with a crime may demand a trial by jury, or the juvenile judge upon the judge's own motion may call a jury. A demand for a jury trial shall be made in writing in not less than three days before the date set for trial, or within three days after counsel has been retained, whichever is later. Sections 2945.17 and 2945.23 to 2945.36 of the Revised Code, relating to the drawing and impaneling of jurors in criminal cases in the court of common pleas, other than in capital cases, shall apply to a jury trial under this section. The compensation of jurors and costs of the clerk and sheriff shall be taxed and paid in the same manner as in criminal cases in the court of common pleas. Sec. 2301.20. All civil and criminal actions in the court of common pleas shall be recorded. The reporter shall take accurate notes of or electronically record the oral testimony. The notes and electronic records shall be filed in the office of the official reporter and carefully preserved for either of the following periods of time: (A) If the action is not a capital case in which a sentence of life imprisonment has been imposed or a case in which, prior to the effective date of this amendment, a sentence of death was imposed, the notes and electronic records shall be preserved for the period of time specified by the court of common pleas, which period of time shall not be longer than the period of time that the other records of the particular action are required to be kept. (B) If the action is a capital case, in which a sentence of life imprisonment has been imposed or a case in which, prior to the effective date of this amendment, a sentence of death has been imposed the notes and electronic records shall be preserved for the longer of ten years or until the final disposition of the action and exhaustion of all appeals. Sec. 2307.60. (A)(1) Anyone injured in person or property by a criminal act has, and may recover full damages in, a civil action unless specifically excepted by law, may recover the costs of maintaining the civil action and attorney's fees if authorized by any provision of the Rules of Civil Procedure or another section of the Revised Code or under the common law of this state, and may recover punitive or exemplary damages if authorized by section 2315.21 or another section of the Revised Code. (2) A final judgment of a trial court that has not been reversed on appeal or otherwise set aside, nullified, or vacated, entered after a trial or upon a plea of guilty, but not upon a plea of no contest or the equivalent plea from another jurisdiction, that adjudges an offender guilty of an offense of violence punishable by death or imprisonment in excess of one year, when entered as evidence in any subsequent civil proceeding based on the criminal act, shall preclude the offender from denying in the subsequent civil proceeding any fact essential to sustaining that judgment, unless the offender can demonstrate that extraordinary circumstances prevented the offender from having a full and fair opportunity to litigate the issue in the criminal proceeding or other extraordinary circumstances justify affording the offender an opportunity to relitigate the issue. The offender may introduce evidence of the offender's pending appeal of the final judgment of the trial court, if applicable, and the court may consider that evidence in determining the liability of the offender. (B)(1) As used in division (B) of this section: (a) "Tort action" means a civil action for damages for injury, death, or loss to person or property other than a civil action for damages for a breach of contract or another agreement between persons. "Tort action" includes, but is not limited to, a product liability claim, as defined in section 2307.71 of the Revised Code, and an asbestos claim, as defined in section 2307.91 of the Revised Code, an action for wrongful death under Chapter 2125. of the Revised Code, and an action based on derivative claims for relief. (b) "Residence" has the same meaning as in section 2901.05 of the Revised Code. (2) Recovery on a claim for relief in a tort action is barred to any person or the person's legal representative if any of the following apply: (a) The person has been convicted of or has pleaded guilty to a felony, or to a misdemeanor that is an offense of violence, arising out of criminal conduct that was a proximate cause of the injury or loss for which relief is claimed in the tort action. (b) The person engaged in conduct that, if prosecuted, would constitute a felony, a misdemeanor that is an offense of violence, an attempt to commit a felony, or an attempt to commit a misdemeanor that is an offense of violence and that conduct was a proximate cause of the injury or loss for which relief is claimed in the tort action, regardless of whether the person has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to or has been charged with committing the felony, the misdemeanor, or the attempt to commit the felony or misdemeanor. (c) The person suffered the injury or loss for which relief is claimed in the tort action as a proximate result of the victim of conduct that, if prosecuted, would constitute a felony, a misdemeanor that is an offense of violence, an attempt to commit a felony, or an attempt to commit a misdemeanor that is an offense of violence acting against the person in self-defense, defense of another, or defense of the victim's residence, regardless of whether the person has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to or has been charged with committing the felony, the misdemeanor, or the attempt to commit the felony or misdemeanor. Division (B)(2)(c) of this section does not apply if the person who suffered the injury or loss, at the time of the victim's act of self-defense, defense of another, or defense of residence, was an innocent bystander who had no connection with the underlying conduct that prompted the victim's exercise of self-defense, defense of another, or defense of residence. (3) Recovery against a victim of conduct that, if prosecuted, would constitute a felony, a misdemeanor that is an offense of violence, an attempt to commit a felony, or an attempt to commit a misdemeanor that is an offense of violence, on a claim for relief in a tort action is barred to any person or the person's legal representative if conduct the person engaged in against that victim was a proximate cause of the injury or loss for which relief is claimed in the tort action and that conduct, if prosecuted, would constitute a felony, a misdemeanor that is an offense of violence, an attempt to commit a felony, or an attempt to commit a misdemeanor that is an offense of violence, regardless of whether the person has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to or has been charged with committing the felony, the misdemeanor, or the attempt to commit the felony or misdemeanor. (4) Divisions (B)(1) to (3) of this section do not apply to civil claims based upon alleged intentionally tortious conduct, alleged violations of the United States Constitution, or alleged violations of statutes of the United States pertaining to civil rights. For purposes of division (B)(4) of this section, a person's act of self-defense, defense of another, or defense of the person's residence does not constitute intentionally tortious conduct. Sec. 2317.02. The following persons shall not testify in certain respects: (A)(1) An attorney, concerning a communication made to the attorney by a client in that relation or concerning the attorney's advice to a client, except that the attorney may testify by express consent of the client or, if the client is deceased, by the express consent of the surviving spouse or the executor or administrator of the estate of the deceased client. However, if the client voluntarily reveals the substance of attorney-client communications in a nonprivileged context or is deemed by section 2151.421 of the Revised Code to have waived any testimonial privilege under this division, the attorney may be compelled to testify on the same subject. The testimonial privilege established under this division does not apply concerning either of the following: (a) A communication between a client in a capital case, as defined in section 2901.02 of the Revised Code, and the client's attorney if the communication is relevant to a subsequent ineffective assistance of counsel claim by the client alleging that the attorney did not effectively represent the client in the case; (b) A a communication between a client who has since died and the deceased client's attorney if the communication is relevant to a dispute between parties who claim through that deceased client, regardless of whether the claims are by testate or intestate succession or by inter vivos transaction, and the dispute addresses the competency of the deceased client when the deceased client executed a document that is the basis of the dispute or whether the deceased client was a victim of fraud, undue influence, or duress when the deceased client executed a document that is the basis of the dispute. (2) An attorney, concerning a communication made to the attorney by a client in that relationship or the attorney's advice to a client, except that if the client is an insurance company, the attorney may be compelled to testify, subject to an in camera inspection by a court, about communications made by the client to the attorney or by the attorney to the client that are related to the attorney's aiding or furthering an ongoing or future commission of bad faith by the client, if the party seeking disclosure of the communications has made a prima-facie showing of bad faith, fraud, or criminal misconduct by the client. (B)(1) A physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist concerning a communication made to the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist by a patient in that relation or the advice of a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist given to a patient, except as otherwise provided in this division, division (B)(2), and division (B)(3) of this section, and except that, if the patient is deemed by section 2151.421 of the Revised Code to have waived any testimonial privilege under this division, the physician or advanced practice registered nurse may be compelled to testify on the same subject. The testimonial privilege established under this division does not apply, and a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist may testify or may be compelled to testify, in any of the following circumstances: (a) In any civil action, in accordance with the discovery provisions of the Rules of Civil Procedure in connection with a civil action, or in connection with a claim under Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code, under any of the following circumstances: (i) If the patient or the guardian or other legal representative of the patient gives express consent; (ii) If the patient is deceased, the spouse of the patient or the executor or administrator of the patient's estate gives express consent; (iii) If a medical claim, dental claim, chiropractic claim, or optometric claim, as defined in section 2305.113 of the Revised Code, an action for wrongful death, any other type of civil action, or a claim under Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code is filed by the patient, the personal representative of the estate of the patient if deceased, or the patient's guardian or other legal representative. (b) In any civil action concerning court-ordered treatment or services received by a patient, if the court-ordered treatment or services were ordered as part of a case plan journalized under section 2151.412 of the Revised Code or the court-ordered treatment or services are necessary or relevant to dependency, neglect, or abuse or temporary or permanent custody proceedings under Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code. (c) In any criminal action concerning any test or the results of any test that determines the presence or concentration of alcohol, a drug of abuse, a combination of them, a controlled substance, or a metabolite of a controlled substance in the patient's whole blood, blood serum or plasma, breath, urine, or other bodily substance at any time relevant to the criminal offense in question. (d) In any criminal action against a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist. In such an action, the testimonial privilege established under this division does not prohibit the admission into evidence, in accordance with the Rules of Evidence, of a patient's medical or dental records or other communications between a patient and the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist that are related to the action and obtained by subpoena, search warrant, or other lawful means. A court that permits or compels a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist to testify in such an action or permits the introduction into evidence of patient records or other communications in such an action shall require that appropriate measures be taken to ensure that the confidentiality of any patient named or otherwise identified in the records is maintained. Measures to ensure confidentiality that may be taken by the court include sealing its records or deleting specific information from its records. (e)(i) If the communication was between a patient who has since died and the deceased patient's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist, the communication is relevant to a dispute between parties who claim through that deceased patient, regardless of whether the claims are by testate or intestate succession or by inter vivos transaction, and the dispute addresses the competency of the deceased patient when the deceased patient executed a document that is the basis of the dispute or whether the deceased patient was a victim of fraud, undue influence, or duress when the deceased patient executed a document that is the basis of the dispute. (ii) If neither the spouse of a patient nor the executor or administrator of that patient's estate gives consent under division (B)(1)(a)(ii) of this section, testimony or the disclosure of the patient's medical records by a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, dentist, or other health care provider under division (B)(1)(e)(i) of this section is a permitted use or disclosure of protected health information, as defined in 45 C.F.R. 160.103, and an authorization or opportunity to be heard shall not be required. (iii) Division (B)(1)(e)(i) of this section does not require a mental health professional to disclose psychotherapy notes, as defined in 45 C.F.R. 164.501. (iv) An interested person who objects to testimony or disclosure under division (B)(1)(e)(i) of this section may seek a protective order pursuant to Civil Rule 26. (v) A person to whom protected health information is disclosed under division (B)(1)(e)(i) of this section shall not use or disclose the protected health information for any purpose other than the litigation or proceeding for which the information was requested and shall return the protected health information to the covered entity or destroy the protected health information, including all copies made, at the conclusion of the litigation or proceeding. (2)(a) If any law enforcement officer submits a written statement to a health care provider that states that an official criminal investigation has begun regarding a specified person or that a criminal action or proceeding has been commenced against a specified person, that requests the provider to supply to the officer copies of any records the provider possesses that pertain to any test or the results of any test administered to the specified person to determine the presence or concentration of alcohol, a drug of abuse, a combination of them, a controlled substance, or a metabolite of a controlled substance in the person's whole blood, blood serum or plasma, breath, or urine at any time relevant to the criminal offense in question, and that conforms to section 2317.022 of the Revised Code, the provider, except to the extent specifically prohibited by any law of this state or of the United States, shall supply to the officer a copy of any of the requested records the provider possesses. If the health care provider does not possess any of the requested records, the provider shall give the officer a written statement that indicates that the provider does not possess any of the requested records. (b) If a health care provider possesses any records of the type described in division (B)(2)(a) of this section regarding the person in question at any time relevant to the criminal offense in question, in lieu of personally testifying as to the results of the test in question, the custodian of the records may submit a certified copy of the records, and, upon its submission, the certified copy is qualified as authentic evidence and may be admitted as evidence in accordance with the Rules of Evidence. Division (A) of section 2317.422 of the Revised Code does not apply to any certified copy of records submitted in accordance with this division. Nothing in this division shall be construed to limit the right of any party to call as a witness the person who administered the test to which the records pertain, the person under whose supervision the test was administered, the custodian of the records, the person who made the records, or the person under whose supervision the records were made. (3)(a) If the testimonial privilege described in division (B)(1) of this section does not apply as provided in division (B)(1)(a)(iii) of this section, a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist may be compelled to testify or to submit to discovery under the Rules of Civil Procedure only as to a communication made to the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist by the patient in question in that relation, or the advice of the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist given to the patient in question, that related causally or historically to physical or mental injuries that are relevant to issues in the medical claim, dental claim, chiropractic claim, or optometric claim, action for wrongful death, other civil action, or claim under Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code. (b) If the testimonial privilege described in division (B)(1) of this section does not apply to a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist as provided in division (B)(1)(c) of this section, the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist, in lieu of personally testifying as to the results of the test in question, may submit a certified copy of those results, and, upon its submission, the certified copy is qualified as authentic evidence and may be admitted as evidence in accordance with the Rules of Evidence. Division (A) of section 2317.422 of the Revised Code does not apply to any certified copy of results submitted in accordance with this division. Nothing in this division shall be construed to limit the right of any party to call as a witness the person who administered the test in question, the person under whose supervision the test was administered, the custodian of the results of the test, the person who compiled the results, or the person under whose supervision the results were compiled. (4) The testimonial privilege described in division (B)(1) of this section is not waived when a communication is made by a physician or advanced practice registered nurse to a pharmacist or when there is communication between a patient and a pharmacist in furtherance of the physician-patient or advanced practice registered nurse-patient relation. (5)(a) As used in divisions (B)(1) to (4) of this section, "communication" means acquiring, recording, or transmitting any information, in any manner, concerning any facts, opinions, or statements necessary to enable a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist to diagnose, treat, prescribe, or act for a patient. A "communication" may include, but is not limited to, any medical or dental, office, or hospital communication such as a record, chart, letter, memorandum, laboratory test and results, x-ray, photograph, financial statement, diagnosis, or prognosis. (b) As used in division (B)(2) of this section, "health care provider" means a hospital, ambulatory care facility, long-term care facility, pharmacy, emergency facility, or health care practitioner. (c) As used in division (B)(5)(b) of this section: (i) "Ambulatory care facility" means a facility that provides medical, diagnostic, or surgical treatment to patients who do not require hospitalization, including a dialysis center, ambulatory surgical facility, cardiac catheterization facility, diagnostic imaging center, extracorporeal shock wave lithotripsy center, home health agency, inpatient hospice, birthing center, radiation therapy center, emergency facility, and an urgent care center. "Ambulatory health care facility" does not include the private office of a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist, whether the office is for an individual or group practice. (ii) "Emergency facility" means a hospital emergency department or any other facility that provides emergency medical services. (iii) "Health care practitioner" has the same meaning as in section 4769.01 of the Revised Code. (iv) "Hospital" has the same meaning as in section 3727.01 of the Revised Code. (v) "Long-term care facility" means a nursing home, residential care facility, or home for the aging, as those terms are defined in section 3721.01 of the Revised Code; a residential facility licensed under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code that provides accommodations, supervision, and personal care services for three to sixteen unrelated adults; a nursing facility, as defined in section 5165.01 of the Revised Code; a skilled nursing facility, as defined in section 5165.01 of the Revised Code; and an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities, as defined in section 5124.01 of the Revised Code. (vi) "Pharmacy" has the same meaning as in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code. (d) As used in divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section, "drug of abuse" has the same meaning as in section 4506.01 of the Revised Code. (6) Divisions (B)(1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this section apply to doctors of medicine, doctors of osteopathic medicine, doctors of podiatry, advanced practice registered nurses, and dentists. (7) Nothing in divisions (B)(1) to (6) of this section affects, or shall be construed as affecting, the immunity from civil liability conferred by section 307.628 of the Revised Code or the immunity from civil liability conferred by section 2305.33 of the Revised Code upon physicians or advanced practice registered nurses who report an employee's use of a drug of abuse, or a condition of an employee other than one involving the use of a drug of abuse, to the employer of the employee in accordance with division (B) of that section. As used in division (B)(7) of this section, "employee," "employer," and "physician" have the same meanings as in section 2305.33 of the Revised Code and "advanced practice registered nurse" has the same meaning as in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) A cleric, when the cleric remains accountable to the authority of that cleric's church, denomination, or sect, concerning a confession made, or any information confidentially communicated, to the cleric for a religious counseling purpose in the cleric's professional character. The cleric may testify by express consent of the person making the communication, except when the disclosure of the information is in violation of a sacred trust and except that, if the person voluntarily testifies or is deemed by division (A)(4)(c) of section 2151.421 of the Revised Code to have waived any testimonial privilege under this division, the cleric may be compelled to testify on the same subject except when disclosure of the information is in violation of a sacred trust. (2) As used in division (C) of this section: (a) "Cleric" means a member of the clergy, rabbi, priest, Christian Science practitioner, or regularly ordained, accredited, or licensed minister of an established and legally cognizable church, denomination, or sect. (b) "Sacred trust" means a confession or confidential communication made to a cleric in the cleric's ecclesiastical capacity in the course of discipline enjoined by the church to which the cleric belongs, including, but not limited to, the Catholic Church, if both of the following apply: (i) The confession or confidential communication was made directly to the cleric. (ii) The confession or confidential communication was made in the manner and context that places the cleric specifically and strictly under a level of confidentiality that is considered inviolate by canon law or church doctrine. (D) Husband or wife, concerning any communication made by one to the other, or an act done by either in the presence of the other, during coverture, unless the communication was made, or act done, in the known presence or hearing of a third person competent to be a witness; and such rule is the same if the marital relation has ceased to exist; (E) A person who assigns a claim or interest, concerning any matter in respect to which the person would not, if a party, be permitted to testify; (F) A person who, if a party, would be restricted under section 2317.03 of the Revised Code, when the property or thing is sold or transferred by an executor, administrator, guardian, trustee, heir, devisee, or legatee, shall be restricted in the same manner in any action or proceeding concerning the property or thing. (G)(1) A school guidance counselor who holds a valid educator license from the state board of education as provided for in section 3319.22 of the Revised Code, a person licensed under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code as a licensed professional clinical counselor, licensed professional counselor, social worker, independent social worker, marriage and family therapist or independent marriage and family therapist, or registered under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code as a social work assistant concerning a confidential communication received from a client in that relation or the person's advice to a client unless any of the following applies: (a) The communication or advice indicates clear and present danger to the client or other persons. For the purposes of this division, cases in which there are indications of present or past child abuse or neglect of the client constitute a clear and present danger. (b) The client gives express consent to the testimony. (c) If the client is deceased, the surviving spouse or the executor or administrator of the estate of the deceased client gives express consent. (d) The client voluntarily testifies, in which case the school guidance counselor or person licensed or registered under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code may be compelled to testify on the same subject. (e) The court in camera determines that the information communicated by the client is not germane to the counselor-client, marriage and family therapist-client, or social worker-client relationship. (f) A court, in an action brought against a school, its administration, or any of its personnel by the client, rules after an in-camera inspection that the testimony of the school guidance counselor is relevant to that action. (g) The testimony is sought in a civil action and concerns court-ordered treatment or services received by a patient as part of a case plan journalized under section 2151.412 of the Revised Code or the court-ordered treatment or services are necessary or relevant to dependency, neglect, or abuse or temporary or permanent custody proceedings under Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code. (2) Nothing in division (G)(1) of this section shall relieve a school guidance counselor or a person licensed or registered under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code from the requirement to report information concerning child abuse or neglect under section 2151.421 of the Revised Code. (H) A mediator acting under a mediation order issued under division (A) of section 3109.052 of the Revised Code or otherwise issued in any proceeding for divorce, dissolution, legal separation, annulment, or the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children, in any action or proceeding, other than a criminal, delinquency, child abuse, child neglect, or dependent child action or proceeding, that is brought by or against either parent who takes part in mediation in accordance with the order and that pertains to the mediation process, to any information discussed or presented in the mediation process, to the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the parents' children, or to the awarding of parenting time rights in relation to their children; (I) A communications assistant, acting within the scope of the communication assistant's authority, when providing telecommunications relay service pursuant to section 4931.06 of the Revised Code or Title II of the "Communications Act of 1934," 104 Stat. 366 (1990), 47 U.S.C. 225, concerning a communication made through a telecommunications relay service. Nothing in this section shall limit the obligation of a communications assistant to divulge information or testify when mandated by federal law or regulation or pursuant to subpoena in a criminal proceeding. Nothing in this section shall limit any immunity or privilege granted under federal law or regulation. (J)(1) A chiropractor in a civil proceeding concerning a communication made to the chiropractor by a patient in that relation or the chiropractor's advice to a patient, except as otherwise provided in this division. The testimonial privilege established under this division does not apply, and a chiropractor may testify or may be compelled to testify, in any civil action, in accordance with the discovery provisions of the Rules of Civil Procedure in connection with a civil action, or in connection with a claim under Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code, under any of the following circumstances: (a) If the patient or the guardian or other legal representative of the patient gives express consent. (b) If the patient is deceased, the spouse of the patient or the executor or administrator of the patient's estate gives express consent. (c) If a medical claim, dental claim, chiropractic claim, or optometric claim, as defined in section 2305.113 of the Revised Code, an action for wrongful death, any other type of civil action, or a claim under Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code is filed by the patient, the personal representative of the estate of the patient if deceased, or the patient's guardian or other legal representative. (2) If the testimonial privilege described in division (J)(1) of this section does not apply as provided in division (J)(1)(c) of this section, a chiropractor may be compelled to testify or to submit to discovery under the Rules of Civil Procedure only as to a communication made to the chiropractor by the patient in question in that relation, or the chiropractor's advice to the patient in question, that related causally or historically to physical or mental injuries that are relevant to issues in the medical claim, dental claim, chiropractic claim, or optometric claim, action for wrongful death, other civil action, or claim under Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code. (3) The testimonial privilege established under this division does not apply, and a chiropractor may testify or be compelled to testify, in any criminal action or administrative proceeding. (4) As used in this division, "communication" means acquiring, recording, or transmitting any information, in any manner, concerning any facts, opinions, or statements necessary to enable a chiropractor to diagnose, treat, or act for a patient. A communication may include, but is not limited to, any chiropractic, office, or hospital communication such as a record, chart, letter, memorandum, laboratory test and results, x-ray, photograph, financial statement, diagnosis, or prognosis. (K)(1) Except as provided under division (K)(2) of this section, a critical incident stress management team member concerning a communication received from an individual who receives crisis response services from the team member, or the team member's advice to the individual, during a debriefing session. (2) The testimonial privilege established under division (K)(1) of this section does not apply if any of the following are true: (a) The communication or advice indicates clear and present danger to the individual who receives crisis response services or to other persons. For purposes of this division, cases in which there are indications of present or past child abuse or neglect of the individual constitute a clear and present danger. (b) The individual who received crisis response services gives express consent to the testimony. (c) If the individual who received crisis response services is deceased, the surviving spouse or the executor or administrator of the estate of the deceased individual gives express consent. (d) The individual who received crisis response services voluntarily testifies, in which case the team member may be compelled to testify on the same subject. (e) The court in camera determines that the information communicated by the individual who received crisis response services is not germane to the relationship between the individual and the team member. (f) The communication or advice pertains or is related to any criminal act. (3) As used in division (K) of this section: (a) "Crisis response services" means consultation, risk assessment, referral, and on-site crisis intervention services provided by a critical incident stress management team to individuals affected by crisis or disaster. (b) "Critical incident stress management team member" or "team member" means an individual specially trained to provide crisis response services as a member of an organized community or local crisis response team that holds membership in the Ohio critical incident stress management network. (c) "Debriefing session" means a session at which crisis response services are rendered by a critical incident stress management team member during or after a crisis or disaster. (L)(1) Subject to division (L)(2) of this section and except as provided in division (L)(3) of this section, an employee assistance professional, concerning a communication made to the employee assistance professional by a client in the employee assistance professional's official capacity as an employee assistance professional. (2) Division (L)(1) of this section applies to an employee assistance professional who meets either or both of the following requirements: (a) Is certified by the employee assistance certification commission to engage in the employee assistance profession; (b) Has education, training, and experience in all of the following: (i) Providing workplace-based services designed to address employer and employee productivity issues; (ii) Providing assistance to employees and employees' dependents in identifying and finding the means to resolve personal problems that affect the employees or the employees' performance; (iii) Identifying and resolving productivity problems associated with an employee's concerns about any of the following matters: health, marriage, family, finances, substance abuse or other addiction, workplace, law, and emotional issues; (iv) Selecting and evaluating available community resources; (v) Making appropriate referrals; (vi) Local and national employee assistance agreements; (vii) Client confidentiality. (3) Division (L)(1) of this section does not apply to any of the following: (a) A criminal action or proceeding involving an offense under sections 2903.01 to 2903.06 of the Revised Code if the employee assistance professional's disclosure or testimony relates directly to the facts or immediate circumstances of the offense; (b) A communication made by a client to an employee assistance professional that reveals the contemplation or commission of a crime or serious, harmful act; (c) A communication that is made by a client who is an unemancipated minor or an adult adjudicated to be incompetent and indicates that the client was the victim of a crime or abuse; (d) A civil proceeding to determine an individual's mental competency or a criminal action in which a plea of not guilty by reason of insanity is entered; (e) A civil or criminal malpractice action brought against the employee assistance professional; (f) When the employee assistance professional has the express consent of the client or, if the client is deceased or disabled, the client's legal representative; (g) When the testimonial privilege otherwise provided by division (L)(1) of this section is abrogated under law. Sec. 2701.07. When, in the opinion of the court, the business thereof so requires, each court of common pleas, court of appeals, and, in counties having at the last or any future federal census more than seventy thousand inhabitants, the probate court, may appoint one or more constables to preserve order, attend the assignment of cases in counties where more than two judges of the court of common pleas regularly hold court at the same time, and discharge such other duties as the court requires. When so directed by the court, each constable has the same powers as sheriffs to call and impanel jurors, except in capital cases. Sec. 2743.51. As used in sections 2743.51 to 2743.72 of the Revised Code: (A) "Claimant" means both of the following categories of persons: (1) Any of the following persons who claim an award of reparations under sections 2743.51 to 2743.72 of the Revised Code: (a) A victim who was one of the following at the time of the criminally injurious conduct: (i) A resident of the United States; (ii) A resident of a foreign country the laws of which permit residents of this state to recover compensation as victims of offenses committed in that country. (b) A dependent of a deceased victim who is described in division (A)(1)(a) of this section; (c) A third person, other than a collateral source, who legally assumes or voluntarily pays the obligations of a victim, or of a dependent of a victim, who is described in division (A)(1)(a) of this section, which obligations are incurred as a result of the criminally injurious conduct that is the subject of the claim and may include, but are not limited to, medical or burial expenses; (d) A person who is authorized to act on behalf of any person who is described in division (A)(1)(a), (b), or (c) of this section; (e) The estate of a deceased victim who is described in division (A)(1)(a) of this section. (2) Any of the following persons who claim an award of reparations under sections 2743.51 to 2743.72 of the Revised Code: (a) A victim who had a permanent place of residence within this state at the time of the criminally injurious conduct and who, at the time of the criminally injurious conduct, complied with any one of the following: (i) Had a permanent place of employment in this state; (ii) Was a member of the regular armed forces of the United States or of the United States coast guard or was a full-time member of the Ohio organized militia or of the United States army reserve, naval reserve, or air force reserve; (iii) Was retired and receiving social security or any other retirement income; (iv) Was sixty years of age or older; (v) Was temporarily in another state for the purpose of receiving medical treatment; (vi) Was temporarily in another state for the purpose of performing employment-related duties required by an employer located within this state as an express condition of employment or employee benefits; (vii) Was temporarily in another state for the purpose of receiving occupational, vocational, or other job-related training or instruction required by an employer located within this state as an express condition of employment or employee benefits; (viii) Was a full-time student at an academic institution, college, or university located in another state; (ix) Had not departed the geographical boundaries of this state for a period exceeding thirty days or with the intention of becoming a citizen of another state or establishing a permanent place of residence in another state. (b) A dependent of a deceased victim who is described in division (A)(2)(a) of this section; (c) A third person, other than a collateral source, who legally assumes or voluntarily pays the obligations of a victim, or of a dependent of a victim, who is described in division (A)(2)(a) of this section, which obligations are incurred as a result of the criminally injurious conduct that is the subject of the claim and may include, but are not limited to, medical or burial expenses; (d) A person who is authorized to act on behalf of any person who is described in division (A)(2)(a), (b), or (c) of this section; (e) The estate of a deceased victim who is described in division (A)(2)(a) of this section. (B) "Collateral source" means a source of benefits or advantages for economic loss otherwise reparable that the victim or claimant has received, or that is readily available to the victim or claimant, from any of the following sources: (1) The offender; (2) The government of the United States or any of its agencies, a state or any of its political subdivisions, or an instrumentality of two or more states, unless the law providing for the benefits or advantages makes them excess or secondary to benefits under sections 2743.51 to 2743.72 of the Revised Code; (3) Social security, medicare, and medicaid; (4) State-required, temporary, nonoccupational disability insurance; (5) Workers' compensation; (6) Wage continuation programs of any employer; (7) Proceeds of a contract of insurance payable to the victim for loss that the victim sustained because of the criminally injurious conduct; (8) A contract providing prepaid hospital and other health care services, or benefits for disability; (9) That portion of the proceeds of all contracts of insurance payable to the claimant on account of the death of the victim that exceeds fifty thousand dollars; (10) Any compensation recovered or recoverable under the laws of another state, district, territory, or foreign country because the victim was the victim of an offense committed in that state, district, territory, or country. "Collateral source" does not include any money, or the monetary value of any property, that is subject to sections 2969.01 to 2969.06 of the Revised Code or that is received as a benefit from the Ohio public safety officers death benefit fund created by section 742.62 of the Revised Code. (C) "Criminally injurious conduct" means one of the following: (1) For the purposes of any person described in division (A)(1) of this section, any conduct that occurs or is attempted in this state; poses a substantial threat of personal injury or death; and is punishable by fine, or imprisonment, or death, or would be so punishable but for the fact that the person engaging in the conduct lacked capacity to commit the crime under the laws of this state. Criminally injurious conduct does not include conduct arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle, except when any of the following applies: (a) The person engaging in the conduct intended to cause personal injury or death; (b) The person engaging in the conduct was using the vehicle to flee immediately after committing a felony or an act that would constitute a felony but for the fact that the person engaging in the conduct lacked the capacity to commit the felony under the laws of this state; (c) The person engaging in the conduct was using the vehicle in a manner that constitutes an OVI violation; (d) The conduct occurred on or after July 25, 1990, and the person engaging in the conduct was using the vehicle in a manner that constitutes a violation of section 2903.08 of the Revised Code; (e) The person engaging in the conduct acted in a manner that caused serious physical harm to a person and that constituted a violation of section 4549.02 or 4549.021 of the Revised Code. (2) For the purposes of any person described in division (A)(2) of this section, any conduct that occurs or is attempted in another state, district, territory, or foreign country; poses a substantial threat of personal injury or death; and is punishable by fine, imprisonment, or death, or would be so punishable but for the fact that the person engaging in the conduct lacked capacity to commit the crime under the laws of the state, district, territory, or foreign country in which the conduct occurred or was attempted. Criminally injurious conduct does not include conduct arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle, except when any of the following applies: (a) The person engaging in the conduct intended to cause personal injury or death; (b) The person engaging in the conduct was using the vehicle to flee immediately after committing a felony or an act that would constitute a felony but for the fact that the person engaging in the conduct lacked the capacity to commit the felony under the laws of the state, district, territory, or foreign country in which the conduct occurred or was attempted; (c) The person engaging in the conduct was using the vehicle in a manner that constitutes an OVI violation; (d) The conduct occurred on or after July 25, 1990, the person engaging in the conduct was using the vehicle in a manner that constitutes a violation of any law of the state, district, territory, or foreign country in which the conduct occurred, and that law is substantially similar to a violation of section 2903.08 of the Revised Code; (e) The person engaging in the conduct acted in a manner that caused serious physical harm to a person and that constituted a violation of any law of the state, district, territory, or foreign country in which the conduct occurred, and that law is substantially similar to section 4549.02 or 4549.021 of the Revised Code. (3) For the purposes of any person described in division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, terrorism that occurs within or outside the territorial jurisdiction of the United States. (D) "Dependent" means an individual wholly or partially dependent upon the victim for care and support, and includes a child of the victim born after the victim's death. (E) "Economic loss" means economic detriment consisting only of allowable expense, work loss, funeral expense, unemployment benefits loss, replacement services loss, cost of crime scene cleanup, and cost of evidence replacement. If criminally injurious conduct causes death, economic loss includes a dependent's economic loss and a dependent's replacement services loss. Noneconomic detriment is not economic loss; however, economic loss may be caused by pain and suffering or physical impairment. (F)(1) For a victim described in division (L)(1) of this section, "allowable expense" means reasonable charges incurred for reasonably needed products, services, and accommodations, including those for medical care, rehabilitation, rehabilitative occupational training, and other remedial treatment and care and including replacement costs for hearing aids; dentures, retainers, and other dental appliances; canes, walkers, and other mobility tools; and eyeglasses and other corrective lenses. It does not include that portion of a charge for a room in a hospital, clinic, convalescent home, nursing home, or any other institution engaged in providing nursing care and related services in excess of a reasonable and customary charge for semiprivate accommodations, unless accommodations other than semiprivate accommodations are medically required. (2) For a victim described in division (L)(2) of this section, "allowable expense" means reasonable charges incurred for psychiatric care or counseling reasonably needed as a result of the criminally injurious conduct. No other type of expense is compensable under section 2743.51 to 2743.72 of the Revised Code for a victim of that type. (3) For a victim described in division (L)(3) of this section, "allowable expense" means work loss and reasonable charges incurred for psychiatric care or counseling reasonably needed as a result of the criminally injurious conduct. No other type of expense is compensable under sections 2743.51 to 2743.72 of the Revised Code for a victim of that type. (4) A family member of a victim who died as a proximate result of criminally injurious conduct may be reimbursed as an allowable expense through the victim's application for wages lost and travel expenses incurred in order to attend criminal justice proceedings arising from the criminally injurious conduct. The cumulative allowable expense for wages lost and travel expenses incurred by a family member to attend criminal justice proceedings shall not exceed five hundred dollars for each family member of the victim and two thousand dollars in the aggregate for all family members of the victim. (5) For a victim described in division (L)(1) of this section, "allowable expense" includes both of the following: (a) Reasonable expenses and fees necessary to obtain a guardian's bond pursuant to section 2109.04 of the Revised Code when the bond is required to pay an award to a fiduciary on behalf of a minor or other incompetent; (b) Attorney's fees not exceeding one thousand dollars, at a rate not exceeding one hundred dollars per hour, incurred to successfully obtain a restraining order, custody order, or other order to physically separate a victim from an offender. Attorney's fees for the services described in this division may include an amount for reasonable travel time incurred to attend court hearings, not exceeding three hours' round-trip for each court hearing, assessed at a rate not exceeding thirty dollars per hour. (G) "Work loss" means loss of income from work that the injured person would have performed if the person had not been injured and expenses reasonably incurred by the person to obtain services in lieu of those the person would have performed for income, reduced by any income from substitute work actually performed by the person, or by income the person would have earned in available appropriate substitute work that the person was capable of performing but unreasonably failed to undertake. (H) "Replacement services loss" means expenses reasonably incurred in obtaining ordinary and necessary services in lieu of those the injured person would have performed, not for income, but for the benefit of the person's self or family, if the person had not been injured. (I) "Dependent's economic loss" means loss after a victim's death of contributions of things of economic value to the victim's dependents, not including services they would have received from the victim if the victim had not suffered the fatal injury, less expenses of the dependents avoided by reason of the victim's death. If a minor child of a victim is adopted after the victim's death, the minor child continues after the adoption to incur a dependent's economic loss as a result of the victim's death. If the surviving spouse of a victim remarries, the surviving spouse continues after the remarriage to incur a dependent's economic loss as a result of the victim's death. (J) "Dependent's replacement services loss" means loss reasonably incurred by dependents after a victim's death in obtaining ordinary and necessary services in lieu of those the victim would have performed for their benefit if the victim had not suffered the fatal injury, less expenses of the dependents avoided by reason of the victim's death and not subtracted in calculating the dependent's economic loss. If a minor child of a victim is adopted after the victim's death, the minor child continues after the adoption to incur a dependent's replacement services loss as a result of the victim's death. If the surviving spouse of a victim remarries, the surviving spouse continues after the remarriage to incur a dependent's replacement services loss as a result of the victim's death. (K) "Noneconomic detriment" means pain, suffering, inconvenience, physical impairment, or other nonpecuniary damage. (L) "Victim" means one of the following: (1) A person who suffers personal injury or death as a result of any of the following: (a) Criminally injurious conduct; (b) The good faith effort of any person to prevent criminally injurious conduct; (c) The good faith effort of any person to apprehend a person suspected of engaging in criminally injurious conduct. (2) A person who is an immediate family member of a victim of criminally injurious conduct that consists of a homicide, a sexual assault, domestic violence, or a severe and permanently incapacitating injury resulting in paraplegia or a similar life-altering condition, who requires psychiatric care or counseling as a result of the criminally injurious conduct; (3) A person who suffers trauma so severe that it impedes or prohibits a person from participating in normal daily activities and who is either of the following: (a) A family member of a victim of criminally injurious conduct that consists of a homicide, or a family member of a victim who, as a result of criminally injurious conduct, has sustained a severe and permanently incapacitating injury resulting in paraplegia or a similar life-altering condition, and who can demonstrate either of the following by a preponderance of the evidence: (i) The person witnessed the criminally injurious conduct. (ii) The person arrived at the crime scene in its immediate aftermath. (b) An immediate family member who is a caretaker of a dependent victim of criminally injurious conduct that consists of a sexual assault. (M) "Contributory misconduct" means any conduct of the claimant or of the victim through whom the claimant claims an award of reparations that is unlawful or intentionally tortious and to which all of the following apply: (1) The conduct occurred at the time of the criminally injurious conduct that is the basis of the claim. (2) The conduct itself caused or posed a substantial and imminent threat of causing serious physical harm or death to another. (3) The conduct instigated or proximately caused the criminally injurious conduct that is the basis of the claim. (N)(1) "Funeral expense" means any reasonable charges that are not in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars per funeral and that are incurred for expenses directly related to a victim's funeral, cremation, or burial and any wages lost or travel expenses incurred by a family member of a victim in order to attend the victim's funeral, cremation, or burial. (2) An award for funeral expenses shall be applied first to expenses directly related to the victim's funeral, cremation, or burial. An award for wages lost or travel expenses incurred by a family member of the victim shall not exceed five hundred dollars for each family member and shall not exceed in the aggregate the difference between seven thousand five hundred dollars and expenses that are reimbursed by the program and that are directly related to the victim's funeral, cremation, or burial. (O) "Unemployment benefits loss" means a loss of unemployment benefits pursuant to Chapter 4141. of the Revised Code when the loss arises solely from the inability of a victim to meet the able to work, available for suitable work, or the actively seeking suitable work requirements of division (A)(4)(a) of section 4141.29 of the Revised Code. (P) "OVI violation" means any of the following: (1) A violation of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code, of any municipal ordinance prohibiting the operation of a vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, a drug of abuse, or a combination of them, or of any municipal ordinance prohibiting the operation of a vehicle with a prohibited concentration of alcohol, a controlled substance, or a metabolite of a controlled substance in the whole blood, blood serum or plasma, breath, or urine; (2) A violation of division (A)(1) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code; (3) A violation of division (A)(2), (3), or (4) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code or of a municipal ordinance substantially similar to any of those divisions, if the offender was under the influence of alcohol, a drug of abuse, or a combination of them, at the time of the commission of the offense; (4) For purposes of any person described in division (A)(2) of this section, a violation of any law of the state, district, territory, or foreign country in which the criminally injurious conduct occurred, if that law is substantially similar to a violation described in division (P)(1) or (2) of this section or if that law is substantially similar to a violation described in division (P)(3) of this section and the offender was under the influence of alcohol, a drug of abuse, or a combination of them, at the time of the commission of the offense. (Q) "Pendency of the claim" for an original reparations application or supplemental reparations application means the period of time from the date the criminally injurious conduct upon which the application is based occurred until the date a final decision, order, or judgment concerning that original reparations application or supplemental reparations application is issued. (R) "Terrorism" means any activity to which all of the following apply: (1) The activity involves a violent act or an act that is dangerous to human life. (2) The act described in division (R)(1) of this section is committed within the territorial jurisdiction of the United States and is a violation of the criminal laws of the United States, this state, or any other state or the act described in division (R)(1) of this section is committed outside the territorial jurisdiction of the United States and would be a violation of the criminal laws of the United States, this state, or any other state if committed within the territorial jurisdiction of the United States. (3) The activity appears to be intended to do any of the following: (a) Intimidate or coerce a civilian population; (b) Influence the policy of any government by intimidation or coercion; (c) Affect the conduct of any government by assassination or kidnapping. (4) The activity occurs primarily outside the territorial jurisdiction of the United States or transcends the national boundaries of the United States in terms of the means by which the activity is accomplished, the person or persons that the activity appears intended to intimidate or coerce, or the area or locale in which the perpetrator or perpetrators of the activity operate or seek asylum. (S) "Transcends the national boundaries of the United States" means occurring outside the territorial jurisdiction of the United States in addition to occurring within the territorial jurisdiction of the United States. (T) "Cost of crime scene cleanup" means any of the following: (1) The replacement cost for items of clothing removed from a victim in order to make an assessment of possible physical harm or to treat physical harm; (2) Reasonable and necessary costs of cleaning the scene and repairing, for the purpose of personal security, property damaged at the scene where the criminally injurious conduct occurred, not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars in the aggregate per claim. (U) "Cost of evidence replacement" means costs for replacement of property confiscated for evidentiary purposes related to the criminally injurious conduct, not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars in the aggregate per claim. (V) "Provider" means any person who provides a victim or claimant with a product, service, or accommodations that are an allowable expense or a funeral expense. (W) "Immediate family member" means an individual who resided in the same permanent household as a victim at the time of the criminally injurious conduct and who is related to the victim by affinity or consanguinity. (X) "Family member" means an individual who is related to a victim by affinity or consanguinity. Sec. 2901.02. As used in the Revised Code: (A) Offenses include aggravated murder, murder, felonies of the first, second, third, fourth, and fifth degree, misdemeanors of the first, second, third, and fourth degree, minor misdemeanors, and offenses not specifically classified. (B) Aggravated murder when the indictment or the count in the indictment charging aggravated murder contains one or more specifications of aggravating circumstances listed in division (A) of section 2929.04 of Revised Code, and any other offense for which death may be imposed as a penalty, is a capital offense. (C) Aggravated murder and murder are felonies. (D) (C) Regardless of the penalty that may be imposed, any offense specifically classified as a felony is a felony, and any offense specifically classified as a misdemeanor is a misdemeanor. (E) (D) Any offense not specifically classified is a felony if imprisonment for more than one year may be imposed as a penalty. (F) (E) Any offense not specifically classified is a misdemeanor if imprisonment for not more than one year may be imposed as a penalty. (G) (F) Any offense not specifically classified is a minor misdemeanor if the only penalty that may be imposed is one of the following: (1) For an offense committed prior to January 1, 2004, a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars; (2) For an offense committed on or after January 1, 2004, a fine not exceeding one hundred fifty dollars, community service under division (D) of section 2929.27 of the Revised Code, or a financial sanction other than a fine under section 2929.28 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2909.24. (A) No person shall commit a specified offense with purpose to do any of the following: (1) Intimidate or coerce a civilian population; (2) Influence the policy of any government by intimidation or coercion; (3) Affect the conduct of any government by the specified offense. (B)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of terrorism. (2) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (B)(3) and (4) of this section, terrorism is an offense one degree higher than the most serious underlying specified offense the defendant committed. (3) Except as provided in division (B)(6) of this section, if the most serious underlying specified offense the defendant committed is a felony of the first degree or murder, the person shall be sentenced to life imprisonment without parole. (4) Except as provided in division (B)(6) of this section, if the most serious underlying specified offense the defendant committed is aggravated murder, the offender shall be sentenced to life imprisonment without parole or death pursuant to sections 2929.02 to 2929.06 of the Revised Code. (5) Section 2909.25 of the Revised Code applies regarding an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of this section. (6) If a person commits a violation of this section, if the most serious underlying specified offense the offender committed is aggravated murder, murder, or a felony of the first degree, and if the offender was under eighteen years of age at the time of the violation, the offender shall not be sentenced to life imprisonment without parole, but instead the offender shall be sentenced to an indefinite prison term of thirty years to life. Sec. 2929.02. (A) Whoever Except as provided in division (C) of this section, whoever is convicted of or pleads guilty to aggravated murder in violation of section 2903.01 of the Revised Code shall suffer death or be imprisoned for life, as determined pursuant to sections 2929.022, 2929.03, and 2929.04 of the Revised Codesentenced to life imprisonment with parole eligibility after serving twenty full years of imprisonment, life imprisonment with parole eligibility after serving thirty full years of imprisonment, or life imprisonment without parole, except that no person who is not found to have been eighteen years of age or older at the time of the commission of the offense shall be imprisoned for life without parole, and that no person who raises the matter of age pursuant to section 2929.023 of the Revised Code and who is not found to have been eighteen years of age or older at the time of the commission of the offense and no person who raises the matter of the person's serious mental illness at the time of the alleged commission of the offense pursuant to section 2929.025 of the Revised Code and is found under that section to be ineligible for a sentence of death due to serious mental illness shall suffer death. In addition, the offender may be fined an amount fixed by the court, but not more than twenty-five thousand dollars. (B)(1) (B) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2) or (3) (C) of this section, whoever is convicted of or pleads guilty to murder in violation of section 2903.02 of the Revised Code shall be imprisoned for an indefinite term of fifteen years to life. (2)(C)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(3) (C)(2) of this section, if a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to aggravated murder in violation of section 2903.01 of the Revised Code or to murder in violation of section 2903.02 of the Revised Code, the victim of the offense was less than thirteen years of age, and the offender also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a sexual motivation specification that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense, the court shall impose an indefinite prison term of thirty years to life pursuant to division (B)(3) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (3)(2) Except as otherwise provided in this division, if a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to aggravated murder in violation of section 2903.01 of the Revised Code or to murder in violation of section 2903.02 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a sexual motivation specification and a sexually violent predator specification that were included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information that charged the murder, the court shall impose upon the offender a term of life imprisonment without parole that shall be served pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. If the offender was under eighteen years of age at the time of the offense, the court shall impose an indefinite prison term of thirty years to life. (4)(D) In addition to the prison term imposed under this section, the offender may be fined an amount fixed by the court, but not more than twenty-five thousand dollars for aggravated murder or fifteen thousand dollars for murder. (C)(E) If an offender receives or received a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, a sentence of life imprisonment, a definite sentence, or a sentence to an indefinite prison term under this chapter for an aggravated murder or murder that was committed when the offender was under eighteen years of age, the offender's parole eligibility shall be determined under section 2967.132 of the Revised Code. (D)(F) The court shall not impose a fine or fines for aggravated murder or murder whichthat, in the aggregate and to the extent not suspended by the court, exceeds the amount which that the offender is or will be able to pay by the method and within the time allowed without undue hardship to the offender or to the dependents of the offender, or will prevent the offender from making reparation for the victim's wrongful death. (E)(1)(G)(1) In addition to any other sanctions imposed for a violation of section 2903.01 or 2903.02 of the Revised Code, if the offender used a motor vehicle as the means to commit the violation, the court shall impose upon the offender a class two suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege as specified in division (A)(2) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. (2) As used in division (E)(G) of this section, "motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2929.13. (A) Except as provided in division (E), (F), or (G) of this section and unless a specific sanction is required to be imposed or is precluded from being imposed pursuant to law, a court that imposes a sentence upon an offender for a felony may impose any sanction or combination of sanctions on the offender that are provided in sections 2929.14 to 2929.18 of the Revised Code. If the offender is eligible to be sentenced to community control sanctions, the court shall consider the appropriateness of imposing a financial sanction pursuant to section 2929.18 of the Revised Code or a sanction of community service pursuant to section 2929.17 of the Revised Code as the sole sanction for the offense. Except as otherwise provided in this division, if the court is required to impose a mandatory prison term for the offense for which sentence is being imposed, the court also shall impose any financial sanction pursuant to section 2929.18 of the Revised Code that is required for the offense and may impose any other financial sanction pursuant to that section but may not impose any additional sanction or combination of sanctions under section 2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code. If the offender is being sentenced for a fourth degree felony OVI offense or for a third degree felony OVI offense, in addition to the mandatory term of local incarceration or the mandatory prison term required for the offense by division (G)(1) or (2) of this section, the court shall impose upon the offender a mandatory fine in accordance with division (B)(3) of section 2929.18 of the Revised Code and may impose whichever of the following is applicable: (1) For a fourth degree felony OVI offense for which sentence is imposed under division (G)(1) of this section, an additional community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions under section 2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code. If the court imposes upon the offender a community control sanction and the offender violates any condition of the community control sanction, the court may take any action prescribed in division (B) of section 2929.15 of the Revised Code relative to the offender, including imposing a prison term on the offender pursuant to that division. (2) For a third or fourth degree felony OVI offense for which sentence is imposed under division (G)(2) of this section, an additional prison term as described in division (B)(4) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code or a community control sanction as described in division (G)(2) of this section. (B)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (B)(1)(b) of this section, if an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony of the fourth or fifth degree that is not an offense of violence or that is a qualifying assault offense, the court shall sentence the offender to a community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions if all of the following apply: (i) The offender previously has not been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony offense. (ii) The most serious charge against the offender at the time of sentencing is a felony of the fourth or fifth degree. (iii) The offender previously has not been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a misdemeanor offense of violence that the offender committed within two years prior to the offense for which sentence is being imposed. (b) The court has discretion to impose a prison term upon an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony of the fourth or fifth degree that is not an offense of violence or that is a qualifying assault offense if any of the following apply: (i) The offender committed the offense while having a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control. (ii) If the offense is a qualifying assault offense, the offender caused serious physical harm to another person while committing the offense, and, if the offense is not a qualifying assault offense, the offender caused physical harm to another person while committing the offense. (iii) The offender violated a term of the conditions of bond as set by the court. (iv) The offense is a sex offense that is a fourth or fifth degree felony violation of any provision of Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code. (v) In committing the offense, the offender attempted to cause or made an actual threat of physical harm to a person with a deadly weapon. (vi) In committing the offense, the offender attempted to cause or made an actual threat of physical harm to a person, and the offender previously was convicted of an offense that caused physical harm to a person. (vii) The offender held a public office or position of trust, and the offense related to that office or position; the offender's position obliged the offender to prevent the offense or to bring those committing it to justice; or the offender's professional reputation or position facilitated the offense or was likely to influence the future conduct of others. (viii) The offender committed the offense for hire or as part of an organized criminal activity. (ix) The offender at the time of the offense was serving, or the offender previously had served, a prison term. (x) The offender committed the offense while under a community control sanction, while on probation, or while released from custody on a bond or personal recognizance. (c) A sentencing court may impose an additional penalty under division (B) of section 2929.15 of the Revised Code upon an offender sentenced to a community control sanction under division (B)(1)(a) of this section if the offender violates the conditions of the community control sanction, violates a law, or leaves the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. (2) If division (B)(1) of this section does not apply, except as provided in division (E), (F), or (G) of this section, in determining whether to impose a prison term as a sanction for a felony of the fourth or fifth degree, the sentencing court shall comply with the purposes and principles of sentencing under section 2929.11 of the Revised Code and with section 2929.12 of the Revised Code. (C) Except as provided in division (D), (E), (F), or (G) of this section, in determining whether to impose a prison term as a sanction for a felony of the third degree or a felony drug offense that is a violation of a provision of Chapter 2925. of the Revised Code and that is specified as being subject to this division for purposes of sentencing, the sentencing court shall comply with the purposes and principles of sentencing under section 2929.11 of the Revised Code and with section 2929.12 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) Except as provided in division (E) or (F) of this section, for a felony of the first or second degree, for a felony drug offense that is a violation of any provision of Chapter 2925., 3719., or 4729. of the Revised Code for which a presumption in favor of a prison term is specified as being applicable, and for a violation of division (A)(4) or (B) of section 2907.05 of the Revised Code for which a presumption in favor of a prison term is specified as being applicable, it is presumed that a prison term is necessary in order to comply with the purposes and principles of sentencing under section 2929.11 of the Revised Code. Division (D)(2) of this section does not apply to a presumption established under this division for a violation of division (A)(4) of section 2907.05 of the Revised Code. (2) Notwithstanding the presumption established under division (D)(1) of this section for the offenses listed in that division other than a violation of division (A)(4) or (B) of section 2907.05 of the Revised Code, the sentencing court may impose a community control sanction or a combination of community control sanctions instead of a prison term on an offender for a felony of the first or second degree or for a felony drug offense that is a violation of any provision of Chapter 2925., 3719., or 4729. of the Revised Code for which a presumption in favor of a prison term is specified as being applicable if it makes both of the following findings: (a) A community control sanction or a combination of community control sanctions would adequately punish the offender and protect the public from future crime, because the applicable factors under section 2929.12 of the Revised Code indicating a lesser likelihood of recidivism outweigh the applicable factors under that section indicating a greater likelihood of recidivism. (b) A community control sanction or a combination of community control sanctions would not demean the seriousness of the offense, because one or more factors under section 2929.12 of the Revised Code that indicate that the offender's conduct was less serious than conduct normally constituting the offense are applicable, and they outweigh the applicable factors under that section that indicate that the offender's conduct was more serious than conduct normally constituting the offense. (E)(1) Except as provided in division (F) of this section, for any drug offense that is a violation of any provision of Chapter 2925. of the Revised Code and that is a felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree, the applicability of a presumption under division (D) of this section in favor of a prison term or of division (B) or (C) of this section in determining whether to impose a prison term for the offense shall be determined as specified in section 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.11, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, 2925.36, or 2925.37 of the Revised Code, whichever is applicable regarding the violation. (2) If an offender who was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony violates the conditions of a community control sanction imposed for the offense solely by reason of producing positive results on a drug test, the court, as punishment for the violation of the sanction, shall not order that the offender be imprisoned unless the court determines on the record either of the following: (a) The offender had been ordered as a sanction for the felony to participate in a drug treatment program, in a drug education program, or in narcotics anonymous or a similar program, and the offender continued to use illegal drugs after a reasonable period of participation in the program. (b) The imprisonment of the offender for the violation is consistent with the purposes and principles of sentencing set forth in section 2929.11 of the Revised Code. (3) A court that sentences an offender for a drug abuse offense that is a felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree may require that the offender be assessed by a properly credentialed professional within a specified period of time. The court shall require the professional to file a written assessment of the offender with the court. If the offender is eligible for a community control sanction and after considering the written assessment, the court may impose a community control sanction that includes addiction services and recovery supports included in a community-based continuum of care established under section 340.032 of the Revised Code. If the court imposes addiction services and recovery supports as a community control sanction, the court shall direct the level and type of addiction services and recovery supports after considering the assessment and recommendation of community addiction services providers. (F) Notwithstanding divisions (A) to (E) of this section, the court shall impose a prison term or terms under sections section 2929.02 to 2929.06, section 2929.14, section 2929.142, or section 2971.03 of the Revised Code and except as specifically provided in section 2929.20, or section 2967.191 of the Revised Code or when parole is authorized for the offense under section 2967.13 of the Revised Code shall not reduce the term or terms pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code for any of the following offenses: (1) Aggravated murder when death is not imposed or murder; (2) Any rape, regardless of whether force was involved and regardless of the age of the victim, or an attempt to commit rape if, had the offender completed the rape that was attempted, the offender would have been guilty of a violation of division (A)(1)(b) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code and would be sentenced under section 2971.03 of the Revised Code; (3) Gross sexual imposition or sexual battery, if the victim is less than thirteen years of age and if any of the following applies: (a) Regarding gross sexual imposition, the offender previously was convicted of or pleaded guilty to rape, the former offense of felonious sexual penetration, gross sexual imposition, or sexual battery, and the victim of the previous offense was less than thirteen years of age; (b) Regarding gross sexual imposition, the offense was committed on or after August 3, 2006, and evidence other than the testimony of the victim was admitted in the case corroborating the violation. (c) Regarding sexual battery, either of the following applies: (i) The offense was committed prior to August 3, 2006, the offender previously was convicted of or pleaded guilty to rape, the former offense of felonious sexual penetration, or sexual battery, and the victim of the previous offense was less than thirteen years of age. (ii) The offense was committed on or after August 3, 2006. (4) A felony violation of section 2903.04, 2903.06, 2903.08, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2905.32, 2907.07, 2921.321, or 2923.132 of the Revised Code if the section requires the imposition of a prison term; (5) A first, second, or third degree felony drug offense for which section 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.11, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, 2925.36, 2925.37, 3719.99, or 4729.99 of the Revised Code, whichever is applicable regarding the violation, requires the imposition of a mandatory prison term; (6) Any offense that is a first or second degree felony and that is not set forth in division (F)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section, if the offender previously was convicted of or pleaded guilty to aggravated murder, murder, any first or second degree felony, or an offense under an existing or former law of this state, another state, or the United States that is or was substantially equivalent to one of those offenses; (7) Any offense that is a third degree felony and either is a violation of section 2903.04 of the Revised Code or an attempt to commit a felony of the second degree that is an offense of violence and involved an attempt to cause serious physical harm to a person or that resulted in serious physical harm to a person if the offender previously was convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following offenses: (a) Aggravated murder, murder, involuntary manslaughter, rape, felonious sexual penetration as it existed under section 2907.12 of the Revised Code prior to September 3, 1996, a felony of the first or second degree that resulted in the death of a person or in physical harm to a person, or complicity in or an attempt to commit any of those offenses; (b) An offense under an existing or former law of this state, another state, or the United States that is or was substantially equivalent to an offense listed in division (F)(7)(a) of this section that resulted in the death of a person or in physical harm to a person. (8) Any offense, other than a violation of section 2923.12 of the Revised Code, that is a felony, if the offender had a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the felony, with respect to a portion of the sentence imposed pursuant to division (B)(1)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for having the firearm; (9) Any offense of violence that is a felony, if the offender wore or carried body armor while committing the felony offense of violence, with respect to the portion of the sentence imposed pursuant to division (B)(1)(d) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for wearing or carrying the body armor; (10) Corrupt activity in violation of section 2923.32 of the Revised Code when the most serious offense in the pattern of corrupt activity that is the basis of the offense is a felony of the first degree; (11) Any violent sex offense or designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense if, in relation to that offense, the offender is adjudicated a sexually violent predator; (12) A violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2921.36 of the Revised Code, or a violation of division (C) of that section involving an item listed in division (A)(1) or (2) of that section, if the offender is an officer or employee of the department of rehabilitation and correction; (13) A violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code if the victim of the offense is a peace officer, as defined in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code, or an investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, as defined in section 2903.11 of the Revised Code, with respect to the portion of the sentence imposed pursuant to division (B)(5) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code; (14) A violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code if the offender has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more violations of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or an equivalent offense, as defined in section 2941.1415 of the Revised Code, or three or more violations of any combination of those offenses, with respect to the portion of the sentence imposed pursuant to division (B)(6) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code; (15) Kidnapping, in the circumstances specified in section 2971.03 of the Revised Code and when no other provision of division (F) of this section applies; (16) Kidnapping, abduction, compelling prostitution, promoting prostitution, engaging in a pattern of corrupt activity, a violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2907.323 of the Revised Code that involves a minor, or endangering children in violation of division (B)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of section 2919.22 of the Revised Code, if the offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification as described in section 2941.1422 of the Revised Code that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense; (17) A felony violation of division (A) or (B) of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code if division (D)(3), (4), or (5) of that section, and division (D)(6) of that section, require the imposition of a prison term; (18) A felony violation of section 2903.11, 2903.12, or 2903.13 of the Revised Code, if the victim of the offense was a woman that the offender knew was pregnant at the time of the violation, with respect to a portion of the sentence imposed pursuant to division (B)(8) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code; (19)(a) Any violent felony offense if the offender is a violent career criminal and had a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control during the commission of the violent felony offense and displayed or brandished the firearm, indicated that the offender possessed a firearm, or used the firearm to facilitate the offense, with respect to the portion of the sentence imposed under division (K) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (b) As used in division (F)(19)(a) of this section, "violent career criminal" and "violent felony offense" have the same meanings as in section 2923.132 of the Revised Code. (20) Any violation of division (A)(1) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code if the offender used an accelerant in committing the violation and the serious physical harm to another or another's unborn caused by the violation resulted in a permanent, serious disfigurement or permanent, substantial incapacity or any violation of division (A)(2) of that section if the offender used an accelerant in committing the violation, the violation caused physical harm to another or another's unborn, and the physical harm resulted in a permanent, serious disfigurement or permanent, substantial incapacity, with respect to a portion of the sentence imposed pursuant to division (B)(9) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. The provisions of this division and of division (D)(2) of section 2903.11, divisions (B)(9) and (C)(6) of section 2929.14, and section 2941.1425 of the Revised Code shall be known as "Judy's Law." (21) Any violation of division (A) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code if the victim of the offense suffered permanent disabling harm as a result of the offense and the victim was under ten years of age at the time of the offense, with respect to a portion of the sentence imposed pursuant to division (B)(10) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (22) A felony violation of section 2925.03, 2925.05, or 2925.11 of the Revised Code, if the drug involved in the violation is a fentanyl-related compound or a compound, mixture, preparation, or substance containing a fentanyl-related compound and the offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in division (B) of section 2941.1410 of the Revised Code that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense, with respect to the portion of the sentence imposed under division (B)(11) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (G) Notwithstanding divisions (A) to (E) of this section, if an offender is being sentenced for a fourth degree felony OVI offense or for a third degree felony OVI offense, the court shall impose upon the offender a mandatory term of local incarceration or a mandatory prison term in accordance with the following: (1) If the offender is being sentenced for a fourth degree felony OVI offense and if the offender has not been convicted of and has not pleaded guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1413 of the Revised Code, the court may impose upon the offender a mandatory term of local incarceration of sixty days or one hundred twenty days as specified in division (G)(1)(d) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code. The court shall not reduce the term pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of the Revised Code. The court that imposes a mandatory term of local incarceration under this division shall specify whether the term is to be served in a jail, a community-based correctional facility, a halfway house, or an alternative residential facility, and the offender shall serve the term in the type of facility specified by the court. A mandatory term of local incarceration imposed under division (G)(1) of this section is not subject to any other Revised Code provision that pertains to a prison term except as provided in division (A)(1) of this section. (2) If the offender is being sentenced for a third degree felony OVI offense, or if the offender is being sentenced for a fourth degree felony OVI offense and the court does not impose a mandatory term of local incarceration under division (G)(1) of this section, the court shall impose upon the offender a mandatory prison term of one, two, three, four, or five years if the offender also is convicted of or also pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1413 of the Revised Code or shall impose upon the offender a mandatory prison term of sixty days or one hundred twenty days as specified in division (G)(1)(d) or (e) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code if the offender has not been convicted of and has not pleaded guilty to a specification of that type. The court shall not reduce the term pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of the Revised Code. The offender shall serve the one-, two-, three-, four-, or five-year mandatory prison term consecutively to and prior to the prison term imposed for the underlying offense and consecutively to any other mandatory prison term imposed in relation to the offense. In no case shall an offender who once has been sentenced to a mandatory term of local incarceration pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section for a fourth degree felony OVI offense be sentenced to another mandatory term of local incarceration under that division for any violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code. In addition to the mandatory prison term described in division (G)(2) of this section, the court may sentence the offender to a community control sanction under section 2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code, but the offender shall serve the prison term prior to serving the community control sanction. The department of rehabilitation and correction may place an offender sentenced to a mandatory prison term under this division in an intensive program prison established pursuant to section 5120.033 of the Revised Code if the department gave the sentencing judge prior notice of its intent to place the offender in an intensive program prison established under that section and if the judge did not notify the department that the judge disapproved the placement. Upon the establishment of the initial intensive program prison pursuant to section 5120.033 of the Revised Code that is privately operated and managed by a contractor pursuant to a contract entered into under section 9.06 of the Revised Code, both of the following apply: (a) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall make a reasonable effort to ensure that a sufficient number of offenders sentenced to a mandatory prison term under this division are placed in the privately operated and managed prison so that the privately operated and managed prison has full occupancy. (b) Unless the privately operated and managed prison has full occupancy, the department of rehabilitation and correction shall not place any offender sentenced to a mandatory prison term under this division in any intensive program prison established pursuant to section 5120.033 of the Revised Code other than the privately operated and managed prison. (H) If an offender is being sentenced for a sexually oriented offense or child-victim oriented offense that is a felony committed on or after January 1, 1997, the judge shall require the offender to submit to a DNA specimen collection procedure pursuant to section 2901.07 of the Revised Code. (I) If an offender is being sentenced for a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense committed on or after January 1, 1997, the judge shall include in the sentence a summary of the offender's duties imposed under sections 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, and 2950.06 of the Revised Code and the duration of the duties. The judge shall inform the offender, at the time of sentencing, of those duties and of their duration. If required under division (A)(2) of section 2950.03 of the Revised Code, the judge shall perform the duties specified in that section, or, if required under division (A)(6) of section 2950.03 of the Revised Code, the judge shall perform the duties specified in that division. (J)(1) Except as provided in division (J)(2) of this section, when considering sentencing factors under this section in relation to an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to an attempt to commit an offense in violation of section 2923.02 of the Revised Code, the sentencing court shall consider the factors applicable to the felony category of the violation of section 2923.02 of the Revised Code instead of the factors applicable to the felony category of the offense attempted. (2) When considering sentencing factors under this section in relation to an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to an attempt to commit a drug abuse offense for which the penalty is determined by the amount or number of unit doses of the controlled substance involved in the drug abuse offense, the sentencing court shall consider the factors applicable to the felony category that the drug abuse offense attempted would be if that drug abuse offense had been committed and had involved an amount or number of unit doses of the controlled substance that is within the next lower range of controlled substance amounts than was involved in the attempt. (K) As used in this section: (1) "Community addiction services provider" has the same meaning as in section 5119.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Drug abuse offense" has the same meaning as in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Minor drug possession offense" has the same meaning as in section 2925.11 of the Revised Code. (4) "Qualifying assault offense" means a violation of section 2903.13 of the Revised Code for which the penalty provision in division (C)(8)(b) or (C)(9)(b) of that section applies. (L) At the time of sentencing an offender for any sexually oriented offense, if the offender is a tier III sex offender/child-victim offender relative to that offense and the offender does not serve a prison term or jail term, the court may require that the offender be monitored by means of a global positioning device. If the court requires such monitoring, the cost of monitoring shall be borne by the offender. If the offender is indigent, the cost of compliance shall be paid by the crime victims reparations fund. Sec. 2929.14. (A) Except as provided in division (B)(1), (B)(2), (B)(3), (B)(4), (B)(5), (B)(6), (B)(7), (B)(8), (B)(9), (B)(10), (B)(11), (E), (G), (H), (J), or (K) of this section or in division (D)(6) of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code and except in relation to an offense for which a sentence of death or life imprisonment is to be imposed, if the court imposing a sentence upon an offender for a felony elects or is required to impose a prison term on the offender pursuant to this chapter, the court shall impose a prison term that shall be one of the following: (1)(a) For a felony of the first degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the prison term shall be an indefinite prison term with a stated minimum term selected by the court of three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten, or eleven years and a maximum term that is determined pursuant to section 2929.144 of the Revised Code, except that if the section that criminalizes the conduct constituting the felony specifies a different minimum term or penalty for the offense, the specific language of that section shall control in determining the minimum term or otherwise sentencing the offender but the minimum term or sentence imposed under that specific language shall be considered for purposes of the Revised Code as if it had been imposed under this division. (b) For a felony of the first degree committed prior to March 22, 2019, the prison term shall be a definite prison term of three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten, or eleven years. (2)(a) For a felony of the second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the prison term shall be an indefinite prison term with a stated minimum term selected by the court of two, three, four, five, six, seven, or eight years and a maximum term that is determined pursuant to section 2929.144 of the Revised Code, except that if the section that criminalizes the conduct constituting the felony specifies a different minimum term or penalty for the offense, the specific language of that section shall control in determining the minimum term or otherwise sentencing the offender but the minimum term or sentence imposed under that specific language shall be considered for purposes of the Revised Code as if it had been imposed under this division. (b) For a felony of the second degree committed prior to March 22, 2019, the prison term shall be a definite term of two, three, four, five, six, seven, or eight years. (3)(a) For a felony of the third degree that is a violation of section 2903.06, 2903.08, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, or 3795.04 of the Revised Code, that is a violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (A) of that section that was a felony, that is a violation of section 2911.02 or 2911.12 of the Revised Code if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty in two or more separate proceedings to two or more violations of section 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, or 2911.12 of the Revised Code, or that is a violation of division (B) of section 2921.331 of the Revised Code if division (C)(5) of that section applies, the prison term shall be a definite term of twelve, eighteen, twenty-four, thirty, thirty-six, forty-two, forty-eight, fifty-four, or sixty months. (b) For a felony of the third degree that is not an offense for which division (A)(3)(a) of this section applies, the prison term shall be a definite term of nine, twelve, eighteen, twenty-four, thirty, or thirty-six months. (4) For a felony of the fourth degree, the prison term shall be a definite term of six, seven, eight, nine, ten, eleven, twelve, thirteen, fourteen, fifteen, sixteen, seventeen, or eighteen months. (5) For a felony of the fifth degree, the prison term shall be a definite term of six, seven, eight, nine, ten, eleven, or twelve months. (B)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (B)(1)(e) of this section, if an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.141, 2941.144, or 2941.145 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose on the offender one of the following prison terms: (i) A prison term of six years if the specification is of the type described in division (A) of section 2941.144 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having a firearm that is an automatic firearm or that was equipped with a firearm muffler or suppressor on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the offense; (ii) A prison term of three years if the specification is of the type described in division (A) of section 2941.145 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the offense and displaying the firearm, brandishing the firearm, indicating that the offender possessed the firearm, or using it to facilitate the offense; (iii) A prison term of one year if the specification is of the type described in division (A) of section 2941.141 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the offense; (iv) A prison term of nine years if the specification is of the type described in division (D) of section 2941.144 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having a firearm that is an automatic firearm or that was equipped with a firearm muffler or suppressor on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the offense and specifies that the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.141, 2941.144, 2941.145, 2941.146, or 2941.1412 of the Revised Code; (v) A prison term of fifty-four months if the specification is of the type described in division (D) of section 2941.145 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the offense and displaying the firearm, brandishing the firearm, indicating that the offender possessed the firearm, or using the firearm to facilitate the offense and that the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.141, 2941.144, 2941.145, 2941.146, or 2941.1412 of the Revised Code; (vi) A prison term of eighteen months if the specification is of the type described in division (D) of section 2941.141 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the offense and that the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.141, 2941.144, 2941.145, 2941.146, or 2941.1412 of the Revised Code. (b) If a court imposes a prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(a) of this section, the prison term shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. Except as provided in division (B)(1)(g) of this section, a court shall not impose more than one prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(a) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act or transaction. (c)(i) Except as provided in division (B)(1)(e) of this section, if an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2923.161 of the Revised Code or to a felony that includes, as an essential element, purposely or knowingly causing or attempting to cause the death of or physical harm to another, also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in division (A) of section 2941.146 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with committing the offense by discharging a firearm from a motor vehicle other than a manufactured home, the court, after imposing a prison term on the offender for the violation of section 2923.161 of the Revised Code or for the other felony offense under division (A), (B)(2), or (B)(3) of this section, shall impose an additional prison term of five years upon the offender that shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. (ii) Except as provided in division (B)(1)(e) of this section, if an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2923.161 of the Revised Code or to a felony that includes, as an essential element, purposely or knowingly causing or attempting to cause the death of or physical harm to another, also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in division (C) of section 2941.146 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with committing the offense by discharging a firearm from a motor vehicle other than a manufactured home and that the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.141, 2941.144, 2941.145, 2941.146, or 2941.1412 of the Revised Code, the court, after imposing a prison term on the offender for the violation of section 2923.161 of the Revised Code or for the other felony offense under division (A), (B)(2), or (3) of this section, shall impose an additional prison term of ninety months upon the offender that shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. (iii) A court shall not impose more than one additional prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(c) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act or transaction. If a court imposes an additional prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(c) of this section relative to an offense, the court also shall impose a prison term under division (B)(1)(a) of this section relative to the same offense, provided the criteria specified in that division for imposing an additional prison term are satisfied relative to the offender and the offense. (d) If an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to an offense of violence that is a felony also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1411 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with wearing or carrying body armor while committing the felony offense of violence, the court shall impose on the offender an additional prison term of two years. The prison term so imposed shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. A court shall not impose more than one prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(d) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act or transaction. If a court imposes an additional prison term under division (B)(1)(a) or (c) of this section, the court is not precluded from imposing an additional prison term under division (B)(1)(d) of this section. (e) The court shall not impose any of the prison terms described in division (B)(1)(a) of this section or any of the additional prison terms described in division (B)(1)(c) of this section upon an offender for a violation of section 2923.12 or 2923.123 of the Revised Code. The court shall not impose any of the prison terms described in division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section upon an offender for a violation of section 2923.122 that involves a deadly weapon that is a firearm other than a dangerous ordnance, section 2923.16, or section 2923.121 of the Revised Code. The court shall not impose any of the prison terms described in division (B)(1)(a) of this section or any of the additional prison terms described in division (B)(1)(c) of this section upon an offender for a violation of section 2923.13 of the Revised Code unless all of the following apply: (i) The offender previously has been convicted of aggravated murder, murder, or any felony of the first or second degree. (ii) Less than five years have passed since the offender was released from prison or post-release control, whichever is later, for the prior offense. (f)(i) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony that includes, as an essential element, causing or attempting to cause the death of or physical harm to another and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in division (A) of section 2941.1412 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with committing the offense by discharging a firearm at a peace officer as defined in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code or a corrections officer, as defined in section 2941.1412 of the Revised Code, the court, after imposing a prison term on the offender for the felony offense under division (A), (B)(2), or (B)(3) of this section, shall impose an additional prison term of seven years upon the offender that shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. (ii) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony that includes, as an essential element, causing or attempting to cause the death of or physical harm to another and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in division (B) of section 2941.1412 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with committing the offense by discharging a firearm at a peace officer, as defined in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code, or a corrections officer, as defined in section 2941.1412 of the Revised Code, and that the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.141, 2941.144, 2941.145, 2941.146, or 2941.1412 of the Revised Code, the court, after imposing a prison term on the offender for the felony offense under division (A), (B)(2), or (3) of this section, shall impose an additional prison term of one hundred twenty-six months upon the offender that shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or 5120. of the Revised Code. (iii) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to two or more felonies that include, as an essential element, causing or attempting to cause the death or physical harm to another and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described under division (B)(1)(f) of this section in connection with two or more of the felonies of which the offender is convicted or to which the offender pleads guilty, the sentencing court shall impose on the offender the prison term specified under division (B)(1)(f) of this section for each of two of the specifications of which the offender is convicted or to which the offender pleads guilty and, in its discretion, also may impose on the offender the prison term specified under that division for any or all of the remaining specifications. If a court imposes an additional prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(f) of this section relative to an offense, the court shall not impose a prison term under division (B)(1)(a) or (c) of this section relative to the same offense. (g) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to two or more felonies, if one or more of those felonies are aggravated murder, murder, attempted aggravated murder, attempted murder, aggravated robbery, felonious assault, or rape, and if the offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described under division (B)(1)(a) of this section in connection with two or more of the felonies, the sentencing court shall impose on the offender the prison term specified under division (B)(1)(a) of this section for each of the two most serious specifications of which the offender is convicted or to which the offender pleads guilty and, in its discretion, also may impose on the offender the prison term specified under that division for any or all of the remaining specifications. (2)(a) If division (B)(2)(b) of this section does not apply, the court may impose on an offender, in addition to the longest prison term authorized or required for the offense or, for offenses for which division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of this section applies, in addition to the longest minimum prison term authorized or required for the offense, an additional definite prison term of one, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, or ten years if all of the following criteria are met: (i) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.149 of the Revised Code that the offender is a repeat violent offender. (ii) The offense of which the offender currently is convicted or to which the offender currently pleads guilty is aggravated murder and the court does not impose a sentence of death or life imprisonment without parole, murder, terrorism and the court does not impose a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, any felony of the first degree that is an offense of violence and the court does not impose a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, or any felony of the second degree that is an offense of violence and the trier of fact finds that the offense involved an attempt to cause or a threat to cause serious physical harm to a person or resulted in serious physical harm to a person. (iii) The court imposes the longest prison term for the offense or the longest minimum prison term for the offense, whichever is applicable, that is not life imprisonment without parole. (iv) The court finds that the prison terms imposed pursuant to division (B)(2)(a)(iii) of this section and, if applicable, division (B)(1) or (3) of this section are inadequate to punish the offender and protect the public from future crime, because the applicable factors under section 2929.12 of the Revised Code indicating a greater likelihood of recidivism outweigh the applicable factors under that section indicating a lesser likelihood of recidivism. (v) The court finds that the prison terms imposed pursuant to division (B)(2)(a)(iii) of this section and, if applicable, division (B)(1) or (3) of this section are demeaning to the seriousness of the offense, because one or more of the factors under section 2929.12 of the Revised Code indicating that the offender's conduct is more serious than conduct normally constituting the offense are present, and they outweigh the applicable factors under that section indicating that the offender's conduct is less serious than conduct normally constituting the offense. (b) The court shall impose on an offender the longest prison term authorized or required for the offense or, for offenses for which division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of this section applies, the longest minimum prison term authorized or required for the offense, and shall impose on the offender an additional definite prison term of one, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, or ten years if all of the following criteria are met: (i) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.149 of the Revised Code that the offender is a repeat violent offender. (ii) The offender within the preceding twenty years has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more offenses described in division (CC)(1) of section 2929.01 of the Revised Code, including all offenses described in that division of which the offender is convicted or to which the offender pleads guilty in the current prosecution and all offenses described in that division of which the offender previously has been convicted or to which the offender previously pleaded guilty, whether prosecuted together or separately. (iii) The offense or offenses of which the offender currently is convicted or to which the offender currently pleads guilty is aggravated murder and the court does not impose a sentence of death or life imprisonment without parole, murder, terrorism and the court does not impose a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, any felony of the first degree that is an offense of violence and the court does not impose a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, or any felony of the second degree that is an offense of violence and the trier of fact finds that the offense involved an attempt to cause or a threat to cause serious physical harm to a person or resulted in serious physical harm to a person. (c) For purposes of division (B)(2)(b) of this section, two or more offenses committed at the same time or as part of the same act or event shall be considered one offense, and that one offense shall be the offense with the greatest penalty. (d) A sentence imposed under division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. The offender shall serve an additional prison term imposed under division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section consecutively to and prior to the prison term imposed for the underlying offense. (e) When imposing a sentence pursuant to division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, the court shall state its findings explaining the imposed sentence. (3) Except when an offender commits a violation of section 2903.01 or 2907.02 of the Revised Code and the penalty imposed for the violation is life imprisonment or commits a violation of section 2903.02 of the Revised Code, if the offender commits a violation of section 2925.03 or 2925.11 of the Revised Code and that section classifies the offender as a major drug offender, if the offender commits a violation of section 2925.05 of the Revised Code and division (E)(1) of that section classifies the offender as a major drug offender, if the offender commits a felony violation of section 2925.02, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.36, 3719.07, 3719.08, 3719.16, 3719.161, 4729.37, or 4729.61, division (C) or (D) of section 3719.172, division (E) of section 4729.51, or division (J) of section 4729.54 of the Revised Code that includes the sale, offer to sell, or possession of a schedule I or II controlled substance, with the exception of marihuana, and the court imposing sentence upon the offender finds that the offender is guilty of a specification of the type described in division (A) of section 2941.1410 of the Revised Code charging that the offender is a major drug offender, if the court imposing sentence upon an offender for a felony finds that the offender is guilty of corrupt activity with the most serious offense in the pattern of corrupt activity being a felony of the first degree, or if the offender is guilty of an attempted violation of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code and, had the offender completed the violation of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code that was attempted, the offender would have been subject to a sentence of life imprisonment or life imprisonment without parole for the violation of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose upon the offender for the felony violation a mandatory prison term determined as described in this division that cannot be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or 5120. of the Revised Code. The mandatory prison term shall be the maximum definite prison term prescribed in division (A)(1)(b) of this section for a felony of the first degree, except that for offenses for which division (A)(1)(a) of this section applies, the mandatory prison term shall be the longest minimum prison term prescribed in that division for the offense. (4) If the offender is being sentenced for a third or fourth degree felony OVI offense under division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, the sentencing court shall impose upon the offender a mandatory prison term in accordance with that division. In addition to the mandatory prison term, if the offender is being sentenced for a fourth degree felony OVI offense, the court, notwithstanding division (A)(4) of this section, may sentence the offender to a definite prison term of not less than six months and not more than thirty months, and if the offender is being sentenced for a third degree felony OVI offense, the sentencing court may sentence the offender to an additional prison term of any duration specified in division (A)(3) of this section. In either case, the additional prison term imposed shall be reduced by the sixty or one hundred twenty days imposed upon the offender as the mandatory prison term. The total of the additional prison term imposed under division (B)(4) of this section plus the sixty or one hundred twenty days imposed as the mandatory prison term shall equal a definite term in the range of six months to thirty months for a fourth degree felony OVI offense and shall equal one of the authorized prison terms specified in division (A)(3) of this section for a third degree felony OVI offense. If the court imposes an additional prison term under division (B)(4) of this section, the offender shall serve the additional prison term after the offender has served the mandatory prison term required for the offense. In addition to the mandatory prison term or mandatory and additional prison term imposed as described in division (B)(4) of this section, the court also may sentence the offender to a community control sanction under section 2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code, but the offender shall serve all of the prison terms so imposed prior to serving the community control sanction. If the offender is being sentenced for a fourth degree felony OVI offense under division (G)(1) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code and the court imposes a mandatory term of local incarceration, the court may impose a prison term as described in division (A)(1) of that section. (5) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1414 of the Revised Code that charges that the victim of the offense is a peace officer, as defined in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code, an investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, as defined in section 2903.11 of the Revised Code, or a firefighter or emergency medical worker, both as defined in section 2941.1414 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose on the offender a prison term of five years. If a court imposes a prison term on an offender under division (B)(5) of this section, the prison term shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. A court shall not impose more than one prison term on an offender under division (B)(5) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act. (6) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1415 of the Revised Code that charges that the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more violations of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or an equivalent offense, as defined in section 2941.1415 of the Revised Code, or three or more violations of any combination of those offenses, the court shall impose on the offender a prison term of three years. If a court imposes a prison term on an offender under division (B)(6) of this section, the prison term shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. A court shall not impose more than one prison term on an offender under division (B)(6) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act. (7)(a) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony violation of section 2905.01, 2905.02, 2907.21, 2907.22, or 2923.32, division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2907.323 involving a minor, or division (B)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of section 2919.22 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1422 of the Revised Code that charges that the offender knowingly committed the offense in furtherance of human trafficking, the court shall impose on the offender a mandatory prison term that is one of the following: (i) If the offense is a felony of the first degree, a definite prison term of not less than five years and not greater than eleven years, except that if the offense is a felony of the first degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the court shall impose as the minimum prison term a mandatory term of not less than five years and not greater than eleven years; (ii) If the offense is a felony of the second or third degree, a definite prison term of not less than three years and not greater than the maximum prison term allowed for the offense by division (A)(2)(b) or (3) of this section, except that if the offense is a felony of the second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the court shall impose as the minimum prison term a mandatory term of not less than three years and not greater than eight years; (iii) If the offense is a felony of the fourth or fifth degree, a definite prison term that is the maximum prison term allowed for the offense by division (A) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (b) The prison term imposed under division (B)(7)(a) of this section shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. of the Revised Code. A court shall not impose more than one prison term on an offender under division (B)(7)(a) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act, scheme, or plan. (8) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony violation of section 2903.11, 2903.12, or 2903.13 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1423 of the Revised Code that charges that the victim of the violation was a woman whom the offender knew was pregnant at the time of the violation, notwithstanding the range prescribed in division (A) of this section as the definite prison term or minimum prison term for felonies of the same degree as the violation, the court shall impose on the offender a mandatory prison term that is either a definite prison term of six months or one of the prison terms prescribed in division (A) of this section for felonies of the same degree as the violation, except that if the violation is a felony of the first or second degree committed on or after arch March 22, 2019, the court shall impose as the minimum prison term under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of this section a mandatory term that is one of the terms prescribed in that division, whichever is applicable, for the offense. (9)(a) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1425 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose on the offender a mandatory prison term of six years if either of the following applies: (i) The violation is a violation of division (A)(1) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code and the specification charges that the offender used an accelerant in committing the violation and the serious physical harm to another or to another's unborn caused by the violation resulted in a permanent, serious disfigurement or permanent, substantial incapacity; (ii) The violation is a violation of division (A)(2) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code and the specification charges that the offender used an accelerant in committing the violation, that the violation caused physical harm to another or to another's unborn, and that the physical harm resulted in a permanent, serious disfigurement or permanent, substantial incapacity. (b) If a court imposes a prison term on an offender under division (B)(9)(a) of this section, the prison term shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. A court shall not impose more than one prison term on an offender under division (B)(9) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act. (c) The provisions of divisions (B)(9) and (C)(6) of this section and of division (D)(2) of section 2903.11, division (F)(20) of section 2929.13, and section 2941.1425 of the Revised Code shall be known as "Judy's Law." (10) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1426 of the Revised Code that charges that the victim of the offense suffered permanent disabling harm as a result of the offense and that the victim was under ten years of age at the time of the offense, regardless of whether the offender knew the age of the victim, the court shall impose upon the offender an additional definite prison term of six years. A prison term imposed on an offender under division (B)(10) of this section shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or Chapter 5120. of the Revised Code. If a court imposes an additional prison term on an offender under this division relative to a violation of division (A) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code, the court shall not impose any other additional prison term on the offender relative to the same offense. (11) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony violation of section 2925.03 or 2925.05 of the Revised Code or a felony violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code for which division (C)(11) of that section applies in determining the sentence for the violation, if the drug involved in the violation is a fentanyl-related compound or a compound, mixture, preparation, or substance containing a fentanyl-related compound, and if the offender also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in division (B) of section 2941.1410 of the Revised Code that charges that the offender is a major drug offender, in addition to any other penalty imposed for the violation, the court shall impose on the offender a mandatory prison term of three, four, five, six, seven, or eight years. If a court imposes a prison term on an offender under division (B)(11) of this section, the prison term shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or 5120. of the Revised Code. A court shall not impose more than one prison term on an offender under division (B)(11) of this section for felonies committed as part of the same act. (C)(1)(a) Subject to division (C)(1)(b) of this section, if a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(1)(a) of this section for having a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing a felony, if a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(1)(c) of this section for committing a felony specified in that division by discharging a firearm from a motor vehicle, or if both types of mandatory prison terms are imposed, the offender shall serve any mandatory prison term imposed under either division consecutively to any other mandatory prison term imposed under either division or under division (B)(1)(d) of this section, consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying felony pursuant to division (A), (B)(2), or (B)(3) of this section or any other section of the Revised Code, and consecutively to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (b) If a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(1)(d) of this section for wearing or carrying body armor while committing an offense of violence that is a felony, the offender shall serve the mandatory term so imposed consecutively to any other mandatory prison term imposed under that division or under division (B)(1)(a) or (c) of this section, consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying felony under division (A), (B)(2), or (B)(3) of this section or any other section of the Revised Code, and consecutively to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (c) If a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(1)(f) of this section, the offender shall serve the mandatory prison term so imposed consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying felony under division (A), (B)(2), or (B)(3) of this section or any other section of the Revised Code, and consecutively to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (d) If a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(7) or (8) of this section, the offender shall serve the mandatory prison term so imposed consecutively to any other mandatory prison term imposed under that division or under any other provision of law and consecutively to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (e) If a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(11) of this section, the offender shall serve the mandatory prison term consecutively to any other mandatory prison term imposed under that division, consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying felony, and consecutively to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (2) If an offender who is an inmate in a jail, prison, or other residential detention facility violates section 2917.02, 2917.03, or 2921.35 of the Revised Code or division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2921.34 of the Revised Code, if an offender who is under detention at a detention facility commits a felony violation of section 2923.131 of the Revised Code, or if an offender who is an inmate in a jail, prison, or other residential detention facility or is under detention at a detention facility commits another felony while the offender is an escapee in violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2921.34 of the Revised Code, any prison term imposed upon the offender for one of those violations shall be served by the offender consecutively to the prison term or term of imprisonment the offender was serving when the offender committed that offense and to any other prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (3) If a prison term is imposed for a violation of division (B) of section 2911.01 of the Revised Code, a violation of division (A) of section 2913.02 of the Revised Code in which the stolen property is a firearm or dangerous ordnance, or a felony violation of division (B) of section 2921.331 of the Revised Code, the offender shall serve that prison term consecutively to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (4) If multiple prison terms are imposed on an offender for convictions of multiple offenses, the court may require the offender to serve the prison terms consecutively if the court finds that the consecutive service is necessary to protect the public from future crime or to punish the offender and that consecutive sentences are not disproportionate to the seriousness of the offender's conduct and to the danger the offender poses to the public, and if the court also finds any of the following: (a) The offender committed one or more of the multiple offenses while the offender was awaiting trial or sentencing, was under a sanction imposed pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code, or was under post-release control for a prior offense. (b) At least two of the multiple offenses were committed as part of one or more courses of conduct, and the harm caused by two or more of the multiple offenses so committed was so great or unusual that no single prison term for any of the offenses committed as part of any of the courses of conduct adequately reflects the seriousness of the offender's conduct. (c) The offender's history of criminal conduct demonstrates that consecutive sentences are necessary to protect the public from future crime by the offender. (5) If a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(5) or (6) of this section, the offender shall serve the mandatory prison term consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code pursuant to division (A) of this section or section 2929.142 of the Revised Code. If a mandatory prison term is imposed upon an offender pursuant to division (B)(5) of this section, and if a mandatory prison term also is imposed upon the offender pursuant to division (B)(6) of this section in relation to the same violation, the offender shall serve the mandatory prison term imposed pursuant to division (B)(5) of this section consecutively to and prior to the mandatory prison term imposed pursuant to division (B)(6) of this section and consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code pursuant to division (A) of this section or section 2929.142 of the Revised Code. (6) If a mandatory prison term is imposed on an offender pursuant to division (B)(9) of this section, the offender shall serve the mandatory prison term consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code and consecutively to and prior to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed on the offender. (7) If a mandatory prison term is imposed on an offender pursuant to division (B)(10) of this section, the offender shall serve that mandatory prison term consecutively to and prior to any prison term imposed for the underlying felonious assault. Except as otherwise provided in division (C) of this section, any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender may be served concurrently with, or consecutively to, the prison term imposed pursuant to division (B)(10) of this section. (8) Any prison term imposed for a violation of section 2903.04 of the Revised Code that is based on a violation of section 2925.03 or 2925.11 of the Revised Code or on a violation of section 2925.05 of the Revised Code that is not funding of marihuana trafficking shall run consecutively to any prison term imposed for the violation of section 2925.03 or 2925.11 of the Revised Code or for the violation of section 2925.05 of the Revised Code that is not funding of marihuana trafficking. (9) When consecutive prison terms are imposed pursuant to division (C)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), or (8) or division (H)(1) or (2) of this section, subject to division (C)(10) of this section, the term to be served is the aggregate of all of the terms so imposed. (10) When a court sentences an offender to a non-life felony indefinite prison term, any definite prison term or mandatory definite prison term previously or subsequently imposed on the offender in addition to that indefinite sentence that is required to be served consecutively to that indefinite sentence shall be served prior to the indefinite sentence. (11) If a court is sentencing an offender for a felony of the first or second degree, if division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of this section applies with respect to the sentencing for the offense, and if the court is required under the Revised Code section that sets forth the offense or any other Revised Code provision to impose a mandatory prison term for the offense, the court shall impose the required mandatory prison term as the minimum term imposed under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of this section, whichever is applicable. (D)(1) If a court imposes a prison term, other than a term of life imprisonment, for a felony of the first degree, for a felony of the second degree, for a felony sex offense, or for a felony of the third degree that is an offense of violence and that is not a felony sex offense, it shall include in the sentence a requirement that the offender be subject to a period of post-release control after the offender's release from imprisonment, in accordance with section 2967.28 of the Revised Code. If a court imposes a sentence including a prison term of a type described in this division on or after July 11, 2006, the failure of a court to include a post-release control requirement in the sentence pursuant to this division does not negate, limit, or otherwise affect the mandatory period of post-release control that is required for the offender under division (B) of section 2967.28 of the Revised Code. Section 2929.191 of the Revised Code applies if, prior to July 11, 2006, a court imposed a sentence including a prison term of a type described in this division and failed to include in the sentence pursuant to this division a statement regarding post-release control. (2) If a court imposes a prison term for a felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree that is not subject to division (D)(1) of this section, it shall include in the sentence a requirement that the offender be subject to a period of post-release control after the offender's release from imprisonment, in accordance with that division, if the parole board determines that a period of post-release control is necessary. Section 2929.191 of the Revised Code applies if, prior to July 11, 2006, a court imposed a sentence including a prison term of a type described in this division and failed to include in the sentence pursuant to this division a statement regarding post-release control. (E) The court shall impose sentence upon the offender in accordance with section 2971.03 of the Revised Code, and Chapter 2971. of the Revised Code applies regarding the prison term or term of life imprisonment without parole imposed upon the offender and the service of that term of imprisonment if any of the following apply: (1) A person is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violent sex offense or a designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense, and, in relation to that offense, the offender is adjudicated a sexually violent predator. (2) A person is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1)(b) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code committed on or after January 2, 2007, and either the court does not impose a sentence of life without parole when authorized pursuant to division (B) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code, or division (B) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code provides that the court shall not sentence the offender pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (3) A person is convicted of or pleads guilty to attempted rape committed on or after January 2, 2007, and a specification of the type described in section 2941.1418, 2941.1419, or 2941.1420 of the Revised Code. (4) A person is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2905.01 of the Revised Code committed on or after January 1, 2008, and that section requires the court to sentence the offender pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (5) A person is convicted of or pleads guilty to aggravated murder committed on or after January 1, 2008, and division (A)(2)(b)(ii) of section 2929.022, division (A)(1)(e), (C)(1)(a)(v), (C)(2)(a)(ii), (D)(2)(b), (D)(3)(a)(iv), or (E)(1)(a)(iv) of section 2929.03, or division (A) or (B)(C) of section 2929.06 2929.02 of the Revised Code requires the court to sentence the offender pursuant to division (B)(3) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (6) A person is convicted of or pleads guilty to murder committed on or after January 1, 2008, and division (B)(2)(C)(1) of section 2929.02 of the Revised Code requires the court to sentence the offender pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (F) If a person who has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony is sentenced to a prison term or term of imprisonment under this section, sections section 2929.02 to 2929.06 of the Revised Code, section 2929.142 of the Revised Code, section or 2971.03 of the Revised Code, or any other provision of law, section 5120.163 of the Revised Code applies regarding the person while the person is confined in a state correctional institution. (G) If an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony that is an offense of violence also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.142 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having committed the felony while participating in a criminal gang, the court shall impose upon the offender an additional prison term of one, two, or three years. (H)(1) If an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to aggravated murder, murder, or a felony of the first, second, or third degree that is an offense of violence also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.143 of the Revised Code that charges the offender with having committed the offense in a school safety zone or towards a person in a school safety zone, the court shall impose upon the offender an additional prison term of two years. The offender shall serve the additional two years consecutively to and prior to the prison term imposed for the underlying offense. (2)(a) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony violation of section 2907.22, 2907.24, 2907.241, or 2907.25 of the Revised Code and to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1421 of the Revised Code and if the court imposes a prison term on the offender for the felony violation, the court may impose upon the offender an additional prison term as follows: (i) Subject to division (H)(2)(a)(ii) of this section, an additional prison term of one, two, three, four, five, or six months; (ii) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one or more felony or misdemeanor violations of section 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.24, 2907.241, or 2907.25 of the Revised Code and also was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1421 of the Revised Code regarding one or more of those violations, an additional prison term of one, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten, eleven, or twelve months. (b) In lieu of imposing an additional prison term under division (H)(2)(a) of this section, the court may directly impose on the offender a sanction that requires the offender to wear a real-time processing, continual tracking electronic monitoring device during the period of time specified by the court. The period of time specified by the court shall equal the duration of an additional prison term that the court could have imposed upon the offender under division (H)(2)(a) of this section. A sanction imposed under this division shall commence on the date specified by the court, provided that the sanction shall not commence until after the offender has served the prison term imposed for the felony violation of section 2907.22, 2907.24, 2907.241, or 2907.25 of the Revised Code and any residential sanction imposed for the violation under section 2929.16 of the Revised Code. A sanction imposed under this division shall be considered to be a community control sanction for purposes of section 2929.15 of the Revised Code, and all provisions of the Revised Code that pertain to community control sanctions shall apply to a sanction imposed under this division, except to the extent that they would by their nature be clearly inapplicable. The offender shall pay all costs associated with a sanction imposed under this division, including the cost of the use of the monitoring device. (I) At the time of sentencing, the court may recommend the offender for placement in a program of shock incarceration under section 5120.031 of the Revised Code or for placement in an intensive program prison under section 5120.032 of the Revised Code, disapprove placement of the offender in a program of shock incarceration or an intensive program prison of that nature, or make no recommendation on placement of the offender. In no case shall the department of rehabilitation and correction place the offender in a program or prison of that nature unless the department determines as specified in section 5120.031 or 5120.032 of the Revised Code, whichever is applicable, that the offender is eligible for the placement. If the court disapproves placement of the offender in a program or prison of that nature, the department of rehabilitation and correction shall not place the offender in any program of shock incarceration or intensive program prison. If the court recommends placement of the offender in a program of shock incarceration or in an intensive program prison, and if the offender is subsequently placed in the recommended program or prison, the department shall notify the court of the placement and shall include with the notice a brief description of the placement. If the court recommends placement of the offender in a program of shock incarceration or in an intensive program prison and the department does not subsequently place the offender in the recommended program or prison, the department shall send a notice to the court indicating why the offender was not placed in the recommended program or prison. If the court does not make a recommendation under this division with respect to an offender and if the department determines as specified in section 5120.031 or 5120.032 of the Revised Code, whichever is applicable, that the offender is eligible for placement in a program or prison of that nature, the department shall screen the offender and determine if there is an available program of shock incarceration or an intensive program prison for which the offender is suited. If there is an available program of shock incarceration or an intensive program prison for which the offender is suited, the department shall notify the court of the proposed placement of the offender as specified in section 5120.031 or 5120.032 of the Revised Code and shall include with the notice a brief description of the placement. The court shall have ten days from receipt of the notice to disapprove the placement. (J) If a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to aggravated vehicular homicide in violation of division (A)(1) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code and division (B)(2)(c) of that section applies, the person shall be sentenced pursuant to section 2929.142 of the Revised Code. (K)(1) The court shall impose an additional mandatory prison term of two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten, or eleven years on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violent felony offense if the offender also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1424 of the Revised Code that charges that the offender is a violent career criminal and had a firearm on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control while committing the presently charged violent felony offense and displayed or brandished the firearm, indicated that the offender possessed a firearm, or used the firearm to facilitate the offense. The offender shall serve the prison term imposed under this division consecutively to and prior to the prison term imposed for the underlying offense. The prison term shall not be reduced pursuant to section 2929.20, division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194, or any other provision of Chapter 2967. or 5120. of the Revised Code. A court may not impose more than one sentence under division (B)(2)(a) of this section and this division for acts committed as part of the same act or transaction. (2) As used in division (K)(1) of this section, "violent career criminal" and "violent felony offense" have the same meanings as in section 2923.132 of the Revised Code. (L) If an offender receives or received a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, a sentence of life imprisonment, a definite sentence, or a sentence to an indefinite prison term under this chapter for a felony offense that was committed when the offender was under eighteen years of age, the offender's parole eligibility shall be determined under section 2967.132 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2929.61. (A) Persons charged with an offense that was formerly a capital offense and that was committed prior to January 1, 1974, shall be prosecuted under the law as it existed at the time the offense was committed, and, if convicted, shall be imprisoned for life, except that whenever the statute under which any such person is prosecuted provides for a lesser penalty under the circumstances of the particular case, such lesser penalty shall be imposed. (B) Persons charged with an offense, other than an offense that was formerly a capital offense, that was committed prior to January 1, 1974, shall be prosecuted under the law as it existed at the time the offense was committed. Persons convicted or sentenced on or after January 1, 1974, for an offense committed prior to January 1, 1974, shall be sentenced according to the penalty for commission of the substantially equivalent offense under Amended Substitute House Bill 511 of the 109th General Assembly. If the offense for which sentence is being imposed does not have a substantial equivalent under that act, or if that act provides a more severe penalty than that originally prescribed for the offense of which the person is convicted, then sentence shall be imposed under the law as it existed prior to January 1, 1974. (C) Persons charged with an offense that is a felony of the third or fourth degree and that was committed on or after January 1, 1974, and before July 1, 1983, shall be prosecuted under the law as it existed at the time the offense was committed. Persons convicted or sentenced on or after July 1, 1983, for an offense that is a felony of the third or fourth degree and that was committed on or after January 1, 1974, and before July 1, 1983, shall be notified by the court sufficiently in advance of sentencing that they may choose to be sentenced pursuant to either the law in effect at the time of the commission of the offense or the law in effect at the time of sentencing. This notice shall be written and shall include the differences between and possible effects of the alternative sentence forms and the effect of the person's refusal to choose. The person to be sentenced shall then inform the court in writing of the person's choice, and shall be sentenced accordingly. Any person choosing to be sentenced pursuant to the law in effect at the time of the commission of an offense that is a felony of the third or fourth degree shall then be eligible for parole, and this person cannot at a later date have the person's sentence converted to a definite sentence. If the person refuses to choose between the two possible sentences, the person shall be sentenced pursuant to the law in effect at the time of the commission of the offense. (D) Persons charged with an offense that was a felony of the first or second degree at the time it was committed, that was committed on or after January 1, 1974, and that was committed prior to July 1, 1983, shall be prosecuted for that offense and, if convicted, shall be sentenced under the law as it existed at the time the offense was committed. (E) Persons charged with an offense that is a felony of the first or second degree that was committed prior to the effective date March 22, 2019, of this amendment shall be prosecuted for that offense and, if convicted, shall be sentenced under the law as it existed at the time the offense was committed. Sec. 2930.19. (A)(1) A victim, victim's representative, or victim's attorney, if applicable, or the prosecutor, on request of the victim, has standing as a matter of right to assert, or to challenge an order denying, the rights of the victim provided by law in any judicial or administrative proceeding. The trial court shall act promptly on a request to enforce, or on a challenge of an order denying, the rights of the victim. In any case, the trial court shall hear the matter within ten days of the assertion of the victim's rights. The reasons for any decision denying relief under this section shall be clearly stated on the record or in a judgment entry. (2)(a) If the trial court denies the relief sought under division (A)(1) of this section, the trial court shall do all of the following: (i) Provide the victim, the victim's representative, if applicable, the victim's attorney, if applicable, and the parties with notice of the decision and a copy of the judgment entry; (ii) Provide the victim, the victim's representative, if applicable, and the victim's attorney, if applicable, with the following statement along with the judgment entry: "NOTICE The victim, the victim's attorney, if applicable, or the prosecutor on request of the victim, may appeal this decision or petition to the court of appeals for an extraordinary writ. If such an interlocutory appeal or extraordinary writ is sought while the case is still pending in the trial court, it shall be initiated no later than fourteen days after notice of the decision was provided to the victim by telephone or electronic mail to the latest telephone number or electronic mail address provided by the victim. The prosecutor or the prosecutor's designee shall provide the notice to the victim and the notice shall be memorialized in a manner sufficient to prove to the court the prosecutor or prosecutor's designee sent the notice. The court shall dismiss any such interlocutory appeal or petition as untimely if it does not comply with this fourteen-day limit." (b)(i) If the court denies the relief sought, the victim or the victim's attorney, if applicable, or the prosecutor on request of the victim, may appeal or, if the victim has no remedy on appeal, petition the court of appeals or supreme court for an extraordinary writ, and the victim has standing to assert a right of limited appeal as it pertains to the decisions impacting the rights of the victim. An interlocutory appeal filed under this section shall be filed not later than fourteen days after notice was provided to the victim as described in division (A)(1) of this section, and such an appeal divests the trial court of jurisdiction of the portion of the case implicating the victim's rights until the interlocutory appeal is resolved by the appellate court. (ii) Upon the filing of an interlocutory appeal, the trial court shall transmit those portions of the transcript necessary for consideration of the issues to be reviewed by the court of appeals within five business days. Once the transcript is received by the court of appeals, the party that initiated the appeal shall have eight days to file a merit brief. Once the merit brief is filed, the appellee shall have eight days to file a response brief. The court of appeals shall decide the entire appeal not later than thirty-five days after the appeal is filed. Notwithstanding these limits, the litigants, with the approval of the court, may stipulate to a different period of time for the briefing and issuance of the decision and judgment on the appeal. The victim, the victim's attorney, the prosecutor, or the defendant may notify the supreme court if a court of appeals has failed to issue a judgment in accordance with the stipulated period of time. Such notifications are public records. (iii) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as applying to a direct appeal that is filed after the court sentences the defendant. A victim who wishes to appeal from an order that is final on its entry after the court sentences the defendant shall file the notice of appeal within thirty days of that entry. (c) If the victim or victim's attorney, if applicable, petitions for an extraordinary writ, the court of appeals or the supreme court shall enter an order establishing an expedited schedule for the filing of an answer, the submission of evidence, the filing of briefing by the litigants, and the entry of decision and judgment and shall place the petition on its accelerated calendar. The court of appeals or the supreme court shall immediately notify the trial court of the petition, and the trial court shall transmit to the court of appeals or the supreme court those portions of the transcript necessary for the consideration of the issues to be reviewed by the applicable appellate court within five business days of the filing of the appeal or petition. The court shall enter judgment within forty-five days after the petition for an extraordinary writ is filed. Notwithstanding these limits, the litigants, with the approval of the court, may stipulate to a different period of time for the briefing and issuance of the decision and judgment in the action. The victim, the victim's attorney, the prosecutor, or the defendant may notify the supreme court if a court of appeals has failed to issue a judgment in accordance with the stipulated period of time. Such notifications are a public record. (d) If any interlocutory appeal is pursued to the supreme court, the supreme court shall enter an order establishing an expedited schedule for its proceedings, including, as applicable, the filing of jurisdictional memoranda and ruling thereon, the transmission of the record, the filing of briefing by the litigants, oral argument if permitted, and the entry of decision and judgment and shall place the appeal on its accelerated calendar. The court shall enter judgment within sixty days after the appeal is filed. The supreme court shall immediately notify the trial court of the appeal, and the trial court shall transmit to the court of appeals or the supreme court those portions of the transcript necessary for consideration of the issues to be reviewed by the applicable appellate court within five business days of the filing of the appeal. Notwithstanding these limits, the litigants, with the approval of the court, may stipulate to a different period of time for the supreme court's proceedings and for the issuance of the supreme court's decision and judgment in the case. (e) Nothing in this division applies to a direct appeal that is filed by the victim after the court sentences the defendant. A victim who wishes to appeal from an appellate entry shall file the appropriate notice of appeal to the supreme court within thirty days of the entry. (B)(1) A victim of a criminal offense or delinquent act has the right to be represented by an attorney. Nothing in this section creates a right to an attorney at public expense for a victim. If a victim is represented by an attorney, the court shall notify the victim's attorney in the same manner in which the parties are notified under applicable law or rule. The victim's attorney shall be included in all bench conferences, meetings in chambers, and sidebars with the trial court that directly involve a decision implicating that victim's rights as enumerated in Ohio Constitution, Article I, Section 10a. Nothing in this section shall be construed as making a victim a party to the case. (2) A defendant has a right to respond and be represented by an attorney for appeals and writs the victim, the victim's attorney, if applicable, or the prosecutor may file pursuant to this section. An indigent defendant has the right to appointed counsel for appeals and writs filed pursuant to this section. If, as an indigent person, a defendant is unable to employ counsel, the defendant is entitled to have counsel provided pursuant to Chapter 120. of the Revised Code. The court shall notify the defendant and the defendant's attorney in the same manner that the parties are notified under applicable law or rule. (C) The failure of a public official or public agency or the public official's or public agency's designee to comply with the requirements of this chapter does not give rise to a claim for damages against that public official or public agency or that public official's or public agency's designee, except that a public agency as an employer may be held responsible for a violation of section 2930.18 of the Revised Code. (D) The failure of any person or entity to provide a right, privilege, or notice to a victim under this chapter does not constitute grounds for declaring a mistrial or new trial, for setting aside a conviction, sentence, adjudication, or disposition, or for granting postconviction release to a defendant or alleged juvenile offender. (E) If there is a conflict between a provision in this chapter and a specific statute governing the procedure in a case involving a capital offense, the specific statute supersedes the provision in this chapter. (F) A defendant or juvenile offender may not raise the failure to afford a right to a victim as error in any legal argument to provide an advantage to that defendant or juvenile offender in any motion, including a dispositive motion, motion for a mistrial, motion for new trial, or motion to have a conviction, sentence, or disposition set aside, in any petition for post-conviction relief, or in any assignment of error on appeal. (G)(F) If the victim of a criminal offense or delinquent act is incarcerated in a state or local correctional facility or is in the legal custody of the department of youth services, the victim's rights under this chapter may be modified by court order to prevent any security risk, hardship, or undue burden upon a public official or public agency with a duty under this chapter. (H)(G) As used in this section, "post-conviction release" means judicial release, early release, and parole, but does not mean relief pursuant to a federal petition in habeas corpus. Sec. 2937.222. (A) On the motion of the prosecuting attorney or on the judge's own motion, the judge shall hold a hearing to determine whether an accused person charged with aggravated murder when it is not a capital offense, murder, a felony of the first or second degree, a violation of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code, a violation of section 2903.211 of the Revised Code that is a felony, or a felony OVI offense shall be denied bail. The judge shall order that the accused be detained until the conclusion of the hearing. Except for good cause, a continuance on the motion of the state shall not exceed three court days. Except for good cause, a continuance on the motion of the accused shall not exceed five court days unless the motion of the accused waives in writing the five-day limit and states in writing a specific period for which the accused requests a continuance. A continuance granted upon a motion of the accused that waives in writing the five-day limit shall not exceed five court days after the period of continuance requested in the motion. At the hearing, the accused has the right to be represented by counsel and, if the accused is indigent, to have counsel appointed. The judge shall afford the accused an opportunity to testify, to present witnesses and other information, and to cross-examine witnesses who appear at the hearing. The rules concerning admissibility of evidence in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and consideration of information at the hearing. Regardless of whether the hearing is being held on the motion of the prosecuting attorney or on the court's own motion, the state has the burden of proving that the proof is evident or the presumption great that the accused committed the offense with which the accused is charged, of proving that the accused poses a substantial risk of serious physical harm to any person or to the community, and of proving that no release conditions will reasonably assure the safety of that person and the community. The judge may reopen the hearing at any time before trial if the judge finds that information exists that was not known to the movant at the time of the hearing and that that information has a material bearing on whether bail should be denied. If a municipal court or county court enters an order denying bail, a judge of the court of common pleas having jurisdiction over the case may continue that order or may hold a hearing pursuant to this section to determine whether to continue that order. (B) No accused person shall be denied bail pursuant to this section unless the judge finds by clear and convincing evidence that the proof is evident or the presumption great that the accused committed the offense described in division (A) of this section with which the accused is charged, finds by clear and convincing evidence that the accused poses a substantial risk of serious physical harm to any person or to the community, and finds by clear and convincing evidence that no release conditions will reasonably assure the safety of that person and the community. (C) The judge, in determining whether the accused person described in division (A) of this section poses a substantial risk of serious physical harm to any person or to the community and whether there are conditions of release that will reasonably assure the safety of that person and the community, shall consider all available information regarding all of the following: (1) The nature and circumstances of the offense charged, including whether the offense is an offense of violence or involves alcohol or a drug of abuse; (2) The weight of the evidence against the accused; (3) The history and characteristics of the accused, including, but not limited to, both of the following: (a) The character, physical and mental condition, family ties, employment, financial resources, length of residence in the community, community ties, past conduct, history relating to drug or alcohol abuse, and criminal history of the accused; (b) Whether, at the time of the current alleged offense or at the time of the arrest of the accused, the accused was on probation, parole, post-release control, or other release pending trial, sentencing, appeal, or completion of sentence for the commission of an offense under the laws of this state, another state, or the United States or under a municipal ordinance. (4) The nature and seriousness of the danger to any person or the community that would be posed by the person's release. (D)(1) An order of the court of common pleas denying bail pursuant to this section is a final appealable order. In an appeal pursuant to division (D) of this section, the court of appeals shall do all of the following: (a) Give the appeal priority on its calendar; (b) Liberally modify or dispense with formal requirements in the interest of a speedy and just resolution of the appeal; (c) Decide the appeal expeditiously; (d) Promptly enter its judgment affirming or reversing the order denying bail. (2) The pendency of an appeal under this section does not deprive the court of common pleas of jurisdiction to conduct further proceedings in the case or to further consider the order denying bail in accordance with this section. If, during the pendency of an appeal under division (D) of this section, the court of common pleas sets aside or terminates the order denying bail, the court of appeals shall dismiss the appeal. (E) As used in this section: (1) "Court day" has the same meaning as in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Felony OVI offense" means a third degree felony OVI offense and a fourth degree felony OVI offense. (3) "Fourth degree felony OVI offense" and "third degree felony OVI offense" have the same meanings as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2941.021. Any criminal offense which is not punishable by death or life imprisonment may be prosecuted by information filed in the common pleas court by the prosecuting attorney if the defendant, after he has having been advised by the court of the nature of the charge against him the defendant and of his the defendant's rights under the constitution, is represented by counsel or has affirmatively waived counsel by waiver in writing and in open court, waives in writing and in open court prosecution by indictment. Sec. 2941.14. (A) In an indictment for aggravated murder, murder, or voluntary or involuntary manslaughter, the manner in which, or the means by which the death was caused need not be set forth. (B) Imposition of the death penalty for aggravated murder is precluded unless the indictment or count in the indictment charging the offense specifies one or more of the aggravating circumstances listed in division (A) of section 2929.04 of the Revised Code. If more than one aggravating circumstance is specified to an indictment or count, each shall be in a separately numbered specification, and if an aggravating circumstance is specified to a count in an indictment containing more than one count, such specification shall be identified as to the count to which it applies. (C) A specification to an indictment or count in an indictment charging aggravated murder shall be stated at the end of the body of the indictment or count, and may be in substantially the following form: "SPECIFICATION (or, SPECIFICATION 1, SPECIFICATION TO THE FIRST COUNT, or SPECIFICATION 1 TO THE FIRST COUNT). The Grand Jurors further find and specify that (set forth the applicable aggravating circumstance listed in divisions (A)(1) to (10) of section 2929.04 of the Revised Code. The aggravating circumstance may be stated in the words of the subdivision in which it appears, or in words sufficient to give the accused notice of the same)." Sec. 2941.148. (A)(1) The application of Chapter 2971. of the Revised Code to an offender is precluded unless one of the following applies: (a) The offender is charged with a violent sex offense, and the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the violent sex offense also includes a specification that the offender is a sexually violent predator, or the offender is charged with a designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense, and the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense also includes both a specification of the type described in section 2941.147 of the Revised Code and a specification that the offender is a sexually violent predator. (b) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1)(b) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code committed on or after January 2, 2007, and division (B) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code does not prohibit the court from sentencing the offender pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (c) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to attempted rape committed on or after January 2, 2007, and to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1418, 2941.1419, or 2941.1420 of the Revised Code. (d) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2905.01 of the Revised Code and to a specification of the type described in section 2941.147 of the Revised Code, and section 2905.01 of the Revised Code requires a court to sentence the offender pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (e) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to aggravated murder and to a specification of the type described in section 2941.147 of the Revised Code, and division (A)(2)(b)(ii) of section 2929.022, division (A)(1)(e), (C)(1)(a)(v), (C)(2)(a)(ii), (D)(2)(b), (D)(3)(a)(iv), or (E)(1)(a)(iv) of section 2929.03, or division (A) or (B) (C) of section 2929.06 2929.02 of the Revised Code requires a court to sentence the offender pursuant to division (B)(3) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (f) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to murder and to a specification of the type described in section 2941.147 of the Revised Code, and division (B)(2) (C)(1) of section 2929.02 of the Revised Code requires a court to sentence the offender pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (2) A specification required under division (A)(1)(a) of this section that an offender is a sexually violent predator shall be stated at the end of the body of the indictment, count, or information and shall be stated in substantially the following form: "Specification (or, specification to the first count). The grand jury (or insert the person's or prosecuting attorney's name when appropriate) further find and specify that the offender is a sexually violent predator." (B) In determining for purposes of this section whether a person is a sexually violent predator, all of the factors set forth in divisions (H)(1) to (6) of section 2971.01 of the Revised Code that apply regarding the person may be considered as evidence tending to indicate that it is likely that the person will engage in the future in one or more sexually violent offenses. (C) As used in this section, "designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense," "violent sex offense," and "sexually violent predator" have the same meanings as in section 2971.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2941.401. When a person has entered upon a term of imprisonment in a correctional institution of this state, and when during the continuance of the term of imprisonment there is pending in this state any untried indictment, information, or complaint against the prisoner, the prisoner shall be brought to trial within one hundred eighty days after the prisoner causes to be delivered to the prosecuting attorney and the appropriate court in which the matter is pending, written notice of the place of the prisoner's imprisonment and a request for a final disposition to be made of the matter, except that for good cause shown in open court, with the prisoner or the prisoner's counsel present, the court may grant any necessary or reasonable continuance. The request of the prisoner shall be accompanied by a certificate of the warden or superintendent having custody of the prisoner, stating the term of commitment under which the prisoner is being held, the time served and remaining to be served on the sentence, the amount of good time earned, the time of parole eligibility of the prisoner, and any decisions of the adult parole authority relating to the prisoner. The written notice and request for final disposition shall be given or sent by the prisoner to the warden or superintendent having custody of the prisoner, who shall promptly forward it with the certificate to the appropriate prosecuting attorney and court by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested. If the appropriate prosecuting attorney and agency having custody of the prisoner have previously agreed, then the written notice, request, and certificate may be sent by electronic mail or facsimile, in lieu of registered mail or certified mail. The warden or superintendent having custody of the prisoner shall promptly inform the prisoner in writing of the source and contents of any untried indictment, information, or complaint against the prisoner, concerning which the warden or superintendent has knowledge, and of the prisoner's right to make a request for final disposition thereof. Escape from custody by the prisoner, subsequent to the prisoner's execution of the request for final disposition, voids the request. If the action is not brought to trial within the time provided, subject to continuance allowed pursuant to this section, no court any longer has jurisdiction thereof, the indictment, information, or complaint is void, and the court shall enter an order dismissing the action with prejudice. This section does not apply to any person adjudged to be mentally ill or who is under sentence of life imprisonment or death, or to any prisoner under sentence of death. Sec. 2941.43. If the convict referred to in section 2941.40 of the Revised Code is acquitted, he the convict shall be forthwith returned by the sheriff to the state correctional institution to serve out the remainder of his the convict's sentence. If he the convict is sentenced to imprisonment in a state correctional institution, he the convict shall be returned to the state correctional institution by the sheriff to serve his new the convict's term. If he is sentenced to death, the death sentence shall be executed as if he were not under sentence of imprisonment in a state correctional institution. Sec. 2941.51. (A) Counsel appointed to a case or selected by an indigent person under division (E) of section 120.16 or division (E) of section 120.26 of the Revised Code, or otherwise appointed by the court, except for counsel appointed by the court to provide legal representation for a person charged with a violation of an ordinance of a municipal corporation, shall be paid for their services by the county the compensation and expenses that the trial court approves. Each request for payment shall include a financial disclosure form completed by the indigent person on a form prescribed by the state public defender. Compensation and expenses shall not exceed the amounts fixed by the board of county commissioners pursuant to division (B) of this section. (B) The board of county commissioners shall establish a schedule of fees by case or on an hourly basis to be paid by the county for legal services provided by appointed counsel. Prior to establishing such schedule, the board shall request the bar association or associations of the county to submit a proposed schedule for cases other than capital cases. The schedule submitted shall be subject to the review, amendment, and approval of the board of county commissioners, except with respect to capital cases. With respect to capital cases, the schedule shall provide for fees by case or on an hourly basis to be paid to counsel in the amount or at the rate set by the capital case attorney fee council pursuant to division (D) of section 120.33 of the Revised Code, and the board of county commissioners shall approve that amount or rate. With respect to capital cases, counsel shall be paid compensation and expenses in accordance with the amount or at the rate set by the capital case attorney fee council pursuant to division (D) of section 120.33 of the Revised Code. (C) In a case where counsel have been appointed to conduct an appeal under Chapter 120. of the Revised Code, such compensation shall be fixed by the court of appeals or the supreme court, as provided in divisions (A) and (B) of this section. (D) The fees and expenses approved by the court under this section shall not be taxed as part of the costs and shall be paid by the county. However, if the person represented has, or reasonably may be expected to have, the means to meet some part of the cost of the services rendered to the person, the person shall pay the county an amount that the person reasonably can be expected to pay. Pursuant to section 120.04 of the Revised Code, the county shall pay to the state public defender a percentage of the payment received from the person in an amount proportionate to the percentage of the costs of the person's case that were paid to the county by the state public defender pursuant to this section. The money paid to the state public defender shall be credited to the client payment fund created pursuant to division (B)(5) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code. (E) The county auditor shall draw a warrant on the county treasurer for the payment of such counsel in the amount fixed by the court, plus the expenses that the court fixes and certifies to the auditor. The county auditor shall report periodically, but not less than annually, to the board of county commissioners and to the Ohio public defender commission the amounts paid out pursuant to the approval of the court under this section, separately stating costs and expenses that are reimbursable under section 120.35 of the Revised Code. The board, after review and approval of the auditor's report, may then certify it to the state public defender for reimbursement. The request for reimbursement shall be accompanied by a financial disclosure form completed by each indigent person for whom counsel was provided on a form prescribed by the state public defender. The state public defender shall review the report and, in accordance with the standards, guidelines, and maximums established pursuant to divisions (B)(7) and (8) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code and the payment determination provisions of section 120.34 of the Revised Code, pay the cost, other than costs and expenses that are reimbursable under section 120.35 of the Revised Code, if any, of paying appointed counsel in each county and pay costs and expenses that are reimbursable under section 120.35 of the Revised Code, if any, to the board. The amount of payments the state public defender is to make shall be determined as specified in section 120.34 of the Revised Code. (F) If any county system for paying appointed counsel fails to maintain the standards for the conduct of the system established by the rules of the Ohio public defender commission pursuant to divisions (B) and (C) of section 120.03 of the Revised Code or the standards established by the state public defender pursuant to division (B)(7) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code, the commission shall notify the board of county commissioners of the county that the county system for paying appointed counsel has failed to comply with its rules. Unless the board corrects the conduct of its appointed counsel system to comply with the rules within ninety days after the date of the notice, the state public defender may deny all or part of the county's reimbursement from the state provided for in this section. Sec. 2945.06. In any case in which a defendant waives his the defendant's right to trial by jury and elects to be tried by the court under section 2945.05 of the Revised Code, any judge of the court in which the cause is pending shall proceed to hear, try, and determine the cause in accordance with the rules and in like manner as if the cause were being tried before a jury. If the accused is charged with an offense punishable with death, he shall be tried by a court to be composed of three judges, consisting of the judge presiding at the time in the trial of criminal cases and two other judges to be designated by the presiding judge or chief justice of that court, and in case there is neither a presiding judge nor a chief justice, by the chief justice of the supreme court. The judges or a majority of them may decide all questions of fact and law arising upon the trial; however the accused shall not be found guilty or not guilty of any offense unless the judges unanimously find the accused guilty or not guilty. If the accused pleads guilty of aggravated murder, a court composed of three judges shall examine the witnesses, determine whether the accused is guilty of aggravated murder or any other offense, and pronounce sentence accordingly. The court shall follow the procedures contained in sections 2929.03 and 2929.04 of the Revised Code in all cases in which the accused is charged with an offense punishable by death. If in the composition of the court it is necessary that a judge from another county be assigned by the chief justice, the judge from another county shall be compensated for his services as provided by section 141.07 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2945.10. The trial of an issue upon an indictment or information shall proceed before the trial court or jury as follows: (A) Counsel for the state must first state the case for the prosecution, and may briefly state the evidence by which the counsel for the state expects to sustain it. (B) The defendant or the defendant's counsel must then state the defense, and may briefly state the evidence which the defendant or the defendant's counsel expects to offer in support of it. (C) The state must first produce its evidence and the defendant shall then produce the defendant's evidence. (D) The state will then be confined to rebutting evidence, but the court, for good reason, in furtherance of justice, may permit evidence to be offered by either side out of its order. (E) When the evidence is concluded, one of the following applies regarding jury instructions: (1) In a capital case that is being heard by a jury, the court shall prepare written instructions to the jury on the points of law, shall provide copies of the written instructions to the jury before orally instructing the jury, and shall permit the jury to retain and consult the instructions during the court's presentation of the oral instructions and during the jury's deliberations. (2) In a case that is not a capital case, either party may request instructions to the jury on the points of law, which instructions shall be reduced to writing if either party requests it. (F) When the evidence is concluded, unless the case is submitted without argument, the counsel for the state shall commence, the defendant or the defendant's counsel follow, and the counsel for the state conclude the argument to the jury. (G) The court, after the argument is concluded and before proceeding with other business, shall forthwith charge the jury. Such charge shall be reduced to writing by the court if either party requests it before the argument to the jury is commenced. Such charge, or other charge or instruction provided for in this section, when so written and given, shall not be orally qualified, modified, or explained to the jury by the court. Written charges and instructions shall be taken by the jury in their retirement and returned with their verdict into court and remain on file with the papers of the case. The court may deviate from the order of proceedings listed in this section. Sec. 2945.13. When two or more persons are jointly indicted for a felony, except a capital offense, they shall be tried jointly unless the court, for good cause shown on application therefor by the prosecuting attorney or one or more of said defendants, orders one or more of said defendants to be tried separately. Sec. 2945.21. (A)(1) In criminal cases in which there is only one defendant, each party, in addition to the challenges for cause authorized by law, may peremptorily challenge three of the jurors in misdemeanor cases and, four of the jurors in felony cases other than capital cases that may subject the defendant to a sentence of life imprisonment, and six of the jurors in cases that may subject the defendant to a sentence of life imprisonment. If there is more than one defendant, each defendant may peremptorily challenge the same number of jurors as if he the defendant were the sole defendant. (2) Notwithstanding Criminal Rule 24, in capital cases in which there is only one defendant, each party, in addition to the challenges for cause authorized by law, may peremptorily challenge twelve of the jurors. If there is more than one defendant, each defendant may peremptorily challenge the same number of jurors as if he were the sole defendant. (3) In any case in which there are multiple defendants, the prosecuting attorney may peremptorily challenge a number of jurors equal to the total number of peremptory challenges allowed to all of the defendants. (B) If any indictments, informations, or complaints are consolidated for trial, the consolidated cases shall be considered, for purposes of exercising peremptory challenges, as though the defendants or offenses had been joined in the same indictment, information, or complaint. (C) The exercise of peremptory challenges authorized by this section shall be in accordance with the procedures of Criminal Rule 24. Sec. 2945.25. A person called as a juror in a criminal case may be challenged for the following causes: (A) That the person was a member of the grand jury that found the indictment in the case; (B) That the person is possessed of a state of mind evincing enmity or bias toward the defendant or the state; but no person summoned as a juror shall be disqualified by reason of a previously formed or expressed opinion with reference to the guilt or innocence of the accused, if the court is satisfied, from examination of the juror or from other evidence, that the juror will render an impartial verdict according to the law and the evidence submitted to the jury at the trial; (C) In the trial of a capital offense, that the person unequivocally states that under no circumstances will the person follow the instructions of a trial judge and consider fairly the imposition of a sentence of death in a particular case. A prospective juror's conscientious or religious opposition to the death penalty in and of itself is not grounds for a challenge for cause. All parties shall be given wide latitude in voir dire questioning in this regard. (D) That the person is related by consanguinity or affinity within the fifth degree to the person alleged to be injured or attempted to be injured by the offense charged, or to the person on whose complaint the prosecution was instituted, or to the defendant; (E) (D) That the person served on a petit jury drawn in the same cause against the same defendant, and that jury was discharged after hearing the evidence or rendering a verdict on the evidence that was set aside; (F) (E) That the person served as a juror in a civil case brought against the defendant for the same act; (G) (F) That the person has been subpoenaed in good faith as a witness in the case; (H) (G) That the person has chronic alcoholism, or a drug dependency; (I) (H) That the person has been convicted of a crime that by law disqualifies the person from serving on a jury; (J) (I) That the person has an action pending between the person and the state or the defendant; (K) (J) That the person or the person's spouse is a party to another action then pending in any court in which an attorney in the cause then on trial is an attorney, either for or against the person; (L) (K) That the person is the person alleged to be injured or attempted to be injured by the offense charged, or is the person on whose complaint the prosecution was instituted, or the defendant; (M) (L) That the person is the employer or employee, or the spouse, parent, son, or daughter of the employer or employee, or the counselor, agent, or attorney of any person included in division (L) (K) of this section; (N) (M) That English is not the person's native language, and the person's knowledge of English is insufficient to permit the person to understand the facts and law in the case; (O) (N) That the person otherwise is unsuitable for any other cause to serve as a juror. The validity of each challenge listed in this section shall be determined by the court. Sec. 2945.33. When a cause is finally submitted the jurors must be kept together in a convenient place under the charge of an officer until they agree upon a verdict, or are discharged by the court. The court, except in cases where the offense charged may be punishable by death, may permit the jurors to separate during the adjournment of court overnight, under proper cautions, or under supervision of an officer. Such officer shall not permit a communication to be made to them, nor make any himself communication to them except to ask if they have agreed upon a verdict, unless he the officer does so by order of the court. Such officer shall not communicate to any person, before the verdict is delivered, any matter in relation to their deliberation. Upon the trial of any prosecution for misdemeanor, the court may permit the jury to separate during their deliberation, or upon adjournment of the court overnight. In cases where the offense charged may be punished by death, after the case is finally submitted to the jury, the jurors shall be kept in charge of the proper officer and proper arrangements for their care and maintenance shall be made as under section 2945.31 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2945.38. (A) If the issue of a defendant's competence to stand trial is raised and if the court, upon conducting the hearing provided for in section 2945.37 of the Revised Code, finds that the defendant is competent to stand trial, the defendant shall be proceeded against as provided by law. If the court finds the defendant competent to stand trial and the defendant is receiving psychotropic drugs or other medication, the court may authorize the continued administration of the drugs or medication or other appropriate treatment in order to maintain the defendant's competence to stand trial, unless the defendant's attending physician advises the court against continuation of the drugs, other medication, or treatment. (B)(1)(a)(i) If the defendant has been charged with a felony offense or a misdemeanor offense of violence for which the prosecutor has not recommended the procedures under division (B)(1)(a)(vi) of this section and if, after taking into consideration all relevant reports, information, and other evidence, the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial and that there is a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial within one year if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, the court shall order the defendant to undergo treatment. (ii) If the defendant has been charged with a felony offense and if, after taking into consideration all relevant reports, information, and other evidence, the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, but the court is unable at that time to determine whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial within one year if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, the court shall order continuing evaluation and treatment of the defendant for a period not to exceed four months to determine whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial within one year if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment. (iii) If the defendant has not been charged with a felony offense but has been charged with a misdemeanor offense of violence and if, after taking into consideration all relevant reports, information, and other evidence, the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, but the court is unable at that time to determine whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial within the time frame permitted under division (C)(1) of this section, the court may order continuing evaluation and treatment of the defendant for a period not to exceed the maximum period permitted under that division. (iv) If the defendant has not been charged with a felony offense or a misdemeanor offense of violence, but has been charged with a misdemeanor offense that is not a misdemeanor offense of violence and if, after taking into consideration all relevant reports, information, and other evidence, the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, but the court is unable at that time to determine whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial within the time frame permitted under division (C)(1) of this section, the court shall dismiss the charges and follow the process outlined in division (B)(1)(a)(v)(I) of this section. (v) If the defendant has not been charged with a felony offense or a misdemeanor offense of violence, or if the defendant has been charged with a misdemeanor offense of violence and the prosecutor has recommended the procedures under division (B)(1)(a)(vi) of this section, and if, after taking into consideration all relevant reports, information, and other evidence, the trial court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, the trial court shall do one of the following: (I) Dismiss the charges pending against the defendant. A dismissal under this division is not a bar to further prosecution based on the same conduct. Upon dismissal of the charges, the trial court shall discharge the defendant unless the court or prosecutor, after consideration of the requirements of section 5122.11 of the Revised Code, files an affidavit in probate court alleging that the defendant is a mentally ill person subject to court order or a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order. If an affidavit is filed in probate court, the trial court may detain the defendant for ten days pending a hearing in the probate court and shall send to the probate court copies of all written reports of the defendant's mental condition that were prepared pursuant to section 2945.371 of the Revised Code. The trial court or prosecutor shall specify in the appropriate space on the affidavit that the defendant is a person described in this subdivision. (II) Order the defendant to undergo outpatient competency restoration treatment at a facility operated or certified by the department of mental health and addiction services as being qualified to treat mental illness, at a public or community mental health facility, at a jail that employs or contracts with an individual or entity listed in division (B)(1)(b)(i) of this section to provide treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment at a jail, or in the care of a psychiatrist or other mental health professional. If a defendant who has been released on bail or recognizance refuses to comply with court-ordered outpatient treatment under this division, the court may dismiss the charges pending against the defendant and proceed under division (B)(1)(a)(v)(I) of this section or may amend the conditions of bail or recognizance and order the sheriff to take the defendant into custody and deliver the defendant to a center or facility operated or certified by the department of mental health and addiction services for treatment. (vi) If the defendant has not been charged with a felony offense but has been charged with a misdemeanor offense of violence and after taking into consideration all relevant reports, information, and other evidence, the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, the prosecutor in the case may recommend that the court follow the procedures prescribed in division (B)(1)(a)(v) of this section. If the prosecutor does not make such a recommendation, the court shall follow the procedures in division (B)(1)(a)(i) of this section. (b)(i) The court order for the defendant to undergo treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment under division (B)(1)(a) of this section shall specify that the defendant, if determined to require mental health treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment, shall be committed to one of the following: (I) The department of mental health and addiction services for treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment at a hospital, facility, or agency, as determined to be clinically appropriate by the department; (II) A facility certified by the department of mental health and addiction services as being qualified to treat mental illness; (III) A public or community mental health facility; (IV) A jail that employs or contracts with an entity or individual listed in division (B)(1)(b)(i) of this section to provide treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment at a jail; (V) A psychiatrist or another mental health professional for treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment. (ii) Prior to placing the defendant, the department of mental health and addiction services shall obtain court approval for that placement following a hearing. The court order for the defendant to undergo treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment under division (B)(1)(a) of this section shall specify that the defendant, if determined to require treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment for an intellectual disability, shall receive treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment at an institution or facility operated by the department of developmental disabilities, at a facility certified by the department of developmental disabilities as being qualified to treat intellectual disabilities, at a public or private intellectual disabilities facility, or by a psychiatrist or another intellectual disabilities professional. In any case, the order may restrict the defendant's freedom of movement as the court considers necessary. The prosecutor in the defendant's case shall send to the chief clinical officer of the hospital, facility, or agency where the defendant is placed by the department of mental health and addiction services, or to the managing officer or director of the institution, facility, or jail, or the person to which the defendant is committed, copies of relevant police reports and other background information that pertains to the defendant and is available to the prosecutor unless the prosecutor determines that the release of any of the information in the police reports or any of the other background information to unauthorized persons would interfere with the effective prosecution of any person or would create a substantial risk of harm to any person. (iii) In determining the place of commitment, the court shall consider the extent to which the person is a danger to the person and to others, the need for security, the availability of housing and supportive services, including outpatient mental health services in the community, and the type of crime involved and shall order the least restrictive alternative available that is consistent with public safety and treatment goals. In weighing these factors, the court shall give preference to protecting public safety and the availability of housing and supportive services. (c) If the defendant is found incompetent to stand trial, if the chief clinical officer of the hospital, facility, or agency where the defendant is placed, or the managing officer or director of the institution, facility, or jail, or the person to which the defendant is committed for treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment under division (B)(1)(b) of this section determines that medication is necessary to restore the defendant's competency to stand trial, and if the defendant lacks the capacity to give informed consent or refuses medication, the chief clinical officer of the hospital, facility, or agency where the defendant is placed, or the managing officer or director of the institution, facility, or jail, or the person to which the defendant is committed for treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment may petition the court for authorization for the involuntary administration of medication. The court shall hold a hearing on the petition within five days of the filing of the petition if the petition was filed in a municipal court or a county court regarding an incompetent defendant charged with a misdemeanor or within ten days of the filing of the petition if the petition was filed in a court of common pleas regarding an incompetent defendant charged with a felony offense. Following the hearing, the court may authorize the involuntary administration of medication or may dismiss the petition. (2) If the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial and that, even if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial within one year, the court shall order the discharge of the defendant, unless upon motion of the prosecutor or on its own motion, the court either seeks to retain jurisdiction over the defendant pursuant to section 2945.39 of the Revised Code or files an affidavit in the probate court for the civil commitment of the defendant pursuant to Chapter 5122. or 5123. of the Revised Code alleging that the defendant is a person with a mental illness subject to court order or a person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order. If an affidavit is filed in the probate court, the trial court shall send to the probate court copies of all written reports of the defendant's mental condition that were prepared pursuant to section 2945.371 of the Revised Code. The trial court may issue the temporary order of detention that a probate court may issue under section 5122.11 or 5123.71 of the Revised Code, to remain in effect until the probable cause or initial hearing in the probate court. Further proceedings in the probate court are civil proceedings governed by Chapter 5122. or 5123. of the Revised Code. (C) No defendant shall be required to undergo treatment, including any continuing evaluation and treatment, under division (B)(1) of this section for longer than whichever of the following periods is applicable: (1) One year, if the most serious offense with which the defendant is charged is one of the following offenses: (a) Aggravated murder, murder, or an offense of violence for which a sentence of death or life imprisonment may be imposed; (b) An offense of violence that is a felony of the first or second degree; (c) A conspiracy to commit, an attempt to commit, or complicity in the commission of an offense described in division (C)(1)(a) or (b) of this section if the conspiracy, attempt, or complicity is a felony of the first or second degree. (2) Six months, if the most serious offense with which the defendant is charged is a felony other than a felony described in division (C)(1) of this section; (3) Sixty days, if the most serious offense with which the defendant is charged is a misdemeanor of the first or second degree; (4) Thirty days, if the most serious offense with which the defendant is charged is a misdemeanor of the third or fourth degree, a minor misdemeanor, or an unclassified misdemeanor. (D) Any defendant who is committed pursuant to this section shall not voluntarily admit the defendant or be voluntarily admitted to a hospital or institution pursuant to section 5122.02, 5122.15, 5123.69, or 5123.76 of the Revised Code. (E) Except as otherwise provided in this division, a defendant who is charged with an offense and is committed by the court under this section to the department of mental health and addiction services or is committed to an institution or facility for the treatment of intellectual disabilities shall not be granted unsupervised on-grounds movement, supervised off-grounds movement, or nonsecured status except in accordance with the court order. The court may grant a defendant supervised off-grounds movement to obtain medical treatment or specialized habilitation treatment services if the person who supervises the treatment or the continuing evaluation and treatment of the defendant ordered under division (B)(1)(a) of this section informs the court that the treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment cannot be provided at the hospital or facility where the defendant is placed by the department of mental health and addiction services or the institution, facility, or jail to which the defendant is committed. The chief clinical officer of the hospital or facility where the defendant is placed by the department of mental health and addiction services or the managing officer or director of the institution, facility, or jail to which the defendant is committed, or a designee of any of those persons, may grant a defendant movement to a medical facility for an emergency medical situation with appropriate supervision to ensure the safety of the defendant, staff, and community during that emergency medical situation. The chief clinical officer of the hospital or facility where the defendant is placed by the department of mental health and addiction services or the managing officer or director of the institution, facility, or jail to which the defendant is committed shall notify the court within twenty-four hours of the defendant's movement to the medical facility for an emergency medical situation under this division. (F) The person who supervises the treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment of a defendant ordered to undergo treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment under division (B)(1)(a) of this section shall file a written report with the court at the following times: (1) Whenever the person believes the defendant is capable of understanding the nature and objective of the proceedings against the defendant and of assisting in the defendant's defense; (2) For a felony offense, fourteen days before expiration of the maximum time for treatment as specified in division (C) of this section and fourteen days before the expiration of the maximum time for continuing evaluation and treatment as specified in division (B)(1)(a) of this section, and, for a misdemeanor offense, ten days before the expiration of the maximum time for treatment, as specified in division (C) of this section; (3) At a minimum, after each six months of treatment; (4) Whenever the person who supervises the treatment or continuing evaluation and treatment of a defendant ordered under division (B)(1)(a) of this section believes that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will become capable of understanding the nature and objective of the proceedings against the defendant or of assisting in the defendant's defense even if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment. (G) A report under division (F) of this section shall contain the examiner's findings, the facts in reasonable detail on which the findings are based, and the examiner's opinion as to the defendant's capability of understanding the nature and objective of the proceedings against the defendant and of assisting in the defendant's defense. If, in the examiner's opinion, the defendant remains incapable of understanding the nature and objective of the proceedings against the defendant and of assisting in the defendant's defense and there is a substantial probability that the defendant will become capable of understanding the nature and objective of the proceedings against the defendant and of assisting in the defendant's defense if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, if in the examiner's opinion the defendant continues to have a mental illness or an intellectual disability, and if the maximum time for treatment as specified in division (C) of this section has not expired, the report also shall contain the examiner's recommendation as to the least restrictive placement or commitment alternative that is consistent with the defendant's treatment needs for restoration to competency and with the safety of the community. The court shall provide copies of the report to the prosecutor and defense counsel. (H) If a defendant is committed pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, within ten days after the treating physician of the defendant or the examiner of the defendant who is employed or retained by the treating facility advises that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will become capable of understanding the nature and objective of the proceedings against the defendant or of assisting in the defendant's defense even if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, within ten days after the expiration of the maximum time for treatment as specified in division (C) of this section, within ten days after the expiration of the maximum time for continuing evaluation and treatment as specified in division (B)(1)(a) of this section, within thirty days after a defendant's request for a hearing that is made after six months of treatment, or within thirty days after being advised by the treating physician or examiner that the defendant is competent to stand trial, whichever is the earliest, the court shall conduct another hearing to determine if the defendant is competent to stand trial and shall do whichever of the following is applicable: (1) If the court finds that the defendant is competent to stand trial, the defendant shall be proceeded against as provided by law. (2) If the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, but that there is a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, and the maximum time for treatment as specified in division (C) of this section has not expired, the court, after consideration of the examiner's recommendation, shall order that treatment be continued, may change the facility or location at which the treatment is to be continued, and shall specify whether the treatment is to be continued at the same or a different facility or location. (3) If the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, if the defendant is charged with an offense listed in division (C)(1) of this section, and if the court finds that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial even if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, or if the maximum time for treatment relative to that offense as specified in division (C) of this section has expired, further proceedings shall be as provided in sections 2945.39, 2945.401, and 2945.402 of the Revised Code. (4) If the court finds that the defendant is incompetent to stand trial, if the most serious offense with which the defendant is charged is a misdemeanor or a felony other than a felony listed in division (C)(1) of this section, and if the court finds that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will become competent to stand trial even if the defendant is provided with a course of treatment, or if the maximum time for treatment relative to that offense as specified in division (C) of this section has expired, the court shall dismiss the indictment, information, or complaint against the defendant. A dismissal under this division is not a bar to further prosecution based on the same conduct. The court shall discharge the defendant unless the court or prosecutor files an affidavit in probate court for civil commitment pursuant to Chapter 5122. or 5123. of the Revised Code. If an affidavit for civil commitment is filed, the court may detain the defendant for ten days pending civil commitment and shall send to the probate court copies of all written reports of the defendant's mental condition prepared pursuant to section 2945.371 of the Revised Code. All of the following provisions apply to persons charged with a misdemeanor or a felony other than a felony listed in division (C)(1) of this section who are committed by the probate court subsequent to the court's or prosecutor's filing of an affidavit for civil commitment under authority of this division: (a) The chief clinical officer of the entity, hospital, or facility, the managing officer or director of the institution, facility, or jail, or the person to which the defendant is committed or admitted shall do all of the following: (i) Notify the prosecutor, in writing, of the discharge of the defendant, send the notice at least ten days prior to the discharge unless the discharge is by the probate court, and state in the notice the date on which the defendant will be discharged; (ii) Notify the prosecutor, in writing, when the defendant is absent without leave or is granted unsupervised, off-grounds movement, and send this notice promptly after the discovery of the absence without leave or prior to the granting of the unsupervised, off-grounds movement, whichever is applicable; (iii) Notify the prosecutor, in writing, of the change of the defendant's commitment or admission to voluntary status, send the notice promptly upon learning of the change to voluntary status, and state in the notice the date on which the defendant was committed or admitted on a voluntary status. (b) Upon receiving notice that the defendant will be granted unsupervised, off-grounds movement, the prosecutor either shall re-indict the defendant or promptly notify the court that the prosecutor does not intend to prosecute the charges against the defendant. (I) If a defendant is convicted of a crime and sentenced to a jail, the defendant's sentence shall be reduced by the total number of days the defendant is confined for evaluation to determine the defendant's competence to stand trial or treatment under this section and sections 2945.37 and 2945.371 of the Revised Code or by the total number of days the defendant is confined for evaluation to determine the defendant's mental condition at the time of the offense charged. Sec. 2949.02. (A) If a person is convicted of any bailable offense, including, but not limited to, a violation of an ordinance of a municipal corporation, in a municipal or county court or in a court of common pleas and if the person gives to the trial judge or magistrate a written notice of the person's intention to file or apply for leave to file an appeal to the court of appeals, the trial judge or magistrate may suspend, subject to division (A)(2)(b) of section 2953.09 of the Revised Code, execution of the sentence or judgment imposed for any fixed time that will give the person time either to prepare and file, or to apply for leave to file, the appeal. In all bailable cases, except as provided in division (B) of this section, the trial judge or magistrate may release the person on bail in accordance with section 2937.011 of the Revised Code, and the bail shall at least be conditioned that the person will appeal without delay and abide by the judgment and sentence of the court. (B) Notwithstanding any provision of section 2937.011 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a trial judge of a court of common pleas shall not release on bail pursuant to division (A) of this section a person who is convicted of a bailable offense if the person is sentenced to imprisonment for life or if that offense is a violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.11, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.11, 2907.02, 2909.02, 2911.01, 2911.02, or 2911.11 of the Revised Code or is felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code. (C) If a trial judge of a court of common pleas is prohibited by division (B) of this section from releasing on bail pursuant to division (A) of this section a person who is convicted of a bailable offense and not sentenced to imprisonment for life, the appropriate court of appeals or two judges of it, upon motion of such a person and for good cause shown, may release the person on bail in accordance with section 2937.011 of the Revised Code and Appellate Rule 8, and the bail shall at least be conditioned as described in division (A) of this section. Sec. 2949.03. If a judgment of conviction by a court of common pleas, municipal court, or county court is affirmed by a court of appeals and remanded to the trial court for execution of the sentence or judgment imposed, and the person so convicted gives notice of his the person's intention to file a notice of appeal to the supreme court, the trial court, on the filing of a motion by such person within three days after the rendition by the court of appeals of the judgment of affirmation, may further suspend, subject to division (A)(2)(b) of section 2953.09 of the Revised Code, the execution of the sentence or judgment imposed for a time sufficient to give such person an opportunity to file a notice of appeal to the supreme court, but the sentence or judgment imposed shall not be suspended more than thirty days for that purpose. Sec. 2953.02. In a capital case in which a sentence of death is imposed for an offense committed before January 1, 1995, and in any other criminal case, including a conviction for the violation of an ordinance of a municipal corporation, the judgment or final order of a court of record inferior to the court of appeals may be reviewed in the court of appeals. A final order of an administrative officer or agency may be reviewed in the court of common pleas. A judgment or final order of the court of appeals involving a question arising under the Constitution of the United States or of this state may be appealed to the supreme court as a matter of right. This right of appeal from judgments and final orders of the court of appeals shall extend to cases in which a sentence of death is imposed for an offense committed before January 1, 1995, and in which the death penalty has been affirmed, felony cases in which the supreme court has directed the court of appeals to certify its record, and in all other criminal cases of public or general interest wherein the supreme court has granted a motion to certify the record of the court of appeals. In a capital case in which a sentence of death is imposed for an offense committed on or after January 1, 1995, the judgment or final order may be appealed from the trial court directly to the supreme court as a matter of right. The supreme court in criminal cases shall not be required to determine as to the weight of the evidence, except that, in cases in which a sentence of death is imposed for an offense committed on or after January 1, 1995, and in which the question of the weight of the evidence to support the judgment has been raised on appeal, the supreme court shall determine as to the weight of the evidence to support the judgment and shall determine as to the weight of the evidence to support the sentence of death as provided in section 2929.05 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2953.07. (A) Upon the hearing of an appeal other than an appeal from a mayor's court, the appellate court may affirm the judgment or reverse it, in whole or in part, or modify it, and order the accused to be discharged or grant a new trial. The appellate court may remand the accused for the sole purpose of correcting a sentence imposed contrary to law, provided that, on an appeal of a sentence imposed upon a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony that is brought under section 2953.08 of the Revised Code, division (G) of that section applies to the court. If the judgment is reversed, the appellant shall recover from the appellee all court costs incurred to secure the reversal, including the cost of transcripts. In capital cases, when the judgment is affirmed and the day fixed for the execution is passed, the appellate court shall appoint a day for it, and the clerk of the appellate court shall issue a warrant under the seal of the appellate court, to the sheriff of the proper county, or the warden of the appropriate state correctional institution, commanding the sheriff or warden to carry the sentence into execution on the day so appointed. The sheriff or warden shall execute and return the warrant as in other cases, and the clerk shall record the warrant and return. (B) As used in this section, "appellate court" means, for a case in which a sentence of death is imposed for an offense committed before January 1, 1995, both the court of appeals and the supreme court, and for a case in which a sentence of death is imposed for an offense committed on or after January 1, 1995, the supreme court. Sec. 2953.08. (A) In addition to any other right to appeal and except as provided in division (D) of this section, a defendant who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony may appeal as a matter of right the sentence imposed upon the defendant on one of the following grounds: (1) The sentence consisted of or included the maximum definite prison term allowed for the offense by division (A) of section 2929.14 or section 2929.142 of the Revised Code or, with respect to a non-life felony indefinite prison term, the longest minimum prison term allowed for the offense by division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, the maximum definite prison term or longest minimum prison term was not required for the offense pursuant to Chapter 2925. or any other provision of the Revised Code, and the court imposed the sentence under one of the following circumstances: (a) The sentence was imposed for only one offense. (b) The sentence was imposed for two or more offenses arising out of a single incident, and the court imposed the maximum definite prison term or longest minimum prison term for the offense of the highest degree. (2) The sentence consisted of or included a prison term and the offense for which it was imposed is a felony of the fourth or fifth degree or is a felony drug offense that is a violation of a provision of Chapter 2925. of the Revised Code and that is specified as being subject to division (B) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code for purposes of sentencing. If the court specifies that it found one or more of the factors in division (B)(1)(b) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code to apply relative to the defendant, the defendant is not entitled under this division to appeal as a matter of right the sentence imposed upon the offender. (3) The person was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violent sex offense or a designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense, was adjudicated a sexually violent predator in relation to that offense, and was sentenced pursuant to division (A)(3) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code, if the minimum term of the indefinite term imposed pursuant to division (A)(3) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code is the longest term available for the offense from among the range of definite terms listed in section 2929.14 of the Revised Code or, with respect to a non-life felony indefinite prison term, the longest minimum prison term allowed for the offense by division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, "designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense" and "violent sex offense" have the same meanings as in section 2971.01 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, "adjudicated a sexually violent predator" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code, and a person is "adjudicated a sexually violent predator" in the same manner and the same circumstances as are described in that section. (4) The sentence is contrary to law. (5) The sentence consisted of an additional prison term of ten years imposed pursuant to division (B)(2)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (B) In addition to any other right to appeal and except as provided in division (D) of this section, a prosecuting attorney, a city director of law, village solicitor, or similar chief legal officer of a municipal corporation, or the attorney general, if one of those persons prosecuted the case, may appeal as a matter of right a sentence imposed upon a defendant who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony or, in the circumstances described in division (B)(3) of this section the modification of a sentence imposed upon such a defendant, on any of the following grounds: (1) The sentence did not include a prison term despite a presumption favoring a prison term for the offense for which it was imposed, as set forth in section 2929.13 or Chapter 2925. of the Revised Code. (2) The sentence is contrary to law. (3) The sentence is a modification under section 2929.20 of the Revised Code of a sentence that was imposed for a felony of the first or second degree. (C)(1) In addition to the right to appeal a sentence granted under division (A) or (B) of this section, a defendant who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony may seek leave to appeal a sentence imposed upon the defendant on the basis that the sentencing judge has imposed consecutive sentences under division (C)(3) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code and that the consecutive sentences exceed the maximum definite prison term allowed by division (A) of that section for the most serious offense of which the defendant was convicted or, with respect to a non-life felony indefinite prison term, exceed the longest minimum prison term allowed by division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of that section for the most serious such offense. Upon the filing of a motion under this division, the court of appeals may grant leave to appeal the sentence if the court determines that the allegation included as the basis of the motion is true. (2) A defendant may seek leave to appeal an additional sentence imposed upon the defendant pursuant to division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code if the additional sentence is for a definite prison term that is longer than five years. (D)(1) A sentence imposed upon a defendant is not subject to review under this section if the sentence is authorized by law, has been recommended jointly by the defendant and the prosecution in the case, and is imposed by a sentencing judge. (2) Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, a sentence imposed upon a defendant is not subject to review under this section if the sentence is imposed pursuant to division (B)(2)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in this division, a defendant retains all rights to appeal as provided under this chapter or any other provision of the Revised Code. A defendant has the right to appeal under this chapter or any other provision of the Revised Code the court's application of division (B)(2)(c) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (3) A sentence imposed for aggravated murder or murder pursuant to sections section 2929.02 to 2929.06 of the Revised Code is not subject to review under this section. (E) A defendant, prosecuting attorney, city director of law, village solicitor, or chief municipal legal officer shall file an appeal of a sentence under this section to a court of appeals within the time limits specified in Rule 4(B) of the Rules of Appellate Procedure, provided that if the appeal is pursuant to division (B)(3) of this section, the time limits specified in that rule shall not commence running until the court grants the motion that makes the sentence modification in question. A sentence appeal under this section shall be consolidated with any other appeal in the case. If no other appeal is filed, the court of appeals may review only the portions of the trial record that pertain to sentencing. (F) On the appeal of a sentence under this section, the record to be reviewed shall include all of the following, as applicable: (1) Any presentence, psychiatric, or other investigative report that was submitted to the court in writing before the sentence was imposed. An appellate court that reviews a presentence investigation report prepared pursuant to section 2947.06 or 2951.03 of the Revised Code or Criminal Rule 32.2 in connection with the appeal of a sentence under this section shall comply with division (D)(3) of section 2951.03 of the Revised Code when the appellate court is not using the presentence investigation report, and the appellate court's use of a presentence investigation report of that nature in connection with the appeal of a sentence under this section does not affect the otherwise confidential character of the contents of that report as described in division (D)(1) of section 2951.03 of the Revised Code and does not cause that report to become a public record, as defined in section 149.43 of the Revised Code, following the appellate court's use of the report. (2) The trial record in the case in which the sentence was imposed; (3) Any oral or written statements made to or by the court at the sentencing hearing at which the sentence was imposed; (4) Any written findings that the court was required to make in connection with the modification of the sentence pursuant to a judicial release under division (I) of section 2929.20 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) If the sentencing court was required to make the findings required by division (B) or (D) of section 2929.13 or division (I) of section 2929.20 of the Revised Code, or to state the findings of the trier of fact required by division (B)(2)(e) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, relative to the imposition or modification of the sentence, and if the sentencing court failed to state the required findings on the record, the court hearing an appeal under division (A), (B), or (C) of this section shall remand the case to the sentencing court and instruct the sentencing court to state, on the record, the required findings. (2) The court hearing an appeal under division (A), (B), or (C) of this section shall review the record, including the findings underlying the sentence or modification given by the sentencing court. The appellate court may increase, reduce, or otherwise modify a sentence that is appealed under this section or may vacate the sentence and remand the matter to the sentencing court for resentencing. The appellate court's standard for review is not whether the sentencing court abused its discretion. The appellate court may take any action authorized by this division if it clearly and convincingly finds either of the following: (a) That the record does not support the sentencing court's findings under division (B) or (D) of section 2929.13, division (B)(2)(e) or (C)(4) of section 2929.14, or division (I) of section 2929.20 of the Revised Code, whichever, if any, is relevant; (b) That the sentence is otherwise contrary to law. (H) A judgment or final order of a court of appeals under this section may be appealed, by leave of court, to the supreme court. (I) As used in this section, "non-life felony indefinite prison term" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2953.09. (A)(1) Upon filing an appeal in the supreme court, the execution of the sentence or judgment imposed in cases of felony is suspended. (2)(a)(2) If a notice of appeal is filed pursuant to the Rules of Appellate Procedure by a defendant who is convicted in a municipal or county court or a court of common pleas of a felony or misdemeanor under the Revised Code or an ordinance of a municipal corporation, the filing of the notice of appeal does not suspend execution of the sentence or judgment imposed. However, consistent with divisions (A)(2)(b), (B), and (C) of this section, section 2937.011 of the Revised Code, and Appellate Rule 8, the municipal or county court, court of common pleas, or court of appeals may suspend execution of the sentence or judgment imposed during the pendency of the appeal and shall determine whether that defendant is entitled to bail and the amount and nature of any bail that is required. The bail shall at least be conditioned that the defendant will prosecute the appeal without delay and abide by the judgment and sentence of the court. (b)(i) A court of common pleas or court of appeals may suspend the execution of a sentence of death imposed for an offense committed before January 1, 1995, only if no date for execution has been set by the supreme court, good cause is shown for the suspension, the defendant files a motion requesting the suspension, and notice has been given to the prosecuting attorney of the appropriate county. (ii) A court of common pleas may suspend the execution of a sentence of death imposed for an offense committed on or after January 1, 1995, only if no date for execution has been set by the supreme court, good cause is shown, the defendant files a motion requesting the suspension, and notice has been given to the prosecuting attorney of the appropriate county. (iii) A court of common pleas or court of appeals may suspend the execution of the sentence or judgment imposed for a felony in a capital case in which a sentence of death is not imposed only if no date for execution of the sentence has been set by the supreme court, good cause is shown for the suspension, the defendant files a motion requesting the suspension, and only after notice has been given to the prosecuting attorney of the appropriate county. (B) Notwithstanding any provision of section 2937.011 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a trial judge of a court of common pleas shall not release on bail pursuant to division (A)(2)(a)(A)(2) of this section a defendant who is convicted of a bailable offense if the defendant is sentenced to imprisonment for life or if that offense is a violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.11, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.11, 2907.02, 2909.02, 2911.01, 2911.02, or 2911.11 of the Revised Code or is felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code. (C) If a trial judge of a court of common pleas is prohibited by division (B) of this section from releasing on bail pursuant to division (A)(2)(a)(A)(2) of this section a defendant who is convicted of a bailable offense and not sentenced to imprisonment for life, the appropriate court of appeals or two judges of it, upon motion of the defendant and for good cause shown, may release the defendant on bail in accordance with division (A)(2) of this section. Sec. 2953.10. When an appeal is taken from a court of appeals to the supreme court, the supreme court has the same power and authority to suspend the execution of sentence during the pendency of the appeal and admit the defendant to bail as does the court of appeals unless another section of the Revised Code or the Rules of Practice of the Supreme Court specify a distinct bail or suspension of sentence authority. When an appeal in a case in which a sentence of death is imposed for an offense committed on or after January 1, 1995, is taken directly from the trial court to the supreme court, the supreme court has the same power and authority to suspend the execution of the sentence during the pendency of the appeal and admit the defendant to bail as does the court of appeals for cases in which a sentence of death is imposed for an offense committed before January 1, 1995, unless another section of the Revised Code or the Rules of Practice of the Supreme Court specify a distinct bail or suspension of sentence authority. Sec. 2953.21. (A)(1)(a) A person in any either of the following categories may file a petition in the court that imposed sentence, stating the grounds for relief relied upon, and asking the court to vacate or set aside the judgment or sentence or to grant other appropriate relief: (i) Any person who has been convicted of a criminal offense or adjudicated a delinquent child and who claims that there was such a denial or infringement of the person's rights as to render the judgment void or voidable under the Ohio Constitution or the Constitution of the United States; (ii) Any person who has been convicted of a criminal offense and sentenced to death and who claims that there was a denial or infringement of the person's rights under either of those Constitutions that creates a reasonable probability of an altered verdict; (iii) Any person who has been convicted of a criminal offense that is a felony and who is an offender for whom DNA testing that was performed under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code or under former section 2953.82 of the Revised Code and analyzed in the context of and upon consideration of all available admissible evidence related to the person's case as described in division (D) of section 2953.74 of the Revised Code provided results that establish, by clear and convincing evidence, actual innocence of that felony offense or, if the person was sentenced to death, establish, by clear and convincing evidence, actual innocence of the aggravating circumstance or circumstances the person was found guilty of committing and that is or are the basis of that sentence of death; (iv) Any person who has been convicted of aggravated murder and sentenced to death for the offense and who claims that the person had a serious mental illness at the time of the commission of the offense and that as a result the court should render void the sentence of death, with the filing of the petition constituting the waiver described in division (A)(3)(b) of this section. (b) A petitioner under division (A)(1)(a) of this section may file a supporting affidavit and other documentary evidence in support of the claim for relief. (c) As used in division (A)(1)(a) of this section: (i) "Actual, "actual innocence" means that, had the results of the DNA testing conducted under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code or under former section 2953.82 of the Revised Code been presented at trial, and had those results been analyzed in the context of and upon consideration of all available admissible evidence related to the person's case as described in division (D) of section 2953.74 of the Revised Code, no reasonable factfinder would have found the petitioner guilty of the offense of which the petitioner was convicted, or, if the person was sentenced to death, no reasonable factfinder would have found the petitioner guilty of the aggravating circumstance or circumstances the petitioner was found guilty of committing and that is or are the basis of that sentence of death. (ii) "Serious mental illness" has the same meaning as in section 2929.025 of the Revised Code. (d) As used in divisions (A)(1)(a) and (c) of this section, "former section 2953.82 of the Revised Code" means section 2953.82 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 6, 2010. (e) At any time in conjunction with the filing of a petition for postconviction relief under division (A) of this section by a person who has been sentenced to death, or with the litigation of a petition so filed, the court, for good cause shown, may authorize the petitioner in seeking the postconviction relief and the prosecuting attorney of the county served by the court in defending the proceeding, to take depositions and to issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum in accordance with divisions (A)(1)(e), (A)(1)(f), and (C) of this section, and to any other form of discovery as in a civil action that the court in its discretion permits. The court may limit the extent of discovery under this division. In addition to discovery that is relevant to the claim and was available under Criminal Rule 16 through conclusion of the original criminal trial, the court, for good cause shown, may authorize the petitioner or prosecuting attorney to take depositions and issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum in either of the following circumstances: (i) For any witness who testified at trial or who was disclosed by the state prior to trial, except as otherwise provided in this division, the petitioner or prosecuting attorney shows clear and convincing evidence that the witness is material and that a deposition of the witness or the issuing of a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum is of assistance in order to substantiate or refute the petitioner's claim that there is a reasonable probability of an altered verdict. This division does not apply if the witness was unavailable for trial or would not voluntarily be interviewed by the defendant or prosecuting attorney. (ii) For any witness with respect to whom division (A)(1)(e)(i) of this section does not apply, the petitioner or prosecuting attorney shows good cause that the witness is material and that a deposition of the witness or the issuing of a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum is of assistance in order to substantiate or refute the petitioner's claim that there is a reasonable probability of an altered verdict. (f) If a person who has been sentenced to death and who files a petition for postconviction relief under division (A) of this section requests postconviction discovery as described in division (A)(1)(e) of this section or if the prosecuting attorney of the county served by the court requests postconviction discovery as described in that division, within ten days after the docketing of the request, or within any other time that the court sets for good cause shown, the prosecuting attorney shall respond by answer or motion to the petitioner's request or the petitioner shall respond by answer or motion to the prosecuting attorney's request, whichever is applicable. (g) If a person who has been sentenced to death and who files a petition for postconviction relief under division (A) of this section requests postconviction discovery as described in division (A)(1)(e) of this section or if the prosecuting attorney of the county served by the court requests postconviction discovery as described in that division, upon motion by the petitioner, the prosecuting attorney, or the person from whom discovery is sought, and for good cause shown, the court in which the action is pending may make any order that justice requires to protect a party or person from oppression or undue burden or expense, including but not limited to the orders described in divisions (A)(1)(h)(i) to (viii) of this section. The court also may make any such order if, in its discretion, it determines that the discovery sought would be irrelevant to the claims made in the petition; and if the court makes any such order on that basis, it shall explain in the order the reasons why the discovery would be irrelevant. (h) If a petitioner, prosecuting attorney, or person from whom discovery is sought makes a motion for an order under division (A)(1)(g) of this section and the order is denied in whole or in part, the court, on terms and conditions as are just, may order that any party or person provide or permit discovery as described in division (A)(1)(e) of this section. The provisions of Civil Rule 37(A)(4) apply to the award of expenses incurred in relation to the motion, except that in no case shall a court require a petitioner who is indigent to pay expenses under those provisions. Before any person moves for an order under division (A)(1)(g) of this section, that person shall make a reasonable effort to resolve the matter through discussion with the petitioner or prosecuting attorney seeking discovery. A motion for an order under division (A)(1)(g) of this section shall be accompanied by a statement reciting the effort made to resolve the matter in accordance with this paragraph. The orders that may be made under division (A)(1)(g) of this section include, but are not limited to, any of the following: (i) That the discovery not be had; (ii) That the discovery may be had only on specified terms and conditions, including a designation of the time or place; (iii) That the discovery may be had only by a method of discovery other than that selected by the party seeking discovery; (iv) That certain matters not be inquired into or that the scope of the discovery be limited to certain matters; (v) That discovery be conducted with no one present except persons designated by the court; (vi) That a deposition after being sealed be opened only by order of the court; (vii) That a trade secret or other confidential research, development, or commercial information not be disclosed or be disclosed only in a designated way; (viii) That the parties simultaneously file specified documents or information enclosed in sealed envelopes to be opened as directed by the court. (i) Any postconviction discovery authorized under division (A)(1)(e) of this section shall be completed not later than eighteen months after the start of the discovery proceedings unless, for good cause shown, the court extends that period for completing the discovery. (j) Nothing in division (A)(1)(e) of this section authorizes, or shall be construed as authorizing, the relitigation, or discovery in support of relitigation, of any matter barred by the doctrine of res judicata. (k) Division (A)(1) of this section does not apply to any person who has been convicted of a criminal offense and sentenced to death and who has unsuccessfully raised the same claims in a petition for postconviction relief. (2)(a)(2) Except as otherwise provided in section 2953.23 of the Revised Code, a petition under division (A)(1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) (A)(1)(a) of this section shall be filed no later than three hundred sixty-five days after the date on which the trial transcript is filed in the court of appeals in the direct appeal of the judgment of conviction or adjudication or, if the direct appeal involves a sentence of death, the date on which the trial transcript is filed in the supreme court. If no appeal is taken, except as otherwise provided in section 2953.23 of the Revised Code, the petition shall be filed no later than three hundred sixty-five days after the expiration of the time for filing the appeal. (b) Except as otherwise provided in section 2953.23 of the Revised Code, a petition under division (A)(1)(a)(iv) of this section shall be filed not later than three hundred sixty-five days after the effective date of this amendment (3)(a) In a petition filed under division (A)(1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section, a person who has been sentenced to death may ask the court to render void or voidable the judgment with respect to the conviction of aggravated murder or the specification of an aggravating circumstance or the sentence of death. (b) A person sentenced to death who files a petition under division (A)(1)(a)(iv) of this section may ask the court to render void the sentence of death and to order the resentencing of the person under division (A) of section 2929.06 of the Revised Code. If a person sentenced to death files such a petition and asks the court to render void the sentence of death and to order the resentencing of the person under division (A) of section 2929.06 of the Revised Code, the act of filing the petition constitutes a waiver of any right to be sentenced under the law that existed at the time the offense was committed and constitutes consent to be sentenced to life imprisonment without parole under division (A) of section 2929.06 of the Revised Code. (4)(3) A petitioner shall state in the original or amended petition filed under division (A) of this section all grounds for relief claimed by the petitioner. Except as provided in section 2953.23 of the Revised Code, any ground for relief that is not so stated in the petition is waived. (5) (4) If the petitioner in a petition filed under division (A)(1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) (A)(1)(a) of this section was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony, the petition may include a claim that the petitioner was denied the equal protection of the laws in violation of the Ohio Constitution or the United States Constitution because the sentence imposed upon the petitioner for the felony was part of a consistent pattern of disparity in sentencing by the judge who imposed the sentence, with regard to the petitioner's race, gender, ethnic background, or religion. If the supreme court adopts a rule requiring a court of common pleas to maintain information with regard to an offender's race, gender, ethnic background, or religion, the supporting evidence for the petition shall include, but shall not be limited to, a copy of that type of information relative to the petitioner's sentence and copies of that type of information relative to sentences that the same judge imposed upon other persons. (6) Notwithstanding any law or court rule to the contrary, there is no limit on the number of pages in, or on the length of, a petition filed under division (A)(1)(a)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this section by a person who has been sentenced to death. If any court rule specifies a limit on the number of pages in, or on the length of, a petition filed under division (A)(1)(a)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this section or on a prosecuting attorney's response to such a petition by answer or motion and a person who has been sentenced to death files a petition that exceeds the limit specified for the petition, the prosecuting attorney may respond by an answer or motion that exceeds the limit specified for the response. (B) The clerk of the court in which the petition for postconviction relief and, if applicable, a request for postconviction discovery described in division (A)(1)(e) of this section is filed shall docket the petition and the request and bring them it promptly to the attention of the court. The clerk of the court in which the petition for postconviction relief and, if applicable, a request for postconviction discovery described in division (A)(1)(e) of this section is filed immediately shall forward a copy of the petition and a copy of the request if filed by the petitioner to the prosecuting attorney of the county served by the court. If the request for postconviction discovery is filed by the prosecuting attorney, the clerk of the court immediately shall forward a copy of the request to the petitioner or the petitioner's counsel. (C) If a person who has been sentenced to death and who files a petition for postconviction relief under division (A)(1)(a)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this section requests a deposition or the prosecuting attorney in the case requests a deposition, and if the court grants the request under division (A)(1)(e) of this section, the court shall notify the petitioner or the petitioner's counsel and the prosecuting attorney. The deposition shall be conducted pursuant to divisions (B), (D), and (E) of Criminal Rule 15. Notwithstanding division (C) of Criminal Rule 15, the petitioner is not entitled to attend the deposition. The prosecuting attorney shall be permitted to attend and participate in any deposition. (D) The court shall consider a petition that is timely filed within the period specified in division (A)(2) of this section even if a direct appeal of the judgment is pending. Before granting a hearing on a petition filed under division (A)(1)(a)(i), or (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this section, the court shall determine whether there are substantive grounds for relief. In making such a determination, the court shall consider, in addition to the petition, the supporting affidavits, and the documentary evidence, all the files and records pertaining to the proceedings against the petitioner, including, but not limited to, the indictment, the court's journal entries, the journalized records of the clerk of the court, and the court reporter's transcript. The court reporter's transcript, if ordered and certified by the court, shall be taxed as court costs. If the court dismisses the petition, it shall make and file findings of fact and conclusions of law with respect to such dismissal. If the petition was filed by a person who has been sentenced to death, the findings of fact and conclusions of law shall state specifically the reasons for the dismissal of the petition and of each claim it contains. (E) (D) Within ten days after the docketing of the petition, or within any further time that the court may fix for good cause shown, the prosecuting attorney shall respond by answer or motion. Division (A)(6) of this section applies with respect to the prosecuting attorney's response. Within twenty days from the date the issues are raised, either party may move for summary judgment. The right to summary judgment shall appear on the face of the record. (F) (E) Unless the petition and the files and records of the case show the petitioner is not entitled to relief, the court shall proceed to a prompt hearing on the issues even if a direct appeal of the case is pending. If the court notifies the parties that it has found grounds for granting relief, either party may request an appellate court in which a direct appeal of the judgment is pending to remand the pending case to the court. With respect to a petition filed under division (A)(1)(a)(iv) of this section, the procedures and rules regarding introduction of evidence and burden of proof at the pretrial hearing that are set forth in divisions (C), (D), and (F) of section 2929.025 of the Revised Code apply in considering the petition. With respect to such a petition, the grounds for granting relief are that the person has been diagnosed with one or more of the conditions set forth in division (A)(1)(a) of section 2929.025 of the Revised Code and that, at the time of the aggravated murder that was the basis of the sentence of death, the condition or conditions significantly impaired the person's capacity in a manner described in division (A)(1)(b) of that section. (G) A petitioner who files a petition under division (A)(1)(a)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this section may amend the petition as follows: (1) If the petition was filed by a person who has been sentenced to death, at any time that is not later than one hundred eighty days after the petition is filed, the petitioner may amend the petition with or without leave or prejudice to the proceedings. (2) If division (G)(1) of this section does not apply, at (F) At any time before the answer or motion is filed, the petitioner may amend the petition with or without leave or prejudice to the proceedings. (3) The petitioner may amend the petition with leave of court at any time after the expiration of the applicable period specified in division (G)(1) or (2) of this sectionthereafter. (H) (G) If the court does not find grounds for granting relief, it shall make and file findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall enter judgment denying relief on the petition. If the petition was filed by a person who has been sentenced to death, the findings of fact and conclusions of law shall state specifically the reasons for the denial of relief on the petition and of each claim it contains. If no direct appeal of the case is pending and the court finds grounds for relief or if a pending direct appeal of the case has been remanded to the court pursuant to a request made pursuant to division (F) (E) of this section and the court finds grounds for granting relief, it shall make and file findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall enter a judgment that vacates and sets aside the judgment in question, and, in the case of a petitioner who is a prisoner in custody, except as otherwise described in this division, shall discharge or resentence the petitioner or grant a new trial as the court determines appropriate. If the court finds grounds for relief in the case of a petitioner who filed a petition under division (A)(1)(a)(iv) of this section, the court shall render void the sentence of death and order the resentencing of the offender under division (A) of section 2929.06 of the Revised Code. If the petitioner has been sentenced to death, the findings of fact and conclusions of law shall state specifically the reasons for the finding of grounds for granting the relief, with respect to each claim contained in the petition. The court also may make supplementary orders to the relief granted, concerning such matters as rearraignment, retrial, custody, and bail. If the trial court's order granting the petition is reversed on appeal and if the direct appeal of the case has been remanded from an appellate court pursuant to a request under division (F) (E) of this section, the appellate court reversing the order granting the petition shall notify the appellate court in which the direct appeal of the case was pending at the time of the remand of the reversal and remand of the trial court's order. Upon the reversal and remand of the trial court's order granting the petition, regardless of whether notice is sent or received, the direct appeal of the case that was remanded is reinstated. (I) Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to division (A)(1)(a)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this section by a person sentenced to death, only the supreme court may stay execution of the sentence of death. (J)(1) If a person sentenced to death intends to file a petition under this section, the court shall appoint counsel to represent the person upon a finding that the person is indigent and that the person either accepts the appointment of counsel or is unable to make a competent decision whether to accept or reject the appointment of counsel. The court may decline to appoint counsel for the person only upon a finding, after a hearing if necessary, that the person rejects the appointment of counsel and understands the legal consequences of that decision or upon a finding that the person is not indigent. (2) The court shall not appoint as counsel under division (J)(1) of this section an attorney who represented the petitioner at trial in the case to which the petition relates unless the person and the attorney expressly request the appointment. The court shall appoint as counsel under division (J)(1) of this section only an attorney who is certified under Rule 20 of the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio to represent indigent defendants charged with or convicted of an offense for which the death penalty can be or has been imposed. The ineffectiveness or incompetence of counsel during proceedings under this section does not constitute grounds for relief in a proceeding under this section, in an appeal of any action under this section, or in an application to reopen a direct appeal. (3) Division (J) of this section does not preclude attorneys who represent the state of Ohio from invoking the provisions of 28 U.S.C. 154 with respect to capital cases that were pending in federal habeas corpus proceedings prior to July 1, 1996, insofar as the petitioners in those cases were represented in proceedings under this section by one or more counsel appointed by the court under this section or section 120.06, 120.16, 120.26, or 120.33 of the Revised Code and those appointed counsel meet the requirements of division (J)(2) of this section. (K) (H) Subject to the appeal of a sentence for a felony that is authorized by section 2953.08 of the Revised Code, the remedy set forth in this section is the exclusive remedy by which a person may bring a collateral challenge to the validity of a conviction or sentence in a criminal case or to the validity of an adjudication of a child as a delinquent child for the commission of an act that would be a criminal offense if committed by an adult or the validity of a related order of disposition. Sec. 2953.23. (A) Whether a hearing is or is not held on a petition filed pursuant to section 2953.21 of the Revised Code, a court may not entertain a petition filed after the expiration of the period prescribed in division (A) of that section or a second petition or successive petitions for similar relief on behalf of a petitioner unless division (A)(1) or (2) of this section applies: (1) Both of the following apply: (a) Either the petitioner shows that the petitioner was unavoidably prevented from discovery of the facts upon which the petitioner must rely to present the claim for relief, or, subsequent to the period prescribed in division (A)(2) of section 2953.21 of the Revised Code or to the filing of an earlier petition, the United States Supreme Court recognized a new federal or state right that applies retroactively to persons in the petitioner's situation, and the petition asserts a claim based on that right. (b) The petitioner shows by clear and convincing evidence that, but for constitutional error at trial, no reasonable factfinder would have found the petitioner guilty of the offense of which the petitioner was convicted or, if the claim challenges a sentence of death that, but for constitutional error at the sentencing hearing, no reasonable factfinder would have found the petitioner eligible for the death sentence. (2) The petitioner was convicted of a felony, the petitioner is an offender for whom DNA testing was performed under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code or under former section 2953.82 of the Revised Code and analyzed in the context of and upon consideration of all available admissible evidence related to the inmate's case as described in division (D) of section 2953.74 of the Revised Code, and the results of the DNA testing establish, by clear and convincing evidence, actual innocence of that felony offense or, if the person was sentenced to death, establish, by clear and convincing evidence, actual innocence of the aggravating circumstance or circumstances the person was found guilty of committing and that is or are the basis of that sentence of death. As used in this division, "actual innocence" has the same meaning as in division (A)(1)(c) of section 2953.21 of the Revised Code, and "former section 2953.82 of the Revised Code" has the same meaning as in division (A)(1)(d) of section 2953.21 of the Revised Code. (B) An order awarding or denying relief sought in a petition filed pursuant to section 2953.21 of the Revised Code is a final judgment and may be appealed pursuant to Chapter 2953. of the Revised Code. If a petition filed pursuant to section 2953.21 of the Revised Code by a person who has been sentenced to death is denied and the person appeals the judgment, notwithstanding any law or court rule to the contrary, there is no limit on the number of pages in, or on the length of, a notice of appeal or briefs related to an appeal filed by the person. If any court rule specifies a limit on the number of pages in, or on the length of, a notice of appeal or briefs described in this division or on a prosecuting attorney's response or briefs with respect to such an appeal and a person who has been sentenced to death files a notice of appeal or briefs that exceed the limit specified for the petition, the prosecuting attorney may file a response or briefs that exceed the limit specified for the answer or briefs. Sec. 2953.71. As used in sections 2953.71 to 2953.83 of the Revised Code: (A) "Application" or "application for DNA testing" means a request through postconviction relief for the state to do DNA testing on biological material from the case in which the offender was convicted of the offense for which the offender is an eligible offender and is requesting the DNA testing under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code. (B) "Biological material" means any product of a human body containing DNA. (C) "Chain of custody" means a record or other evidence that tracks a subject sample of biological material from the time the biological material was first obtained until the time it currently exists in its place of storage and, in relation to a DNA sample, a record or other evidence that tracks the DNA sample from the time it was first obtained until it currently exists in its place of storage. For purposes of this division, examples of when biological material or a DNA sample is first obtained include, but are not limited to, obtaining the material or sample at the scene of a crime, from a victim, from an offender, or in any other manner or time as is appropriate in the facts and circumstances present. (D) "Custodial agency" means the group or entity that has the responsibility to maintain biological material in question. (E) "Custodian" means the person who is the primary representative of a custodial agency. (F) "Eligible offender" means an offender who is eligible under division (C) of section 2953.72 of the Revised Code to request DNA testing to be conducted under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code. (G) "Exclusion" or "exclusion result" means a result of DNA testing that scientifically precludes or forecloses the subject offender as a contributor of biological material recovered from the crime scene or victim in question, in relation to the offense for which the offender is an eligible offender and for which the sentence of death or prison term was imposed upon the offender. (H) "Extracting personnel" means medically approved personnel who are employed to physically obtain an offender's DNA specimen for purposes of DNA testing under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code. (I) "Inclusion" or "inclusion result" means a result of DNA testing that scientifically cannot exclude, or that holds accountable, the subject offender as a contributor of biological material recovered from the crime scene or victim in question, in relation to the offense for which the offender is an eligible offender and for which the sentence of death or prison term was imposed upon the offender. (J) "Inconclusive" or "inconclusive result" means a result of DNA testing that is rendered when a scientifically appropriate and definitive DNA analysis or result, or both, cannot be determined. (K) "Offender" means a criminal offender who was sentenced by a court, or by a jury and a court, of this state. (L) "Outcome determinative" means that had the results of DNA testing of the subject offender been presented at the trial of the subject offender requesting DNA testing and been found relevant and admissible with respect to the felony offense for which the offender is an eligible offender and is requesting the DNA testing, and had those results been analyzed in the context of and upon consideration of all available admissible evidence related to the offender's case as described in division (D) of section 2953.74 of the Revised Code, there is a strong probability that no reasonable factfinder would have found the offender guilty of that offense or, if the offender was sentenced to death relative to that offense, would have found the offender guilty of the aggravating circumstance or circumstances the offender was found guilty of committing and that is or are the basis of that sentence of death. (M) "Parent sample" means the biological material first obtained from a crime scene or a victim of an offense for which an offender is an eligible offender, and from which a sample will be presently taken to do a DNA comparison to the DNA of the subject offender under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code. (N) "Prison" and "community control sanction" have the same meanings as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (O) "Prosecuting attorney" means the prosecuting attorney who, or whose office, prosecuted the case in which the subject offender was convicted of the offense for which the offender is an eligible offender and is requesting the DNA testing. (P) "Prosecuting authority" means the prosecuting attorney or the attorney general. (Q) "Reasonable diligence" means a degree of diligence that is comparable to the diligence a reasonable person would employ in searching for information regarding an important matter in the person's own life. (R) "Testing authority" means a laboratory at which DNA testing will be conducted under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code. (S) "Parole" and "post-release control" have the same meanings as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. (T) "Sexually oriented offense" and "child-victim oriented offense" have the same meanings as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (U) "Definitive DNA test" means a DNA test that clearly establishes that biological material from the perpetrator of the crime was recovered from the crime scene and also clearly establishes whether or not the biological material is that of the eligible offender. A prior DNA test is not definitive if the eligible offender proves by a preponderance of the evidence that because of advances in DNA technology there is a possibility of discovering new biological material from the perpetrator that the prior DNA test may have failed to discover. Prior testing may have been a prior "definitive DNA test" as to some biological evidence but may not have been a prior "definitive DNA test" as to other biological evidence. Sec. 2953.72. (A) Any eligible offender who wishes to request DNA testing under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code shall submit an application for the testing to the court of common pleas specified in section 2953.73 of the Revised Code, on a form prescribed by the attorney general for this purpose. The eligible offender shall submit the application in accordance with the procedures set forth in section 2953.73 of the Revised Code. The eligible offender shall specify on the application the offense or offenses for which the offender is an eligible offender and is requesting the DNA testing. Along with the application, the eligible offender shall submit an acknowledgment that is on a form prescribed by the attorney general for this purpose and that is signed by the offender. The acknowledgment shall set forth all of the following: (1) That sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code contemplate applications for DNA testing of an eligible offender at a stage of a prosecution or case after the offender has been sentenced, that any exclusion or inclusion result of DNA testing rendered pursuant to those sections may be used by a party in any proceeding as described in section 2953.81 of the Revised Code, and that all requests for any DNA testing made at trial will continue to be handled by the prosecuting attorney in the case; (2) That the process of conducting postconviction DNA testing for an eligible offender under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code begins when the offender submits an application under section 2953.73 of the Revised Code and the acknowledgment described in this section; (3) That the eligible offender must submit the application and acknowledgment to the court of common pleas that heard the case in which the offender was convicted of the offense for which the offender is an eligible offender and is requesting the DNA testing; (4) That the state has established a set of criteria set forth in section 2953.74 of the Revised Code by which eligible offender applications for DNA testing will be screened and that a judge of a court of common pleas upon receipt of a properly filed application and accompanying acknowledgment will apply those criteria to determine whether to accept or reject the application; (5) That the results of DNA testing conducted under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code will be provided as described in section 2953.81 of the Revised Code to all parties in the postconviction proceedings and will be reported to various courts; (6) That, if DNA testing is conducted with respect to an offender under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code, the state will not offer the offender a retest if an inclusion result is achieved relative to the testing and that, if the state were to offer a retest after an inclusion result, the policy would create an atmosphere in which endless testing could occur and in which postconviction proceedings could be stalled for many years; (7) That, if the court rejects an eligible offender's application for DNA testing because the offender does not satisfy the acceptance criteria described in division (A)(4) of this section, the court will not accept or consider subsequent applications; (8) That the acknowledgment memorializes the provisions of sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code with respect to the application of postconviction DNA testing to offenders, that those provisions do not give any offender any additional constitutional right that the offender did not already have, that the court has no duty or obligation to provide postconviction DNA testing to offenders, that the court of common pleas has the sole discretion subject to an appeal as described in this division to determine whether an offender is an eligible offender and whether an eligible offender's application for DNA testing satisfies the acceptance criteria described in division (A)(4) of this section and whether the application should be accepted or rejected, that if the court of common pleas rejects an eligible offender's application, the offender may seek leave of the supreme court to appeal the rejection to that court if the offender was sentenced to death for the offense for which the offender is requesting the DNA testing and, if the offender was not sentenced to death for that offense, may appeal the rejection to the court of appeals, and that no determination otherwise made by the court of common pleas in the exercise of its discretion regarding the eligibility of an offender or regarding postconviction DNA testing under those provisions is reviewable by or appealable to any court; (9) That the manner in which sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code with respect to the offering of postconviction DNA testing to offenders are carried out does not confer any constitutional right upon any offender, that the state has established guidelines and procedures relative to those provisions to ensure that they are carried out with both justice and efficiency in mind, and that an offender who participates in any phase of the mechanism contained in those provisions, including, but not limited to, applying for DNA testing and being rejected, having an application for DNA testing accepted and not receiving the test, or having DNA testing conducted and receiving unfavorable results, does not gain as a result of the participation any constitutional right to challenge, or, except as provided in division (A)(8) of this section, any right to any review or appeal of, the manner in which those provisions are carried out; (10) That the most basic aspect of sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code is that, in order for DNA testing to occur, there must be an offender sample against which other evidence may be compared, that, if an eligible offender's application is accepted but the offender subsequently refuses to submit to the collection of the sample of biological material from the offender or hinders the state from obtaining a sample of biological material from the offender, the goal of those provisions will be frustrated, and that an offender's refusal or hindrance shall cause the court to rescind its prior acceptance of the application for DNA testing for the offender and deny the application. (B) The attorney general shall prescribe a form to be used to make an application for DNA testing under division (A) of this section and section 2953.73 of the Revised Code and a form to be used to provide the acknowledgment described in division (A) of this section. The forms shall include all information described in division (A) of this section, spaces for an offender to insert all information necessary to complete the forms, including, but not limited to, specifying the offense or offenses for which the offender is an eligible offender and is requesting the DNA testing, and any other information or material the attorney general determines is necessary or relevant. The attorney general shall distribute copies of the prescribed forms to the department of rehabilitation and correction, the department shall ensure that each prison in which offenders are housed has a supply of copies of the forms, and the department shall ensure that copies of the forms are provided free of charge to any offender who requests them. (C)(1) An offender is eligible to request DNA testing to be conducted under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code only if all of the following apply: (a) The offense for which the offender claims to be an eligible offender is a felony, and the offender was convicted by a judge or jury of that offense. (b) One of the following applies: (i) The offender was sentenced to a prison term or sentence of death for the felony described in division (C)(1)(a) of this section, and the offender is in prison serving that prison term or under that sentence of death, has been paroled or is on probation regarding that felony, is under post-release control regarding that felony, or has been released from that prison term and is under a community control sanction regarding that felony. (ii) The offender was not sentenced to a prison term or sentence of death for the felony described in division (C)(1)(a) of this section, but was sentenced to a community control sanction for that felony and is under that community control sanction. (iii) The felony described in division (C)(1)(a) of this section was a sexually oriented offense or child-victim oriented offense, and the offender has a duty to comply with sections 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, and 2950.06 of the Revised Code relative to that felony. (2) An offender is not an eligible offender under division (C)(1) of this section regarding any offense to which the offender pleaded guilty or no contest. (3) An offender is not an eligible offender under division (C)(1) of this section regarding any offense if the offender dies prior to submitting an application for DNA testing related to that offense under section 2953.73 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2953.73. (A) An eligible offender who wishes to request DNA testing to be conducted under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code shall submit an application for DNA testing on a form prescribed by the attorney general for this purpose and shall submit the form to the court of common pleas that sentenced the offender for the offense for which the offender is an eligible offender and is requesting DNA testing. (B) If an eligible offender submits an application for DNA testing under division (A) of this section, upon the submission of the application, all of the following apply: (1) The eligible offender shall serve a copy of the application on the prosecuting attorney and the attorney general. (2) The application shall be assigned to the judge of that court of common pleas who was the trial judge in the case in which the eligible offender was convicted of the offense for which the offender is requesting DNA testing, or, if that judge no longer is a judge of that court, it shall be assigned according to court rules. The judge to whom the application is assigned shall decide the application. The application shall become part of the file in the case. (C) If an eligible offender submits an application for DNA testing under division (A) of this section, regardless of whether the offender has commenced any federal habeas corpus proceeding relative to the case in which the offender was convicted of the offense for which the offender is an eligible offender and is requesting DNA testing, any response to the application by the prosecuting attorney or the attorney general shall be filed not later than forty-five days after the date on which the eligible offender submits the application. The prosecuting attorney or the attorney general, or both, may, but are not required to, file a response to the application. If the prosecuting attorney or the attorney general files a response under this division, the prosecuting attorney or attorney general, whoever filed the response, shall serve a copy of the response on the eligible offender. (D) If an eligible offender submits an application for DNA testing under division (A) of this section, the court shall make the determination as to whether the application should be accepted or rejected. The court shall expedite its review of the application. The court shall make the determination in accordance with the criteria and procedures set forth in sections 2953.74 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code and, in making the determination, shall consider the application, the supporting affidavits, and the documentary evidence and, in addition to those materials, shall consider all the files and records pertaining to the proceedings against the applicant, including, but not limited to, the indictment, the court's journal entries, the journalized records of the clerk of the court, and the court reporter's transcript and all responses to the application filed under division (C) of this section by a prosecuting attorney or the attorney general, unless the application and the files and records show the applicant is not entitled to DNA testing, in which case the application may be denied. The court is not required to conduct an evidentiary hearing in conducting its review of, and in making its determination as to whether to accept or reject, the application. Upon making its determination, the court shall enter a judgment and order that either accepts or rejects the application and that includes within the judgment and order the reasons for the acceptance or rejection as applied to the criteria and procedures set forth in sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code. The court shall send a copy of the judgment and order to the eligible offender who filed it, the prosecuting attorney, and the attorney general. (E) A judgment and order of a court entered under division (D) of this section is appealable only as provided in this division. If an eligible offender submits an application for DNA testing under section 2953.73 of the Revised Code and the court of common pleas rejects the application under division (D) of this section, one of the following applies: (1) If the offender was sentenced to death for the offense for which the offender claims to be an eligible offender and is requesting DNA testing, the offender may seek leave of the supreme court to appeal the rejection to the supreme court. Courts of appeals do not have jurisdiction to review any rejection if the offender was sentenced to death for the offense for which the offender claims to be an eligible offender and is requesting DNA testing. (2) If the offender was not sentenced to death for the offense for which the offender claims to be an eligible offender and is requesting DNA testing, the rejection is a final appealable order, and the offender may appeal it to the court of appeals of the district in which is located that court of common pleas. (F) Notwithstanding any provision of law regarding fees and costs, no filing fee shall be required of, and no court costs shall be assessed against, an eligible offender who is indigent and who submits an application under this section. (G) If a court rejects an eligible offender's application for DNA testing under division (D) of this section, unless the rejection is overturned on appeal, no court shall require the state to administer a DNA test under sections 2953.71 to 2953.81 of the Revised Code on the eligible offender. Sec. 2953.81. If an eligible offender submits an application for DNA testing under section 2953.73 of the Revised Code and if DNA testing is performed based on that application, upon completion of the testing, all of the following apply: (A) The court or a designee of the court shall require the state to maintain the results of the testing and to maintain and preserve both the parent sample of the biological material used and the offender sample of the biological material used. The testing authority may be designated as the person to maintain the results of the testing or to maintain and preserve some or all of the samples, or both. The results of the testing remain state's evidence. The samples shall be preserved during the entire period of time for which the offender is imprisoned or confined relative to the sentence in question, is on parole or probation relative to that sentence, is under post-release control or a community control sanction relative to that sentence, or has a duty to comply with sections 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, and 2950.06 of the Revised Code relative to that sentence. Additionally, if the prison term or confinement under the sentence in question expires, if the sentence in question is a sentence of death and the offender is executed, or if the parole or probation period, the period of post-release control, the community control sanction, or the duty to comply with sections 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, and 2950.06 of the Revised Code under the sentence in question ends, the samples shall be preserved for a reasonable period of time of not less than twenty-four months after the term or confinement expires, the offender is executed, or the parole or probation period, the period of post-release control, the community control sanction, or the duty to comply with sections 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, and 2950.06 of the Revised Code ends, whichever is applicable. The court shall determine the period of time that is reasonable for purposes of this division, provided that the period shall not be less than twenty-four months after the term or confinement expires, the offender is executed, or the parole or probation period, the period of post-release control, the community control sanction, or the duty to comply with sections 2950.04, 2950.041, 2950.05, and 2950.06 of the Revised Code ends, whichever is applicable. (B) The results of the testing are a public record. (C) The court or the testing authority shall provide a copy of the results of the testing to the prosecuting attorney, the attorney general, and the subject offender. (D) If the postconviction proceeding in question is pending at that time in a court of this state, the court of common pleas that decided the DNA application or the testing authority shall provide a copy of the results of the testing to any court of this state, and, if it is pending in a federal court, the court of common pleas that decided the DNA application or the testing authority shall provide a copy of the results of the testing to that federal court. (E) The testing authority shall provide a copy of the results of the testing to the court of common pleas that decided the DNA application. (F) The offender or the state may enter the results of the testing into any proceeding. Sec. 2967.05. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Imminent danger of death" means that the inmate has a medically diagnosable condition that will cause death to occur within a short period of time. As used in division (A)(1) of this section, "within a short period of time" means generally within six months. (2)(a) "Medically incapacitated" means any diagnosable medical condition, including mental dementia and severe, permanent medical or cognitive disability, that prevents the inmate from completing activities of daily living without significant assistance, that incapacitates the inmate to the extent that institutional confinement does not offer additional restrictions, that is likely to continue throughout the entire period of parole, and that is unlikely to improve noticeably. (b) "Medically incapacitated" does not include conditions related solely to mental illness unless the mental illness is accompanied by injury, disease, or organic defect. (3)(a) "Terminal illness" means a condition that satisfies all of the following criteria: (i) The condition is irreversible and incurable and is caused by disease, illness, or injury from which the inmate is unlikely to recover. (ii) In accordance with reasonable medical standards and a reasonable degree of medical certainty, the condition is likely to cause death to the inmate within twelve months. (iii) Institutional confinement of the inmate does not offer additional protections for public safety or against the inmate's risk to reoffend. (b) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement the definition of "terminal illness" in division (A)(3)(a) of this section. (B) Upon the recommendation of the director of rehabilitation and correction, accompanied by a certificate of the attending physician that an inmate is terminally ill, medically incapacitated, or in imminent danger of death, the governor may order the inmate's release as if on parole, reserving the right to return the inmate to the institution pursuant to this section. If, subsequent to the inmate's release, the inmate's health improves so that the inmate is no longer terminally ill, medically incapacitated, or in imminent danger of death, the inmate shall be returned, by order of the governor, to the institution from which the inmate was released. If the inmate violates any rules or conditions applicable to the inmate, the inmate may be returned to an institution under the control of the department of rehabilitation and correction. The governor may direct the adult parole authority to investigate or cause to be investigated the inmate and make a recommendation. An inmate released under this section shall be subject to supervision by the adult parole authority in accordance with any recommendation of the adult parole authority that is approved by the governor. The adult parole authority shall adopt rules pursuant to section 119.03 of the Revised Code to establish the procedure for medical release of an inmate when an inmate is terminally ill, medically incapacitated, or in imminent danger of death. (C) No inmate is eligible for release under this section if the inmate is serving a death sentence, a sentence of life without parole, a sentence under Chapter 2971. of the Revised Code for a felony of the first or second degree, a sentence for aggravated murder or murder, or a mandatory prison term for an offense of violence or any specification described in Chapter 2941. of the Revised Code. Sec. 2967.12. (A) Except as provided in division (G) of this section, at least sixty days before the adult parole authority recommends any pardon or commutation of sentence, or grants any parole, the authority shall provide a notice of the pendency of the pardon, commutation, or parole, setting forth the name of the person on whose behalf it is made, the offense of which the person was convicted or to which the person pleaded guilty, the time of conviction or the guilty plea, and the term of the person's sentence, to the prosecuting attorney and the judge of the court of common pleas of the county in which the indictment against the person was found. If there is more than one judge of that court of common pleas, the authority shall provide the notice to the presiding judge. Upon the request of the prosecuting attorney or of any law enforcement agency, the authority shall provide to the requesting prosecuting attorney and law enforcement agencies an institutional summary report that covers the subject person's participation while confined in a state correctional institution in training, work, and other rehabilitative activities and any disciplinary action taken against the person while so confined. The department of rehabilitation and correction may utilize electronic means to provide this notice. The department of rehabilitation and correction, at the same time that it provides the notice to the prosecuting attorney and judge under this division, also shall post on the database it maintains pursuant to section 5120.66 of the Revised Code the offender's name and all of the information specified in division (A)(1)(c)(iii) of that section. (B) If a request for notification has been made pursuant to section 2930.16 of the Revised Code or if division (H) of this section applies, the office of victim services or the adult parole authority also shall provide notice to the victim or the victim's representative at least sixty days prior to recommending any pardon or commutation of sentence for, or granting any parole to, the person. The notice shall include the information required by division (A) of this section and may be provided by telephone or through electronic means. The notice also shall inform the victim or the victim's representative that the victim or representative may send a written statement relative to the victimization and the pending action to the adult parole authority and that, if the authority receives any written statement prior to recommending a pardon or commutation or granting a parole for a person, the authority will consider the statement before it recommends a pardon or commutation or grants a parole. If the person is being considered for parole, the notice shall inform the victim or the victim's representative that a full board hearing of the parole board may be held and that the victim or victim's representative may contact the office of victims' services for further information. If the person being considered for parole was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2903.01 or 2903.02 of the Revised Code, an offense of violence that is a felony of the first, second, or third degree, or an offense punished by a sentence of life imprisonment, the notice shall inform the victim of that offense, the victim's representative, or a member of the victim's immediate family that the victim, the victim's representative, and the victim's immediate family have the right to give testimony at a full board hearing of the parole board and that the victim or victim's representative may contact the office of victims' services for further information. (C) When notice of the pendency of any pardon, commutation of sentence, or parole has been provided to a judge or prosecutor or posted on the database as required in division (A) of this section and a hearing on the pardon, commutation, or parole is continued to a date certain, the authority shall provide notice of the further consideration of the pardon, commutation, or parole at least sixty days before the further consideration. The notice of the further consideration shall be provided to the proper judge and prosecuting attorney at least sixty days before the further consideration, and may be provided using electronic means, and, if the initial notice was posted on the database as provided in division (A) of this section, the notice of the further consideration shall be posted on the database at least sixty days before the further consideration. If the prosecuting attorney or a law enforcement agency was provided a copy of the institutional summary report relative to the subject person under division (A) of this section, the authority shall include with the notice of the further consideration sent to the prosecuting attorney any new information with respect to the person that relates to activities and actions of the person that are of a type covered by the report and shall send to the law enforcement agency a report that provides notice of the further consideration and includes any such new information with respect to the person. When notice of the pendency of any pardon, commutation, or parole has been given as provided in division (B) of this section and the hearing on it is continued to a date certain, the authority shall give notice of the further consideration to the victim or the victim's representative in accordance with section 2930.03 of the Revised Code. (D) In case of an application for the pardon or commutation of sentence of a person sentenced to capital punishment prior to the effective date of this amendment, the governor may modify the requirements of notification and publication if there is not sufficient time for compliance with the requirements before the date fixed for the execution of sentence. (E) If an offender is serving a prison term imposed under division (A)(3), (B)(1)(a), (b), or (c), (B)(2)(a), (b), or (c), or (B)(3)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code and if the parole board terminates its control over the offender's service of that term pursuant to section 2971.04 of the Revised Code, the parole board immediately shall provide written notice of its termination of control or the transfer of control to the entities and persons specified in section 2971.04 of the Revised Code. (F) The failure of the adult parole authority to comply with the notice or posting provisions of division (A), (B), or (C) of this section or the failure of the parole board to comply with the notice provisions of division (E) of this section do not give any rights or any grounds for appeal or post-conviction relief to the person serving the sentence. (G) Divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section do not apply to any release of a person that is of the type described in division (B)(2)(b) of section 5120.031 of the Revised Code. (H) If a defendant is incarcerated for the commission of aggravated murder, murder, or an offense of violence that is a felony of the first, second, or third degree or is under a sentence of life imprisonment, except as otherwise provided in this division, the notice described in division (B) of this section shall be given to the victim or victim's representative regardless of whether the victim or victim's representative has made a request for notification. The notice described in division (B) of this section shall not be given under this division to a victim or victim's representative if the victim or victim's representative has requested pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 2930.03 of the Revised Code that the victim or the victim's representative not be provided the notice. The notice described in division (B) of this section does not have to be given under this division to a victim or victim's representative if notice was given to the victim or victim's representative with respect to at least two prior considerations of pardon, commutation, or parole of a person and the victim or victim's representative did not provide any written statement relative to the victimization and the pending action, did not attend any hearing conducted relative to the pending action, and did not otherwise respond to the office with respect to the pending action. Regardless of whether the victim or victim's representative has requested that the notice described in division (B) of this section be provided or not be provided, the office of victim services or adult parole authority shall give similar notice to the law enforcement agency that arrested the defendant if any officer of that agency was a victim of the offense and to any member of the victim's immediate family who requests notification. If notice is to be given under this division, the office or authority may give the notice by any reasonable means, including regular mail, telephone, and electronic mail, in accordance with division (D)(1) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code. If the notice is based on an offense committed prior to March 22, 2013, the notice to the victim or victim's representative also shall include the opt-out information described in division (D)(1) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code. The office or authority, in accordance with division (D)(2) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code, shall keep a record of all attempts to provide the notice, and of all notices provided, under this division. Division (H) of this section, and the notice-related provisions of divisions (E)(2) and (K) of section 2929.20, division (D)(1) of section 2930.16, division (E)(1)(b) of section 2967.19 as it existed prior to the effective date of this amendment April 4, 2023, division (A)(3)(b) of section 2967.26, division (D)(1) of section 2967.28, and division (A)(2) of section 5149.101 of the Revised Code enacted in the act in which division (H) of this section was enacted, shall be known as "Roberta's Law." (I) In addition to and independent of the right of a victim to make a statement as described in division (A) of this section or pursuant to section 2930.17 of the Revised Code or to otherwise make a statement, the authority for a judge or prosecuting attorney to furnish statements and information, make recommendations, and give testimony as described in division (A) of this section, the right of a prosecuting attorney, judge, or victim to give testimony or submit a statement at a full parole board hearing pursuant to section 5149.101 of the Revised Code, and any other right or duty of a person to present information or make a statement, any person may send to the adult parole authority at any time prior to the authority's recommending a pardon or commutation or granting a parole for the offender a written statement relative to the offense and the pending action. (J) As used in this section, "victim's immediate family" means the mother, father, spouse, sibling, or child of the victim, provided that in no case does "victim's immediate family" include the offender with respect to whom the notice in question applies. Sec. 2967.13. (A) Except as provided in division (G) of this section or section 2967.132 of the Revised Code, a prisoner serving a sentence of imprisonment for life for an offense committed on or after July 1, 1996, is not entitled to any earned credit under division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194 of the Revised Code and becomes eligible for parole as follows: (1) If a sentence of imprisonment for life was imposed for the offense of murder, at the expiration of the prisoner's minimum term; (2) If a sentence of imprisonment for life with parole eligibility after serving twenty years of imprisonment was imposed pursuant to section 2929.02 or former section 2929.022 or 2929.03 of the Revised Code, after serving a term of twenty years; (3) If a sentence of imprisonment for life with parole eligibility after serving twenty-five full years of imprisonment was imposed pursuant to section 2929.02 or former section 2929.022 or 2929.03 of the Revised Code, after serving a term of twenty-five full years; (4) If a sentence of imprisonment for life with parole eligibility after serving thirty full years of imprisonment was imposed pursuant to section 2929.02 or former section 2929.022 or 2929.03 of the Revised Code, after serving a term of thirty full years; (5) If a sentence of imprisonment for life was imposed for rape, after serving a term of ten full years' imprisonment; (6) If a sentence of imprisonment for life with parole eligibility after serving fifteen years of imprisonment was imposed for a violation of section 2927.24 of the Revised Code, after serving a term of fifteen years. (B) Except as provided in division (G) of this section or section 2967.132 of the Revised Code, a prisoner serving a sentence of imprisonment for life with parole eligibility after serving twenty years of imprisonment or a sentence of imprisonment for life with parole eligibility after serving twenty-five full years or thirty full years of imprisonment imposed pursuant to section 2929.02 or former section 2929.022 or 2929.03 of the Revised Code for an offense committed on or after July 1, 1996, consecutively to any other term of imprisonment, becomes eligible for parole after serving twenty years, twenty full years, or thirty full years, as applicable, as to each such sentence of life imprisonment, which shall not be reduced for earned credits under division (A)(2) or (3) of section 2967.193 or 2967.194 of the Revised Code, plus the term or terms of the other sentences consecutively imposed or, if one of the other sentences is another type of life sentence with parole eligibility, the number of years before parole eligibility for that sentence. (C) Except as provided in division (G) of this section or section 2967.132 of the Revised Code, a prisoner serving consecutively two or more sentences in which an indefinite term of imprisonment is imposed becomes eligible for parole upon the expiration of the aggregate of the minimum terms of the sentences. (D) Except as provided in division (G) of this section or section 2967.132 of the Revised Code, a prisoner serving a term of imprisonment who is described in division (A) of section 2967.021 of the Revised Code becomes eligible for parole as described in that division or, if the prisoner is serving a definite term of imprisonment, shall be released as described in that division. (E) Except as provided in section 2967.132 of the Revised Code, a prisoner serving a sentence of life imprisonment without parole imposed pursuant to section 2907.02 or section 2929.02 or former section 2929.03 or 2929.06 of the Revised Code is not eligible for parole and shall be imprisoned until death. (F) A prisoner serving a stated prison term that is a non-life felony indefinite prison term shall be released in accordance with sections 2967.271 and 2967.28 of the Revised Code. A prisoner serving a stated prison term of any other nature shall be released in accordance with section 2967.28 of the Revised Code. (G) Except as provided in section 2967.132 of the Revised Code, a prisoner serving a prison term or term of life imprisonment without parole imposed pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code never becomes eligible for parole during that term of imprisonment. Sec. 2967.193. (A)(1) The provisions of this section apply until April 4, 2024, to persons confined in a state correctional institution or in the substance use disorder treatment program. On and after April 4, 2024, the provisions of section 2967.194 of the Revised Code apply to persons so confined, in the manner specified in division (G) of that section. (2) Except as provided in division (C) of this section and subject to the maximum aggregate total specified in division (A)(4) of this section, a person confined in a state correctional institution or placed in the substance use disorder treatment program may provisionally earn one day or five days of credit, based on the category set forth in division (D)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section in which the person is included, toward satisfaction of the person's stated prison term, as described in division (F) of this section, for each completed month during which the person, if confined in a state correctional institution, productively participates in an education program, vocational training, employment in prison industries, treatment for substance abuse, or any other constructive program developed by the department of rehabilitation and correction with specific standards for performance by prisoners or during which the person, if placed in the substance use disorder treatment program, productively participates in the program. Except as provided in division (C) of this section and subject to the maximum aggregate total specified in division (A)(4) of this section, a person so confined in a state correctional institution who successfully completes two programs or activities of that type may, in addition, provisionally earn up to five days of credit toward satisfaction of the person's stated prison term, as described in division (F) of this section, for the successful completion of the second program or activity. The person shall not be awarded any provisional days of credit for the successful completion of the first program or activity or for the successful completion of any program or activity that is completed after the second program or activity. At the end of each calendar month in which a person productively participates in a program or activity listed in this division or successfully completes a program or activity listed in this division, the department of rehabilitation and correction shall determine and record the total number of days credit that the person provisionally earned in that calendar month. If the person in a state correctional institution violates prison rules or the person in the substance use disorder treatment program violates program or department rules, the department may deny the person a credit that otherwise could have been provisionally awarded to the person or may withdraw one or more credits previously provisionally earned by the person. Days of credit provisionally earned by a person shall be finalized and awarded by the department subject to administrative review by the department of the person's conduct. (3) Unless a person is serving a mandatory prison term or a prison term for an offense of violence or a sexually oriented offense, and notwithstanding the maximum aggregate total specified in division (A)(4) of this section, a person who successfully completes any of the following shall earn ninety days of credit toward satisfaction of the person's stated prison term or a ten per cent reduction of the person's stated prison term, whichever is less: (a) An Ohio high school diploma or Ohio certificate of high school equivalence certified by the Ohio central school system; (b) A therapeutic drug community program; (c) All three phases of the department of rehabilitation and correction's intensive outpatient drug treatment program; (d) A career technical vocational school program; (e) A college certification program; (f) The criteria for a certificate of achievement and employability as specified in division (A)(1) of section 2961.22 of the Revised Code. (4)(a) Except for persons described in division (A)(3) of this section and subject to division (A)(4)(b) of this section, the aggregate days of credit provisionally earned by a person for program or activity participation and program and activity completion under this section and the aggregate days of credit finally credited to a person under this section shall not exceed eight per cent of the total number of days in the person's stated prison term. (b) If a person is confined in a state correctional institution or in the substance use disorder treatment program after the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, and if the person as of that effective date October 3, 2023, has met the eight per cent limit specified in division (A)(4)(a) of this section or the person meets that eight per cent limit between that effective date October 3, 2023, and April 3, 2024, both of the following apply with respect to the person: (i) On and after the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, the eight per cent limit specified in division (A)(4)(a) of this section no longer applies to the person; (ii) On and after the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, the aggregate days of credit provisionally earned by a person for program or activity participation and program and activity completion under this section and the aggregate days of credit finally credited to a person under this section shall not exceed fifteen per cent of the total number of days in the person's stated prison term. (B) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall adopt rules that specify the programs or activities for which credit may be earned under this section, the criteria for determining productive participation in, or completion of, the programs or activities and the criteria for awarding credit, including criteria for awarding additional credit for successful program or activity completion, and the criteria for denying or withdrawing previously provisionally earned credit as a result of a violation of prison rules, or program or department rules, whichever is applicable. (C) No person confined in a state correctional institution or placed in a substance use disorder treatment program to whom any of the following applies shall be awarded any days of credit under division (A) of this section: (1) The person is serving a prison term that section 2929.13 or section 2929.14 of the Revised Code specifies cannot be reduced pursuant to this section or this chapter or is serving a sentence for which section 2967.13 or division (B) of section 2929.143 of the Revised Code specifies that the person is not entitled to any earned credit under this section. (2) The person is sentenced to death or is serving a prison term or a term of life imprisonment for aggravated murder, murder, or a conspiracy or attempt to commit, or complicity in committing, aggravated murder or murder. (3) The person is serving a sentence of life imprisonment without parole imposed pursuant to section 2929.02 or former section 2929.03 or 2929.06 of the Revised Code, a prison term or a term of life imprisonment without parole imposed pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code, or a sentence for a sexually oriented offense that was committed on or after September 30, 2011. (D) This division does not apply to a determination of whether a person confined in a state correctional institution or placed in a substance use disorder treatment program may earn any days of credit under division (A) of this section for successful completion of a second program or activity. The determination of whether a person confined in a state correctional institution may earn one day of credit or five days of credit under division (A) of this section for each completed month during which the person productively participates in a program or activity specified under that division shall be made in accordance with the following: (1) The offender may earn one day of credit under division (A) of this section, except as provided in division (C) of this section, if the most serious offense for which the offender is confined is any of the following that is a felony of the first or second degree: (a) A violation of division (A) of section 2903.04 or of section 2903.03, 2903.11, 2903.15, 2905.01, 2907.24, 2907.25, 2909.02, 2909.09, 2909.10, 2909.101, 2909.26, 2909.27, 2909.29, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2919.13, 2919.15, 2919.151, 2919.22, 2921.34, 2923.01, 2923.131, 2923.162, 2923.32, 2925.24, or 2927.24 of the Revised Code; (b) A conspiracy or attempt to commit, or complicity in committing, any other offense for which the maximum penalty is imprisonment for life or any offense listed in division (D)(1)(a) of this section. (2) The offender may earn one day of credit under division (A) of this section, except as provided in division (C) of this section, if the offender is serving a stated prison term that includes a prison term imposed for a sexually oriented offense that the offender committed prior to September 30, 2011. (3) The offender may earn one day of credit under division (A) of this section, except as provided in division (C) of this section, if the offender is serving a stated prison term that includes a prison term imposed for a felony other than carrying a concealed weapon an essential element of which is any conduct or failure to act expressly involving any deadly weapon or dangerous ordnance. (4) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, if the most serious offense for which the offender is confined is a felony of the first or second degree and divisions (D)(1), (2), and (3) of this section do not apply to the offender, the offender may earn one day of credit under division (A) of this section if the offender committed that offense prior to September 30, 2011, and the offender may earn five days of credit under division (A) of this section if the offender committed that offense on or after September 30, 2011. (5) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, if the most serious offense for which the offender is confined is a felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree or an unclassified felony and neither division (D)(2) nor (3) of this section applies to the offender, the offender may earn one day of credit under division (A) of this section if the offender committed that offense prior to September 30, 2011, and the offender may earn five days of credit under division (A) of this section if the offender committed that offense on or after September 30, 2011. (E) The department annually shall seek and consider the written feedback of the Ohio prosecuting attorneys association, the Ohio judicial conference, the Ohio public defender, the Ohio association of criminal defense lawyers, and other organizations and associations that have an interest in the operation of the corrections system and the earned credits program under this section as part of its evaluation of the program and in determining whether to modify the program. (F) Days of credit awarded under this section shall be applied toward satisfaction of a person's stated prison term as follows: (1) Toward the definite prison term of a prisoner serving a definite prison term as a stated prison term; (2) Toward the minimum and maximum terms of a prisoner serving an indefinite prison term imposed under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the first or second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019. (G) As used in this section: (1) "Sexually oriented offense" has the same meaning as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Substance use disorder treatment program" means the substance use disorder treatment program established by the department of rehabilitation and correction under section 5120.035 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2967.194. (A)(1) Beginning April 4, 2024, the provisions of this section shall apply, in the manner described in division (G) of this section, to persons confined on or after that date in a state correctional institution or in the substance use disorder treatment program. (2) Except as provided in division (C) of this section and subject to the maximum aggregate total specified in division (A)(4) of this section, a person confined in a state correctional institution or placed in the substance use disorder treatment program may provisionally earn one day or five days of credit, based on the category set forth in division (D)(1) or (2) of this section in which the person is included, toward satisfaction of the person's stated prison term, as described in division (F) of this section, for each completed month during which the person, if confined in a state correctional institution, productively participates in an education program, vocational training, employment in prison industries, treatment for substance abuse, or any other constructive program developed by the department of rehabilitation and correction with specific standards for performance by prisoners or during which the person, if placed in the substance use disorder treatment program, productively participates in the program. Except as provided in division (C) of this section and subject to the maximum aggregate total specified in division (A)(4) of this section, a person so confined in a state correctional institution who successfully completes two programs or activities of that type may, in addition, provisionally earn up to five days of credit toward satisfaction of the person's stated prison term, as described in division (F) of this section, for the successful completion of the second program or activity. The person shall not be awarded any provisional days of credit for the successful completion of the first program or activity or for the successful completion of any program or activity that is completed after the second program or activity. At the end of each calendar month in which a person productively participates in a program or activity listed in this division or successfully completes a program or activity listed in this division, the department of rehabilitation and correction shall determine and record the total number of days credit that the person provisionally earned in that calendar month. If the person in a state correctional institution violates prison rules or the person in the substance use disorder treatment program violates program or department rules, the department may deny the person a credit that otherwise could have been provisionally awarded to the person or may withdraw one or more credits previously provisionally earned by the person. Days of credit provisionally earned by a person shall be finalized and awarded by the department subject to administrative review by the department of the person's conduct. (3) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, unless a person is serving a mandatory prison term or a prison term for an offense of violence or a sexually oriented offense, and notwithstanding the maximum aggregate total specified in division (A)(4) of this section, a person who successfully completes any diploma, equivalence, program, or criteria identified in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (g) of this section shall earn ninety days of credit toward satisfaction of the person's stated prison term or a ten per cent reduction of the person's stated prison term, whichever is less, for each such diploma, equivalence, program, or criteria successfully completed. The diplomas, equivalences, programs, and criteria for which credit shall be granted under this division, upon successful completion, are: (a) An Ohio high school diploma or Ohio certificate of high school equivalence certified by the Ohio central school system; (b) A therapeutic drug community program; (c) All three phases of the department of rehabilitation and correction's intensive outpatient drug treatment program; (d) A career technical vocational school program; (e) A college certification program; (f) The criteria for a certificate of achievement and employability as specified in division (A)(1) of section 2961.22 of the Revised Code; (g) Any other constructive program developed by the department of rehabilitation and correction with specific standards for performance by prisoners. (4) Except for persons described in division (A)(3) of this section, the aggregate days of credit provisionally earned by a person for program or activity participation and program and activity completion under this section and the aggregate days of credit finally credited to a person under this section shall not exceed fifteen per cent of the total number of days in the person's stated prison term. (B) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall adopt rules that specify the programs or activities for which credit may be earned under this section, the criteria for determining productive participation in, or completion of, the programs or activities and the criteria for awarding credit, including criteria for awarding additional credit for successful program or activity completion, and the criteria for denying or withdrawing previously provisionally earned credit as a result of a violation of prison rules, or program or department rules, whichever is applicable. (C) No person confined in a state correctional institution or placed in a substance use disorder treatment program to whom any of the following applies shall be awarded any days of credit under division (A)(2) or (3) of this section: (1) The person is serving a prison term that section 2929.13 or section 2929.14 of the Revised Code specifies cannot be reduced pursuant to this section or this chapter or is serving a sentence for which section 2967.13 or division (B) of section 2929.143 of the Revised Code specifies that the person is not entitled to any earned credit under this section. (2) The person is sentenced to death or is serving a prison term or a term of life imprisonment for aggravated murder, murder, or a conspiracy or attempt to commit, or complicity in committing, aggravated murder or murder. (3) The person is serving a sentence of life imprisonment without parole imposed pursuant to former section 2929.03 or 2929.06 of the Revised Code, a prison term or a term of life imprisonment without parole imposed pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code, or a sentence for a sexually oriented offense that was committed on or after September 30, 2011. (D) This division does not apply to a determination of whether a person confined in a state correctional institution or placed in a substance use disorder treatment program may earn any days of credit under division (A)(2) of this section for successful completion of a second program or activity. The determination of whether a person confined in a state correctional institution may earn one day of credit or five days of credit under division (A)(2) of this section for each completed month during which the person productively participates in a program or activity specified under that division shall be made in accordance with the following: (1) The offender may earn one day of credit under division (A)(2) of this section, except as provided in division (C) of this section, if the offender is serving a stated prison term that includes a prison term imposed for a sexually oriented offense that the offender committed prior to September 30, 2011. (2) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, if division (D)(1) of this section does not apply to the offender, the offender may earn five days of credit under division (A)(2) of this section. (E) The department annually shall seek and consider the written feedback of the Ohio prosecuting attorneys association, the Ohio judicial conference, the Ohio public defender, the Ohio association of criminal defense lawyers, and other organizations and associations that have an interest in the operation of the corrections system and the earned credits program under this section as part of its evaluation of the program and in determining whether to modify the program. (F) Days of credit awarded under this section shall be applied toward satisfaction of a person's stated prison term as follows: (1) Toward the definite prison term of a prisoner serving a definite prison term as a stated prison term; (2) Toward the minimum and maximum terms of a prisoner serving an indefinite prison term imposed under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the first or second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019. (G) The provisions of this section apply to persons confined in a state correctional institution or in the substance use disorder treatment program on or after April 4, 2024, as follows: (1) Subject to division (G)(2) of this section, the provisions apply to a person so confined regardless of whether the person committed the offense for which the person is confined in the institution or was placed in the program prior to, on, or after April 4, 2024, and regardless of whether the person was convicted of or pleaded guilty to that offense prior to, on, or after April 4, 2024. (2) The provisions apply to a person so confined only with respect to the time that the person is so confined on and after April 4, 2024, and the provisions of section 2967.193 of the Revised Code that were in effect prior to April 4, 2024, and that applied to the person prior to that date, including the provisions of division (A)(4) of that section as amended by this act H.B. 33 of the 135th general assembly, apply to the person with respect to the time that the person was so confined prior to April 4, 2024. (H) As used in this section: (1) "Sexually oriented offense" has the same meaning as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Substance use disorder treatment program" means the substance use disorder treatment program established by the department of rehabilitation and correction under section 5120.035 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2971.03. (A) Notwithstanding divisions (A) and (D) of section 2929.14, section 2929.02, 2929.03, 2929.06, 2929.13, or another section of the Revised Code, other than divisions (B) and (C) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, that authorizes or requires a specified prison term or a mandatory prison term for a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony or that specifies the manner and place of service of a prison term or term of imprisonment, the court shall impose a sentence upon a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violent sex offense and who also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a sexually violent predator specification that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense, and upon a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to both a sexual motivation specification and a sexually violent predator specification that were included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense, as follows: (1) Except as provided in division (A)(5) of this section, if the offense for which the sentence is being imposed is aggravated murder and if the court does not impose upon the offender a sentence of death, it shall impose upon the offender a term of life imprisonment without parole. If the court sentences the offender to death and the sentence of death is vacated, overturned, or otherwise set aside, the court shall impose upon the offender a term of life imprisonment without parole. (2) Except as provided in division (A)(5) of this section, if the offense for which the sentence is being imposed is murder; or if the offense is rape committed in violation of division (A)(1)(b) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code when the offender purposely compelled the victim to submit by force or threat of force, when the victim was less than ten years of age, when the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to either rape committed in violation of that division or a violation of an existing or former law of this state, another state, or the United States that is substantially similar to division (A)(1)(b) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code, or when the offender during or immediately after the commission of the rape caused serious physical harm to the victim; or if the offense is an offense other than aggravated murder or murder for which a term of life imprisonment may be imposed, it shall impose upon the offender a term of life imprisonment without parole. (3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(3)(b), (c), (d), or (e) or (A)(4) of this section, if the offense for which the sentence is being imposed is an offense other than aggravated murder, murder, or rape and other than an offense for which a term of life imprisonment may be imposed, it shall impose an indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum term fixed by the court as described in this division, but not less than two years, and a maximum term of life imprisonment. Except as otherwise specified in this division, the minimum term shall be fixed by the court from among the range of terms available as a definite term for the offense. If the offense is a felony of the first or second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the minimum term shall be fixed by the court from among the range of terms available as a minimum term for the offense under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of that section. (b) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(4) of this section, if the offense for which the sentence is being imposed is kidnapping that is a felony of the first degree, it shall impose an indefinite prison term as follows: (i) If the kidnapping is committed on or after January 1, 2008, and the victim of the offense is less than thirteen years of age, except as otherwise provided in this division, it shall impose an indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum term of fifteen years and a maximum term of life imprisonment. If the kidnapping is committed on or after January 1, 2008, the victim of the offense is less than thirteen years of age, and the offender released the victim in a safe place unharmed, it shall impose an indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum term of ten years and a maximum term of life imprisonment. (ii) If the kidnapping is committed prior to January 1, 2008, or division (A)(3)(b)(i) of this section does not apply, it shall impose an indefinite term consisting of a minimum term fixed by the court that is not less than ten years and a maximum term of life imprisonment. (c) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(4) of this section, if the offense for which the sentence is being imposed is kidnapping that is a felony of the second degree, it shall impose an indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum term fixed by the court that is not less than eight years, and a maximum term of life imprisonment. (d) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(4) of this section, if the offense for which the sentence is being imposed is rape for which a term of life imprisonment is not imposed under division (A)(2) of this section or division (B) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code, it shall impose an indefinite prison term as follows: (i) If the rape is committed on or after January 2, 2007, in violation of division (A)(1)(b) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code, it shall impose an indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum term of twenty-five years and a maximum term of life imprisonment. (ii) If the rape is committed prior to January 2, 2007, or the rape is committed on or after January 2, 2007, other than in violation of division (A)(1)(b) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code, it shall impose an indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum term fixed by the court that is not less than ten years, and a maximum term of life imprisonment. (e) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(4) of this section, if the offense for which sentence is being imposed is attempted rape, it shall impose an indefinite prison term as follows: (i) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(3)(e)(ii), (iii), or (iv) of this section, it shall impose an indefinite prison term pursuant to division (A)(3)(a) of this section. (ii) If the attempted rape for which sentence is being imposed was committed on or after January 2, 2007, and if the offender also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1418 of the Revised Code, it shall impose an indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum term of five years and a maximum term of twenty-five years. (iii) If the attempted rape for which sentence is being imposed was committed on or after January 2, 2007, and if the offender also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1419 of the Revised Code, it shall impose an indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum term of ten years and a maximum of life imprisonment. (iv) If the attempted rape for which sentence is being imposed was committed on or after January 2, 2007, and if the offender also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1420 of the Revised Code, it shall impose an indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum term of fifteen years and a maximum of life imprisonment. (4) Except as provided in division (A)(5) of this section, for any offense for which the sentence is being imposed, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violent sex offense and also to a sexually violent predator specification that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense, or previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense and also to both a sexual motivation specification and a sexually violent predator specification that were included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense, it shall impose upon the offender a term of life imprisonment without parole. (5) Notwithstanding divisions (A)(1), (2), and (4) of this section, the court shall not impose a sentence of life imprisonment without parole upon any person for an offense that was committed when the person was under eighteen years of age. In any case described in division (A)(1), (2), or (4) of this section, if the offense was committed when the person was under eighteen years of age, the court shall impose an indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum term of thirty years and a maximum term of life imprisonment. (B)(1) Notwithstanding section 2929.13, division (A) or (D) of section 2929.14, or another section of the Revised Code other than division (B) of section 2907.02 or divisions (B) and (C) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code that authorizes or requires a specified prison term or a mandatory prison term for a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony or that specifies the manner and place of service of a prison term or term of imprisonment, if a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1)(b) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code committed on or after January 2, 2007, if division (A) of this section does not apply regarding the person, and if the court does not impose a sentence of life without parole when authorized pursuant to division (B) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose upon the person an indefinite prison term consisting of one of the following: (a) Except as otherwise required in division (B)(1)(b) or (c) of this section, a minimum term of ten years and a maximum term of life imprisonment. (b) If the victim was less than ten years of age, a minimum term of fifteen years and a maximum of life imprisonment. (c) If the offender purposely compels the victim to submit by force or threat of force, or if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to violating division (A)(1)(b) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code or to violating an existing or former law of this state, another state, or the United States that is substantially similar to division (A)(1)(b) of that section, or if the offender during or immediately after the commission of the offense caused serious physical harm to the victim, a minimum term of twenty-five years and a maximum of life imprisonment. (2) Notwithstanding section 2929.13, division (A) or (D) of section 2929.14, or another section of the Revised Code other than divisions (B) and (C) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code that authorizes or requires a specified prison term or a mandatory prison term for a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony or that specifies the manner and place of service of a prison term or term of imprisonment and except as otherwise provided in division (B) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code, if a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to attempted rape committed on or after January 2, 2007, and if division (A) of this section does not apply regarding the person, the court shall impose upon the person an indefinite prison term consisting of one of the following: (a) If the person also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1418 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose upon the person an indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum term of five years and a maximum term of twenty-five years. (b) If the person also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1419 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose upon the person an indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum term of ten years and a maximum term of life imprisonment. (c) If the person also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1420 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose upon the person an indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum term of fifteen years and a maximum term of life imprisonment. (3) Notwithstanding section 2929.13, division (A) or (D) of section 2929.14, or another section of the Revised Code other than divisions (B) and (C) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code that authorizes or requires a specified prison term or a mandatory prison term for a person who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony or that specifies the manner and place of service of a prison term or term of imprisonment, if a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to an offense described in division (B)(3)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section committed on or after January 1, 2008, if the person also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a sexual motivation specification that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense, and if division (A) of this section does not apply regarding the person, the court shall impose upon the person an indefinite prison term consisting of one of the following: (a) An indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum of ten years and a maximum term of life imprisonment if the offense for which the sentence is being imposed is kidnapping, the victim of the offense is less than thirteen years of age, and the offender released the victim in a safe place unharmed; (b) An indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum of fifteen years and a maximum term of life imprisonment if the offense for which the sentence is being imposed is kidnapping when the victim of the offense is less than thirteen years of age and division (B)(3)(a) of this section does not apply; (c) An indefinite term consisting of a minimum of thirty years and a maximum term of life imprisonment if the offense for which the sentence is being imposed is aggravated murder, when the victim of the offense is less than thirteen years of age, a sentence of death or life imprisonment without parole is not imposed for the offense, and division (A)(2)(b)(ii) of section 2929.022, division (A)(1)(e), (C)(1)(a)(v), (C)(2)(a)(ii), (D)(2)(b), (D)(3)(a)(iv), or (E)(1)(a)(iv) of section 2929.03, or division (A) or (B) (C) of section 2929.06 2929.02 of the Revised Code requires that the sentence for the offense be imposed pursuant to this division; (d) An indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum of thirty years and a maximum term of life imprisonment if the offense for which the sentence is being imposed is murder when the victim of the offense is less than thirteen years of age. (C)(1) If the offender is sentenced to a prison term pursuant to division (A)(3), (B)(1)(a), (b), or (c), (B)(2)(a), (b), or (c), or (B)(3)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section, the parole board shall have control over the offender's service of the term during the entire term unless the parole board terminates its control in accordance with section 2971.04 of the Revised Code. (2) Except as provided in division (C)(3) or (G) of this section, an offender sentenced to a prison term or term of life imprisonment without parole pursuant to division (A) of this section shall serve the entire prison term or term of life imprisonment in a state correctional institution. The offender is not eligible for judicial release under section 2929.20 of the Revised Code. (3) For a prison term imposed pursuant to division (A)(3), (B)(1)(a), (b), or (c), (B)(2)(a), (b), or (c), or (B)(3)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section, subject to the application of division (G) of this section, the court, in accordance with section 2971.05 of the Revised Code, may terminate the prison term or modify the requirement that the offender serve the entire term in a state correctional institution if all of the following apply: (a) The offender has served at least the minimum term imposed as part of that prison term. (b) The parole board, pursuant to section 2971.04 of the Revised Code, has terminated its control over the offender's service of that prison term. (c) The court has held a hearing and found, by clear and convincing evidence, one of the following: (i) In the case of termination of the prison term, that the offender is unlikely to commit a sexually violent offense in the future; (ii) In the case of modification of the requirement, that the offender does not represent a substantial risk of physical harm to others. (4) Except as provided in division (G) of this section, an offender who has been sentenced to a term of life imprisonment without parole pursuant to division (A)(1), (2), or (4) of this section shall not be released from the term of life imprisonment or be permitted to serve a portion of it in a place other than a state correctional institution. (D) If a court sentences an offender to a prison term or term of life imprisonment without parole pursuant to division (A) of this section and the court also imposes on the offender one or more additional prison terms pursuant to division (B) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, all of the additional prison terms shall be served consecutively with, and prior to, the prison term or term of life imprisonment without parole imposed upon the offender pursuant to division (A) of this section. (E) If the offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to two or more offenses for which a prison term or term of life imprisonment without parole is required to be imposed pursuant to division (A) of this section, divisions (A) to (D) of this section shall be applied for each offense. All minimum terms imposed upon the offender pursuant to division (A)(3) or (B) of this section for those offenses shall be aggregated and served consecutively, as if they were a single minimum term imposed under that division. (F)(1) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violent sex offense and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a sexually violent predator specification that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense, or is convicted of or pleads guilty to a designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to both a sexual motivation specification and a sexually violent predator specification that were included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense, the conviction of or plea of guilty to the offense and the sexually violent predator specification automatically classifies the offender as a tier III sex offender/child-victim offender for purposes of Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code. (2) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to committing on or after January 2, 2007, a violation of division (A)(1)(b) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code and either the offender is sentenced under section 2971.03 of the Revised Code or a sentence of life without parole is imposed under division (B) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code, the conviction of or plea of guilty to the offense automatically classifies the offender as a tier III sex offender/child-victim offender for purposes of Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code. (3) If a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to committing on or after January 2, 2007, attempted rape and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1418, 2941.1419, or 2941.1420 of the Revised Code, the conviction of or plea of guilty to the offense and the specification automatically classify the offender as a tier III sex offender/child-victim offender for purposes of Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code. (4) If a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to one of the offenses described in division (B)(3)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section and a sexual motivation specification related to the offense and the victim of the offense is less than thirteen years of age, the conviction of or plea of guilty to the offense automatically classifies the offender as a tier III sex offender/child-victim offender for purposes of Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code. (G) Notwithstanding divisions (A) to (E) of this section, if an offender receives or received a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, a definite sentence, or a sentence to an indefinite prison term under this chapter for an offense committed when the offender was under eighteen years of age, the offender is eligible for parole and the offender's parole eligibility shall be determined under section 2967.132 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2971.07. (A) This chapter does not apply to any offender unless the offender is one of the following: (1) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violent sex offense and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a sexually violent predator specification that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense. (2) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to both a sexual motivation specification and a sexually violent predator specification that were included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense. (3) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1)(b) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code committed on or after January 2, 2007, and the court does not sentence the offender to a term of life without parole pursuant to division (B) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code or division (B) of that section prohibits the court from sentencing the offender pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (4) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to attempted rape committed on or after January 2, 2007, and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1418, 2941.1419, or 2941.1420 of the Revised Code. (5) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2905.01 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a sexual motivation specification that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense, and that section requires a court to sentence the offender pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (6) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to aggravated murder and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a sexual motivation specification that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense, and division (A)(2)(b)(ii) of section 2929.022, division (A)(1)(e), (C)(1)(a)(v), (C)(2)(a)(ii), (D)(2)(b), (D)(3)(a)(iv), or (E)(1)(a)(iv) of section 2929.03, or division (A) or (B) (C) of section 2929.06 2929.02 of the Revised Code requires a court to sentence the offender pursuant to division (B)(3) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (7) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to murder and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a sexual motivation specification that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense, and division (B)(2) (C)(1) of section 2929.02 of the Revised Code requires a court to sentence the offender pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (B) This chapter does not limit or affect a court in imposing upon an offender described in divisions (A)(1) to (9) of this section any financial sanction under section 2929.18 or any other section of the Revised Code, or, except as specifically provided in this chapter, any other sanction that is authorized or required for the offense or violation by any other provision of law. (C) If an offender is sentenced to a prison term under division (A)(3), (B)(1)(a), (b), or (c), (B)(2)(a), (b), or (c), or (B)(3)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code and if, pursuant to section 2971.05 of the Revised Code, the court modifies the requirement that the offender serve the entire prison term in a state correctional institution or places the offender on conditional release that involves the placement of the offender under the supervision of the adult parole authority, authorized field officers of the authority who are engaged within the scope of their supervisory duties or responsibilities may search, with or without a warrant, the person of the offender, the place of residence of the offender, and a motor vehicle, another item of tangible or intangible personal property, or any other real property in which the offender has the express or implied permission of a person with a right, title, or interest to use, occupy, or possess if the field officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the offender is not abiding by the law or otherwise is not complying with the terms and conditions of the offender's modification or release. The authority shall provide each offender with a written notice that informs the offender that authorized field officers of the authority who are engaged within the scope of their supervisory duties or responsibilities may conduct those types of searches during the period of the modification or release if they have reasonable grounds to believe that the offender is not abiding by the law or otherwise is not complying with the terms and conditions of the offender's modification or release. Sec. 5120.113. (A) For each inmate committed to the department of rehabilitation and correction, except as provided in division (B) of this section, the department shall prepare a written reentry plan for the inmate to help guide the inmate's rehabilitation program during imprisonment, to assist in the inmate's reentry into the community, and to assess the inmate's needs upon release. (B) Division (A) of this section does not apply to an inmate who has been sentenced to life imprisonment without parole or who has been sentenced to death before the effective date of this amendment. Division (A) of this section does not apply to any inmate who is expected to be imprisoned for thirty days or less, but the department may prepare a written reentry plan of the type described in that division if the department determines that the plan is needed. (C) The department may collect, if available, any social and other information that will aid in the preparation of reentry plans under this section. (D) In the event the department does not prepare a written reentry plan as specified in division (A) of this section, or makes a decision to not prepare a written reentry plan under division (B) of this section or to not collect information under division (C) of this section, that fact does not give rise to a claim for damages against the state, the department, the director of the department, or any employee of the department. Sec. 5120.53. (A) If a treaty between the United States and a foreign country provides for the transfer or exchange, from one of the signatory countries to the other signatory country, of convicted offenders who are citizens or nationals of the other signatory country, the governor, subject to and in accordance with the terms of the treaty, may authorize the director of rehabilitation and correction to allow the transfer or exchange of convicted offenders and to take any action necessary to initiate participation in the treaty. If the governor grants the director the authority described in this division, the director may take the necessary action to initiate participation in the treaty and, subject to and in accordance with division (B) of this section and the terms of the treaty, may allow the transfer or exchange to a foreign country that has signed the treaty of any convicted offender who is a citizen or national of that signatory country. (B)(1) No convicted offender who is serving a term of imprisonment in this state for aggravated murder, murder, or a felony of the first or second degree, who is serving a mandatory prison term imposed under section 2925.03 or 2925.11 of the Revised Code in circumstances in which the court was required to impose as the mandatory prison term the maximum definite prison term or longest minimum prison term authorized for the degree of offense committed, or who is serving a term of imprisonment in this state imposed for an offense committed prior to July 1, 1996, that was an aggravated felony of the first or second degree or that was aggravated trafficking in violation of division (A)(9) or (10) of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code, or who has been sentenced to death in this state shall be transferred or exchanged to another country pursuant to a treaty of the type described in division (A) of this section. (2) If a convicted offender is serving a term of imprisonment in this state and the offender is a citizen or national of a foreign country that has signed a treaty of the type described in division (A) of this section, if the governor has granted the director of rehabilitation and correction the authority described in that division, and if the transfer or exchange of the offender is not barred by division (B)(1) of this section, the director or the director's designee may approve the offender for transfer or exchange pursuant to the treaty if the director or the designee, after consideration of the factors set forth in the rules adopted by the department under division (D) of this section and all other relevant factors, determines that the transfer or exchange of the offender is appropriate. (C) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code regarding the parole eligibility of, or the duration or calculation of a sentence of imprisonment imposed upon, an offender, if a convicted offender is serving a term of imprisonment in this state and the offender is a citizen or national of a foreign country that has signed a treaty of the type described in division (A) of this section, if the offender is serving an indefinite term of imprisonment, if the offender is barred from being transferred or exchanged pursuant to the treaty due to the indefinite nature of the offender's term of imprisonment, and if in accordance with division (B)(2) of this section the director of rehabilitation and correction or the director's designee approves the offender for transfer or exchange pursuant to the treaty, the parole board, pursuant to rules adopted by the director, shall set a date certain for the release of the offender. To the extent possible, the date certain that is set shall be reasonably proportionate to the indefinite term of imprisonment that the offender is serving. The date certain that is set for the release of the offender shall be considered only for purposes of facilitating the international transfer or exchange of the offender, shall not be viable or actionable for any other purpose, and shall not create any expectation or guarantee of release. If an offender for whom a date certain for release is set under this division is not transferred to or exchanged with the foreign country pursuant to the treaty, the date certain is null and void, and the offender's release shall be determined pursuant to the laws and rules of this state pertaining to parole eligibility and the duration and calculation of an indefinite sentence of imprisonment. (D) If the governor, pursuant to division (A) of this section, authorizes the director of rehabilitation and correction to allow any transfer or exchange of convicted offenders as described in that division, the director shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement the provisions of this section. The rules shall include a rule that requires the director or the director's designee, in determining whether to approve a convicted offender who is serving a term of imprisonment in this state for transfer or exchange pursuant to a treaty of the type described in division (A) of this section, to consider all of the following factors: (1) The nature of the offense for which the offender is serving the term of imprisonment in this state; (2) The likelihood that, if the offender is transferred or exchanged to a foreign country pursuant to the treaty, the offender will serve a shorter period of time in imprisonment in the foreign country than the offender would serve if the offender is not transferred or exchanged to the foreign country pursuant to the treaty; (3) The likelihood that, if the offender is transferred or exchanged to a foreign country pursuant to the treaty, the offender will return or attempt to return to this state after the offender has been released from imprisonment in the foreign country; (4) The degree of any shock to the conscience of justice and society that will be experienced in this state if the offender is transferred or exchanged to a foreign country pursuant to the treaty; (5) All other factors that the department determines are relevant to the determination. Sec. 5120.61. (A)(1) Not later than ninety days after January 1, 1997, the department of rehabilitation and correction shall adopt standards that it will use under this section to assess the following criminal offenders and may periodically revise the standards: (a) A criminal offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violent sex offense or designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense and is adjudicated a sexually violent predator in relation to that offense; (b) A criminal offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1)(b) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code committed on or after January 2, 2007, and either who is sentenced under section 2971.03 of the Revised Code or upon whom a sentence of life without parole is imposed under division (B) of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code; (c) A criminal offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to attempted rape committed on or after January 2, 2007, and a specification of the type described in section 2941.1418, 2941.1419, or 2941.1420 of the Revised Code; (d) A criminal offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2905.01 of the Revised Code and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a sexual motivation specification that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense, and who is sentenced pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code; (e) A criminal offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to aggravated murder and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a sexual motivation specification that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense, and who pursuant to division (A)(2)(b)(ii) of section 2929.022, division (A)(1)(e), (C)(1)(a)(v), (C)(2)(a)(ii), (D)(2)(b), (D)(3)(a)(iv), or (E)(1)(a)(iv) of section 2929.03, or division (A) or (B) (C) of section 2929.06 2929.02 of the Revised Code is sentenced pursuant to division (B)(3) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code; (f) A criminal offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to murder and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a sexual motivation specification that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging that offense, and who pursuant to division (B)(2) (C)(1) of section 2929.02 of the Revised Code is sentenced pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. (2) When the department is requested by the parole board or the court to provide a risk assessment report of the offender under section 2971.04 or 2971.05 of the Revised Code, it shall assess the offender and complete the assessment as soon as possible after the offender has commenced serving the prison term or term of life imprisonment without parole imposed under division (A), (B)(1)(a), (b), or (c), (B)(2)(a), (b), or (c), or (B)(3)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code. Thereafter, the department shall update a risk assessment report pertaining to an offender as follows: (a) Periodically, in the discretion of the department, provided that each report shall be updated no later than two years after its initial preparation or most recent update; (b) Upon the request of the parole board for use in determining pursuant to section 2971.04 of the Revised Code whether it should terminate its control over an offender's service of a prison term imposed upon the offender under division (A)(3), (B)(1)(a), (b), or (c), (B)(2)(a), (b), or (c), or (B)(3)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code; (c) Upon the request of the court. (3) After the department of rehabilitation and correction assesses an offender pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section, it shall prepare a report that contains its risk assessment for the offender or, if a risk assessment report previously has been prepared, it shall update the risk assessment report. (4) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall provide each risk assessment report that it prepares or updates pursuant to this section regarding an offender to all of the following: (a) The parole board for its use in determining pursuant to section 2971.04 of the Revised Code whether it should terminate its control over an offender's service of a prison term imposed upon the offender under division (A)(3), (B)(1)(a), (b), or (c), (B)(2)(a), (b), or (c), or (B)(3)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code, if the parole board has not terminated its control over the offender; (b) The court for use in determining, pursuant to section 2971.05 of the Revised Code, whether to modify the requirement that the offender serve the entire prison term imposed upon the offender under division (A)(3), (B)(1)(a), (b), or (c), (B)(2)(a), (b), or (c), or (B)(3)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of section 2971.03 of the Revised Code in a state correctional institution, whether to revise any modification previously made, or whether to terminate the prison term; (c) The prosecuting attorney who prosecuted the case, or the successor in office to that prosecuting attorney; (d) The offender. (B) When the department of rehabilitation and correction provides a risk assessment report regarding an offender to the parole board or court pursuant to division (A)(4)(a) or (b) of this section, the department, prior to the parole board's or court's hearing, also shall provide to the offender or to the offender's attorney of record a copy of the report and a copy of any other relevant documents the department possesses regarding the offender that the department does not consider to be confidential. (C) As used in this section: (1) "Adjudicated a sexually violent predator" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code, and a person is "adjudicated a sexually violent predator" in the same manner and the same circumstances as are described in that section. (2) "Designated homicide, assault, or kidnapping offense" and "violent sex offense" have the same meanings as in section 2971.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5139.04. The department of youth services shall do all of the following: (A) Support service districts through a central administrative office that shall have as its administrative head a deputy director who shall be appointed by the director of the department. When a vacancy occurs in the office of that deputy director, an assistant deputy director shall act as that deputy director until the vacancy is filled. The position of deputy director and assistant deputy director described in this division shall be in the unclassified civil service of the state. (B) Receive custody of all children committed to it under Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code, cause a study to be made of those children, and issue any orders, as it considers best suited to the needs of any of those children and the interest of the public, for the treatment of each of those children; (C) Obtain personnel necessary for the performance of its duties; (D) Adopt rules that regulate its organization and operation, that implement sections 5139.34 and 5139.41 to 5139.43 of the Revised Code, and that pertain to the administration of other sections of this chapter; (E) Submit reports of its operations to the governor and the general assembly by the thirty-first day of January of each odd-numbered year; (F) Conduct a program of research in diagnosis, training, and treatment of delinquent children to evaluate the effectiveness of the department's services and to develop more adequate methods; (G) Develop a standard form for the disposition investigation report that a juvenile court is required pursuant to section 2152.18 of the Revised Code to complete and provide to the department when the court commits a child to the legal custody of the department; (H) Provide the state public defender the reasonable access authorized under division (I) (H) of section 120.06 of the Revised Code in order to fulfill the department's constitutional obligation to provide juveniles who have been committed to the department's care access to the courts. (I) Do all other acts necessary or desirable to carry out this chapter. Sec. 5919.16. (A) Commissioned and warrant officers in the Ohio national guard shall be discharged by the adjutant general upon either of the following: (1) The officer's resignation; (2) Approval of a board's recommendation for withdrawal of federal recognition by the chief of the national guard bureau. (B) An officer also may be discharged under any of the following circumstances: (1) Pursuant to other federal regulations; (2) If absent without leave for three months, upon recommendation of an efficiency board; (3) Pursuant to sentence by court-martial; (4) If the officer has been convicted of a crime classified as a felony as described in division (C) or (D) or (E) of section 2901.02 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 9.07, 120.03, 120.041, 120.06, 120.14, 120.16, 120.18, 120.24, 120.26, 120.28, 120.33, 120.34, 149.43, 149.436, 1901.183, 2152.13, 2152.67, 2301.20, 2307.60, 2317.02, 2701.07, 2743.51, 2901.02, 2909.24, 2929.02, 2929.13, 2929.14, 2929.61, 2930.19, 2937.222, 2941.021, 2941.14, 2941.148, 2941.401, 2941.43, 2941.51, 2945.06, 2945.10, 2945.13, 2945.21, 2945.25, 2945.33, 2945.38, 2949.02, 2949.03, 2953.02, 2953.07, 2953.08, 2953.09, 2953.10, 2953.21, 2953.23, 2953.71, 2953.72, 2953.73, 2953.81, 2967.05, 2967.12, 2967.13, 2967.193, 2967.194, 2971.03, 2971.07, 5120.113, 5120.53, 5120.61, 5139.04, and 5919.16 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That sections 109.97, 120.35, 2725.19, 2929.021, 2929.022, 2929.023, 2929.024, 2929.025, 2929.03, 2929.04, 2929.05, 2929.06, 2945.20, 2947.08, 2949.21, 2949.22, 2949.221, 2949.222, 2949.24, 2949.25, 2949.26, 2949.27, 2949.28, 2949.29, 2949.31, and 2967.08 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 4. (A) An offender whose sentence of death has been set aside, nullified, or vacated pursuant to section 2929.06 of the Revised Code as it existed immediately before the effective date of this section but who has not been resentenced under that section as of the effective date of this section shall be resentenced in accordance with that section as it existed immediately before the effective date of this section. (B) Nothing in this act is intended to nullify or mitigate the sentence of an offender who was sentenced to death before the effective date of this section. An offender who was sentenced to death before the effective date of this section has the same rights to appeal and to postconviction remedies as the offender had under the provisions of Chapter 2953. of the Revised Code as those provisions existed immediately before the effective date of this section or as those provisions may hereafter be amended, and courts have the same powers and duties with respect to those offenders under those provisions as courts had before the effective date of this section. (C) All reports and payments relating to capital cases that were required to be made under any provision of Chapter 120. or section 109.97 of the Revised Code as those provisions existed immediately before the effective date of this section shall be made each calendar or fiscal year, as applicable, in accordance with those provisions as they existed immediately before the effective date of this section, and the Capital Case Attorney Fee Council created under section 120.33 of the Revised Code shall continue under the provisions of that section as it existed immediately before the effective date of this section, until each case in which a defendant was sentenced to death before the effective date of this section is finally resolved. (D) In an action in which an offender was sentenced to death before the effective date of this section, a court of common pleas shall preserve the records of the action as required by section 2301.20 of the Revised Code as it existed immediately before the effective date of this section. Section 5. Attorneys appointed to represent indigent defendants in postconviction relief proceedings in cases in which the defendant was sentenced to death before the effective date of this section shall be certified under the Rules for Appointment of Counsel in Capital Cases in the same manner as those certifications were required under Rule 20 of the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio by sections 120.06, 120.14, 120.26, and 120.33 of the Revised Code as those sections existed immediately before the effective date of this section. Section 6. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 2929.02 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 136 and S.B. 256 of the 133rd General Assembly. Section 2929.14 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 56 and S.B. 106 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 2953.07 of the Revised Code as amended by both S.B. 2 and S.B. 4 of the 121st General Assembly. Section 2971.03 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 136 and S.B. 256 of the 133rd General Assembly.